_	The book closes with an example of a clash of cultural perspectives on kinship and family norms, and makes the suggestion that;
_	In the same essay, however, Lewis denies the suggestion that he is attacking intellect as such, and in his book on "Miracles" he even argues for the scholastic belief that the intellect is our participation in the supernatural world.
_	He attended the novelist Ann Radcliffe at her death in 1823; surviving records have led to the suggestion that Scudamore's prescriptions worsened her condition.
_	Doubts were raised as to the manner of the victory, however, with the suggestion that Weston was aided in his victory by Steve Donoghue, on Hyperion's stablemate Thrapston, securing a clear passage for him.
_	In subsequent years, it was argued there was strong support for the suggestion that some animals (most likely amniotes) have at least simple conscious thoughts and feelings and that the view animals feel pain differently to higher primates is now a minority view.
_	Moreover, they have the suggestion that there has been more than one Zoroaster.
_	Some extremophile habitats are not dissimilar to those on Mars, leading to the suggestion that viable microbes could be transferred between planets in meteorites.
_	Defending himself against the suggestion that this would be discrimination, during an interview he said: "I'm willing to take a harder look at people who might be terrorists, that's what I'm saying".
_	In the philosophical literature, the suggestion that causation is to be defined in terms of a counterfactual relation is made by the 18th Century Scottish philosopher David Hume.
_	This connection between depression and heritable negative life events has led to the suggestion that part of the heritability of depression stems from greater risk of experiencing environments more likely to lead to its occurrence.
_	As regards to the suggestion that "Chaukhandi" is the name of a place, Mumtaz Hassan feels that such a view derives from the fact that the name Chaukhandi had come to be associated with the tombs near Landhi.
_	A 2008 study found that sperm whales sleep in vertical postures just under the surface in passive shallow 'drift-dives', generally during the day, during which whales do not respond to passing vessels unless they are in contact, leading to the suggestion that whales possibly sleep during such dives.
_	The story went viral quickly, encouraging several comments on both the MAX article and the suggestion that "Unpublished Critics" had influenced "Sweet Child o' Mine", including one from Duff McKagan, bass player with Guns N' Roses when "Sweet Child o' Mine" was written and recorded.
_	Bill Niven wrote that the suggestion that the SS fled to West Germany was accentuated in the film more than in the novel, although Beyer was careful not to make explicit parallels between the camp and the FRG.
_	It is one of two Scandinavian eyepieces discovered alone, however, giving rise to the suggestion that it was intentionally deposited in an invocation of the one-eyed god Odin.
_	The shape of the basihyal bone in the skull, and aspects of its behaviour led to the suggestion that it was instead an Old World warbler in the family Sylviidae.
_	Ross is relieved, but Simmonds does not agree with the suggestion that he be brought to a hospital; instead, he bargains with Kenny with the lure of a prostitute for the assurance that he would keep the incident quiet.
_	An initial morphological characterization of the toe bone led to the suggestion that it may have belonged to a Neanderthal-Denisovan hybrid individual, although a critic suggested that the morphology was inconclusive.
_	This, suppressed at the Reformation owing to the incidental disorder that accompanied it, and revived as part of the festivities on Queen Elizabeth's visit to Kenilworth in July 1575, depicted the struggle between Saxons and Danes, and has given colour to the suggestion that hock-tide was originally a commemoration of the massacre of the Danes on St. Brice's Day, 13 November 1002, or of the rejoicings at the death of Harthacanute on 8 June 1042 and the expulsion of the Danes.
_	We recommend that the Government abandon its plans to introduce a power of recall", and "We have not seen enough evidence to support the suggestion that it will increase public confidence in politics, and fear that the restricted form of recall proposed could even reduce confidence by creating expectations that are not fulfilled."
_	This has led to the suggestion that they are formed by deep sources over which the Pacific Plate drifts and eventually carries the volcano away from its magma source.
_	19th century scholar Jacob Grimm rejects the suggestion that Hjúki and Bil represent the phases of the moon, and states that Hjúki and Bil rather represent the craters on the moon seen from the earth.
_	Curtis, who is of mestizo origin (Peruvian on his mother's side) feels he has made it on his own merits and resents what he sees as the suggestion that minorities need an added advantage.
_	In the "Elements of Logic", which was published in 1826 and issued in many subsequent editions, Archbishop Richard Whately gave probably the first form of an argument map, introducing it with the suggestion that "many students probably will find it a very clear and convenient mode of exhibiting the logical analysis of the course of argument, to draw it out in the form of a Tree, or Logical Division".
_	When Kevin's ex-boyfriend Chad Berry returns he intrigues the couple with the suggestion that they participate in a threesome.
_	When Fyodor Dostoyevsky came out with the suggestion that with Dobrolyubov's death and Chernyshevsky’s imprisonment the radical movement in Russia became lifeless and dogmatic, Saltykov labeled him and his fellow pochvenniks 'reactionaries'.
_	The name change was done to "get away from the suggestion that you can only achieve dignity in dying with euthanasia".
_	Complementing the suggestion that personality traits should be used as selection tools, Judge and colleagues (2002) found that the Big Five Personality traits were more strongly related to leadership than intelligence.
_	Lu Prefecture fell in fall 893, and Yang executed Cai — but refused to accept the suggestion that Cai's ancestral tombs be dug up, stating: "Because of what Cai Chou did, the people under heaven despised him.
_	This schedule continued until 23 August, when Henry Laurens released the "Saratoga" from her escorting duty with the suggestion that she "...make a short cruise and then return to Philadelphia..."
_	During this same period, a number of influential newspaper columnists covering the entertainment industry, including Walter Winchell, Hedda Hopper, Victor Riesel, Jack O'Brian, and George Sokolsky, regularly offered up names with the suggestion that they should be added to the blacklist.
_	1873 Sampson Gamgee raised the suggestion that 'everyone should work overtime for the hospitals on a particular annual Saturday afternoon, to be called "Hospital Saturday"'.
_	There are no reports in the literature of these findings having been repeated, however, leading to the suggestion that they resulted from cross-contamination or were possibly artifacts of the analytical technique.
_	The presence of such an unprecedented chemical range of psychoactive compounds, including ones not previously found in nature, in a single plant species has led to the suggestion that some of these findings may have resulted from cross-contamination or were possibly artifacts of the analytical technique.
_	Johnston rejected the suggestion that any agreements made before the protectorate was established could transfer sovereignty to individuals or companies.
_	Among his comments was the suggestion that he intended to explore the cliffhanger of Anarky's parentage left after the cancellation of the "Anarky" series, and that as "Green Arrow" No.51 was being published, he had already written a two-part story for Batman which featured Anarky.
_	The fact that the family included two members named Aristotle leads to the suggestion that the adoptive family had connections to the Lyceum and that Apellicon learned of the books through it.
_	Decipherment of a hieroglyphic text found at Palenque has resulted in the suggestion that Yopaat was associated with mist that forms before rainfall.
_	Both cases, however, show that the merging of rule was not simply a case of annexation where one state is swallowed by another, but rather of unification and almost equal status, though in the case of the British monarchy the suggestion that an emperor is higher in rank than a king was avoided by creating the title "king-emperor" ("queen-empress") instead of "emperor-king" ("empress-queen").
_	Flori and Gillingham nevertheless agree that accounts of bed-sharing do not support the suggestion that Richard had a sexual relationship with King Philip II, as had been suggested by other modern authors.
_	As of February 2010, the sports centre was due to be closed in 2011, and on 22 February 2010 the £10,000 Herne Bay Pier Report was published by Canterbury City Council in association with Humberts Leisure, with the suggestion that the Herne Bay Museum and King's Hall sites be sold for redevelopment, to pay for a new build on top of the remaining pier stub.
_	Appearing on the Diane Rehm Show the same day, congressman Ed Markey (D-MA) responded to the suggestion that an oil industry representative be appointed to the commission by pointing to Republican Reilly's position with Conoco.
_	Cindy White criticized the suggestion that Cathy will break Jim and Pam, calling it a "cheap plow" and that if Cathy and Jim would have an affair, it would cause "serious damage to [Jim's] character", while Myles McNutt felt it would allow Cathy to become an actual character in the series.
_	Gibbs refuted the suggestion that he didn't attack enough, while former managers Roeder and Taylor both considered Gibbs to be an excellent crosser of the ball when he did venture forward.
_	In the UK context, Lord Scarman disagreed with the suggestion that "habeas corpus" protection only extends to British nationals, stating in "Khera v. Secretary of State for the Home Department; Khawaja v. Secretary of State for the Home Department" (""Khawaja"", 1983), that "[e]very person within the jurisdiction enjoys the equal protection of our laws.
_	Andrew Steinmetz, in "The Gaming Table: Its Votaries and Victims", described it at greater length but somewhat confusingly (the results of rolling a 10 are unclear, depending on whether it wins for the bank or is a push, there is house advantage is at best 0, and at worst negative, and the suggestion that it was played at the crucifixion is of course sheer speculation):
_	In an interview with Public Radio International, Maddox offered the suggestion that the misogyny often associated with the genre of fratire had become more acceptable because women are stronger than they've ever been in society, and that singling out women as the only group not okay to lampoon is a sexist act in itself.
_	The shape of the animal's skull does support the suggestion that snakes were burrowers during their ancestry; it is clear that "Dinilysia" was terrestrial.
_	She found Blaine's advice to Kurt "misleading and dangerous", especially the suggestion that targeted children should be held responsible for confronting their attackers and putting themselves at risk of further injury, rather than for protecting themselves.
_	Matheny rebuffed the suggestion that he was a "misspent asset" on the 25-man roster.
_	Nkomo ridiculed the suggestion that he escaped dressed as a woman.
_	“Train Man” wants us to get off our computers and get out of the house; in a country as technocentric as Japan, the suggestion that it may be time to replace the cyber with the real is not just subversive, it’s downright revolutionary."
_	This is in support of the suggestion that the late Pleistocene glacial cycles are not due to the weak 100,000-year eccentricity cycle, but a non-linear response to mainly the 41,000-year obliquity cycle.
_	"Variety" commented that "[m]aking the maid a Latina is certainly realistic but never quite avoids the suggestion that upward mobility is best achieved through marriage into Anglo society".
_	The difficulties of cutting down the equatorial forest for farming have led to the suggestion that the primary expansion was along river valleys, a hypothesis supported by studies of fish names.
_	This correlation leads to the suggestion that segmental duplications are mediators of over twenty-five different genomic disorders as well.
_	At the thing, the god puts forth the suggestion that, in place of , Thor should be dressed as the bride, complete with jewels, women's clothing down to his knees, a bridal head-dress, and the necklace .
_	The Emperor Akbar (1542–1605) commended the work of translating the "Hitopadesha" to his own minister, Abul Fazl, with the suggestion that the poems which often interrupt the narrative should be abridged.
_	In response to the suggestion that people regard the company as "grave dancers", Saccacio responded that "We provide a potential solution to people with a problem.
_	In such writing, simple visual appearance on a page (or any other written layout) remains sufficient to determine poetic line, and this sometimes leads to the suggestion that the work in question is no longer a poem but "chopped up prose".
_	Northern Rhodesian settler politicians were not convinced by the Colonial Office arguments, in particular the suggestion that, since the British government had previously recognised the BSAC claims, it could not challenge them now on the basis of a reinterpretation of terms of the 1923 agreement.
_	This link between depression and a lack of social support and the heritability of aspects of social networks has led to the suggestion that part of depression’s heritability likely stems from heritable differences in one’s ability to form supportive social networks.
_	The humour changed towards innuendo and self-mockery during the Roger Moore films, with his jokes delivered with what media historian James Chapman considered to be a "wink at the audience", with the suggestion that the violence was all a joke.
_	Novels such as "Kipps" and "The History of Mr Polly", which describe lower-middle-class life, led to the suggestion that he was a worthy successor to Charles Dickens, but Wells described a range of social strata and even attempted, in "Tono-Bungay" (1909), a diagnosis of English society as a whole.
_	Shortly after the musical appeared, Nicholas Fraser and Marysa Navarro published a more neutral account of Eva Perón's life, "Evita: The Real Lives of Eva Perón", in which they claim that many of Main's assertions (which had influenced Rice's lyrics) were false, such as the suggestion that Eva had first gone to Buenos Aires as the mistress of a married musician, Agustín Magaldi.
_	Therefore, it is an open question as to whether either IGF-1 or insulin in the mammal may perturb aging, although there is the suggestion that dietary restriction phenomena may be related.
_	According to the book "All About Capcom Head to Head Fighting Games" and "Final Fight" director Akira Nishitani, the characters were originally planned to be female, but were changed to "newhalfs" (a Japanese term for pre-op trans individuals) after the game's release, due to the suggestion that "hitting women was considered rude" in America and the concern that feminist groups would sue.
_	Wells is left with the suggestion that he can perhaps act his way out of the rap.
_	He wrote, "His Majesty's Government do not think it necessary to make any reply to the suggestion that the British navy has been guilty of inhumanity, according to the latest figures available, the number of German sailors rescued from drowning, often in circumstances of great difficulty and peril, amounts to 1,150.
_	The fortress was 20% larger than other fortresses in the Roman province of Britannia built around the same time at York (Eboracum) and Caerleon (Isca Augusta); this has led to the suggestion that the fortress, rather than London (Londinium), was intended to become the capital of the Roman province of Britannia Superior.
_	Alex instinctively rejects the suggestion that he needs to change anything.
_	Critical reception was positive, though there was some criticism of the omission of some figures and events (such as John Pym, the Earl of Bedford, Sir Thomas Fairfax, Sir Denzil Holles, 1st Baron Holles, Edward Hyde, 1st Earl of Clarendon, Colonel Sir John Hutchinson, Henry Ireton and the Bishops' Wars) and the fictionalisation of others (such as the suggestion that Cromwell orchestrated Rainsborough's death, of Rainsborough not Sexby being a close friend of Cromwell's, Sexby's going to Ireland and the losing of his arm and Sexby's assassination attempt on Cromwell).
_	In subsequent years, it was argued there was strong support for the suggestion that some animals (most likely amniotes) have at least simple conscious thoughts and feelings and that the view animals feel pain differently to humans is now a minority view.
_	The design of the font, comprising eight vertical pallisters, hidden since 1512, but now revealed, opens the suggestion that its origin may be Saxon.
_	In 1945, Glenn Seaborg, an American scientist, made the suggestion that the actinide elements, like the lanthanides, were filling an f sub-level.
_	As a result, several other hypotheses about their fates have been proposed, including the suggestion that they were murdered by Henry Stafford, 2nd Duke of Buckingham or Henry VII, among others.
_	There is no substantive evidence to support the suggestion that early childhood experiences, parenting, sexual abuse, or other adverse life events influence sexual orientation.
_	Prescott said he favoured a change to state funding but also said he would not rule out the suggestion that private loans should be capped:
_	These facts have led to the suggestion that his inn functioned as a brothel and that Wilkins was a procurer, or pimp.
_	This argument has been challenged by some historians of science, notably Katharine Park and Robert A. Nye; Monica Green, and Heinz-Jürgen Voss, who reject the suggestion that ancient descriptions show a homogenous model, the one-sex model which then mutated in the 18th century to a two-sex model.
_	The council cancelled the festival again in 2015 for the same reason, with the suggestion that the measure could be permanent, and the festival has not taken place since.
_	This advanced the suggestion that Kerry would pay more attention to domestic concerns; it also encapsulated Kerry's contention that Bush had alienated American allies by his foreign policy.
_	This led to the suggestion that a male choir be formed.
_	Earlier interpretations of the defensive behaviour of "Kentrosaurus" included the suggestion that the animal might have charged to the rear, to run through attackers with its spines, in the way of modern porcupines.
_	He was of the opinion that traditional members of the Kirk, “may not be convinced by some of the plans, particularly the suggestion that there should be bishops.
_	Despite the suggestion that Wayne's 1964 lung cancer and his 1979 stomach cancer resulted from nuclear contamination, he believed his lung cancer to have been a result of his six-pack-a-day cigarette habit.
_	When a minor official informed the crowd that their original demand about quotas had been met, this failed to satisfy the protestors who started developing other demands until a young engineer made the suggestion that they put out a call for general strike the next day.
_	For example, the suggestion that costs soared from $7m to almost $39m may be compared with section 10.1.9 'Early information on costs' which states (in full):
_	It is generally assumed that all reserve heads were originally in similar positions in their respective tombs, though the large number of heads found in burial pits has led to the suggestion that they were instead originally displayed by the entrance of the tomb chamber rather than within the tomb.
_	This led to studies on intrinsic and synthetic taurine peptides, and the suggestion that γ-glutamyltransferase (GGT; γ-glutamyl-transpeptidase) in the brain is responsible for its "in vivo" formation.
_	No notables from Meath are recorded among the slain; leading to the suggestion that, if present, Máel Sechnaill kept himself and his forces out of harm's way.
_	They therefore took up the suggestion that they move to the Chatham Islands where they arrived on 20 February of that year.
_	As the situation progressed concerns were raised about Mirza's capacity, but at first the suggestion that she may lack capacity to make the decision to refuse treatment was rejected and no grounds for a Section under the Mental Health Act were found.
_	Mitchell criticizes the suggestion that price flexibility alone would resolve the demand problem.
_	This is in a fragmentary proverbial saying in the 6th century BCE Aramaic version of the story of Ahiqar in which an onager (wild ass) stoutly rejects the suggestion that it should be bridled.
_	A growing estrangement between Verdi and his parents was perhaps also attributable to Strepponi (the suggestion that this situation was sparked by the birth of a child to Verdi and Strepponi which was given away as a foundling lacks any firm evidence).
_	Wootton questioned the suggestion that early attachment history (as it would now be called) had a lifelong impact.
_	Meanwhile, Chamberlain, smarting from the dismissal of his alliance proposal with Germany, refused the suggestion that Britain withdraw from Samoa in return for compensation elsewhere, remarking dismissively to Eckardstein "Last year we offered you everything.
_	Griffith CJ disposed of the suggestion that the defence power was in some way limited holding "As to the suggested limitation by the context, the words "naval" and "military" are not words of limitation, but rather of extension, showing that the subject matter includes all kinds of warlike operations."
_	He bristles at the suggestion that the endowment of the parish could be transferred to management by the dioceses.
_	The maintenance of only a token military force before the Falklands War, and the suggestion that HMS "Endurance" was to be withdrawn, persuaded Argentina to start a conflict, with the assumption that Britain would not respond and could not easily recapture the islands.
_	In 1933, with Benito Mussolini firmly in control of Italy, "Moscow insisted that the Italian communist leader P. Togliatti withdraw the suggestion that, perhaps, social-democracy was not the primary danger, at least in Italy."
_	The HT "Information Pack" for the Britain Media states that "the suggestion that Hizb ut-Tahrir will be permitted to engage in an armed struggle when the Caliphate re-emerges, is absolutely false",
_	The attack on "blocs of five" with the suggestion that pious General Benjamin Harrison was trying to buy the election enlivened the Democratic campaign and stimulated the nationwide movement to replace ballots printed and distributed by the parties with the secret 'Australian ballot'.
_	The dispute began when Howe suggested that Rivers was offended by the use of the term "black"; Rivers objected strongly to the suggestion that she was racist and accused Howe of having a "chip on his shoulder".
_	Robert Graves, in his novel "I, Claudius", makes the suggestion that this person really was Postumus.
_	Nonetheless, he emerges as the primary father figure in the household; her children adore him and there is the suggestion that Nancy and her sons view Andy as their last link to Judah.
_	In 1997, the Italian economist Giorgio Nebbia, observed that the negative reaction to the "LTG" study came from at least four sources: those who saw the book as a threat to their business or industry; professional economists, who saw "LTG" as an uncredentialed encroachment on their professional perquisites; the Catholic church, which bridled at the suggestion that overpopulation was one of mankind's major problems; finally, the political left, which saw the "LTG" study as a scam by the elites designed to trick workers into believing that a proletarian paradise was a pipe dream.
_	This, in turn, gives rise to the suggestion that a more severe history of head trauma will result in greater deterioration of the brain, cognitive functioning, and mood regulation.
_	She is best known for her work on "constructions": grammatical pairings of form and functions that are related to one another in a systematic network of learned knowledge; "statistical preemption": the idea that competition between grammatical constructions in context can account for the ill-formedness of certain expressions that would otherwise be licensed; the creation and development of the "novel construction-learning paradigm": which is akin to learning novel words with novel meanings; and the suggestion that both statistics (particularly in the form of skewed input) and the functions of constructions play an important role in learning.
_	The regularity of the locations where the mines were detonated under the walls (which generally rest on rock) has led to the suggestion that the Turkish miners may have taken advantage of culverts under the Hellenistic city which lies beneath the medieval city of Rhodes.
_	After a discussion with Segundo about a group of African militants heading towards a village they intend to destroy, Bat resolves the dilemma with the suggestion that, rather than Zookeeper directly instigating a missile strike to kill the soldiers, it could instead damage a bridge so that it would collapse under the weight of the soldiers driving over it.
_	Their criticisms argued that the methods of astrologers were conjectural rather than empirical, and conflicted with orthodox religious views of Islamic scholars through the suggestion that the Will of God can be precisely known and predicted in advance.
_	One of her descriptions of a new plant, which she herself called Fibraurea, was forwarded to Linnaeus with the suggestion that he should call it Coldenella, but Linnaeus refused and called it Helleborus (now Coptis groenlandica).
_	The Iyaelima recognize that bonobos are similar in many ways to humans, and see them as equally intelligent, but have no feeling of kinship with them and are insulted by the suggestion that they are relatives.
_	Parts six, seven and eight continue with the description of the nature of the suffering of the damned concluding with a rebuffal of the suggestion that the souls of Hell would adapt to their existence there-by through tolerance learn the favour of such a place to re-iterate the earlier preference for a suffering that never ceases.
_	But even though his title "an ornament of the original great Bappura (Batpura) lineage" may be explained by the suggestion that his mother was a Bappura princess, the fact that Indravarman acknowledged in January AD 610 or 611 the supremacy of Maharaja Sri-prthivi-vallabha, identified with Pulakeshin II, renders the theory unlikely; because Pulakeshin II could have hardly allowed his inveterate enemy and rival to the throne to be kept in the important position of the viceroy of the Konkan districts.
_	The increased vehicle requirements at Arriva's Warnham (Horsham) garage, which took over three of Tillingbourne's former routes, led to criticism from residents in the area and the suggestion that the site should be closed and operations moved to another location.
_	Joanna Pruess's book "Seduced by Bacon" includes a recipe for "Angels and Devils", with the suggestion that "a little hot red pepper sauce can transform them from heavenly to hellishly hot tasting, or somewhere inbetween."
_	A third, but perhaps less likely origin of the name is the suggestion that the name originated from 'Beann' (otherwise 'beinn'), which means 'top'/'peak', as applied to the names of mountains such as Beinn a' Chaorainn in Lochaber and Britain's highest mountain Ben Nevis (Gaelic: Beinn Nibheis).
_	The name "burning bush" derives from the volatile oils produced by the plant, which can catch fire readily in hot weather, leading to comparisons with the burning bush of the Bible, including the suggestion that this is the plant involved there.
_	Confronted with the suggestion that he had become a socialist, he responded: "Have I become socialist?
_	However, W. F. Tucker notes that the suggestion that Sayf is not reliable is no longer sustainable.
_	The higher proportion of spousal homicides supports the suggestion that abuse of older women is often a continuation of long term spousal abuse against women.
_	Higgins J described the suggestion that the Commonwealth be deprived of the appellate assistance of the very efficient State Courts as an extreme step.
_	Eventually this leads to a major confrontation with his son, and the film ends with the suggestion that Dave has finally accepted his legacy; with his voiceover considering the possibility of his bringing the rest of the tradition-bound Gypsies into the world of 20th Century customs and lifestyles.
_	The relationship between Chow and Su is platonic, as there is the suggestion that they would be degraded if they stooped to the level of their spouses.
_	On the contrary, excavations in the region have uncovered substantial evidence of habitation from the beginning of the first millennium BCE down to Roman times, casting doubt on the suggestion that during Hellenistic times the area was significantly higher than it was at the time of Josephus or that a large hill had been cleared away.
_	The evidence is sufficient to support the suggestion that the initial spread of Maritime Bell Beakers along the Atlantic and into the Mediterranean, using sea routes that had long been in operation, was directly associated with the quest for copper and other rare raw materials.
_	In his official report after the 1936 Olympics, Avery Brundage rejected the suggestion that Stoller and Glickman had been excluded due to their religion.
_	In response to the suggestion that the Bosniak forces in Srebrenica made no adequate attempt to defend the town, the Report of the Secretary-General pursuant to General Assembly resolution 53/35—The Fall of Srebrenica, delivered to the 54th session of the United Nations General Assembly on 15 November 1999 states:
_	In the 1930s, the British developmentalist Ian Suttie put forward the suggestion that the child's need for affection was a primary one, not based on hunger or other physical gratifications.
_	One oft-cited example is the suggestion that the words "I buried Paul" are spoken by McCartney's bandmate John Lennon in the final section of the song "Strawberry Fields Forever".
_	Jacobs dismisses the suggestion that "the Tannaim were influenced by the Roman legal system..." and that "even if the Rabbis were familiar with the Roman law, they might have reacted to it [instead] by preserving the patrilineal principle, holding fast to their own system."
_	The loss of uricase in higher primates parallels the similar loss of the ability to synthesize ascorbic acid, leading to the suggestion that urate may partially substitute for ascorbate in such species.
_	Because places with this name generally do not lie near old Roman roads, the suggestion that the name is derived from "tlak" 'pavement' is unlikely.
_	The full titles of the first two albums lend credence to the suggestion that the three albums are thematically connected.
_	In relation to the suggestion that the case should properly be tried in France, Lord Denning MR stated:
_	Naimbanna had some variants of his name, such as Nemgbana, which may refer to a place called Gbana, with the suggestion that when asked what he was called the king replied "name Gbana".
_	The ending "-ayim" indicates the dual, thus leading to the suggestion that the name "Yerushalayim" refers to the fact that the city initially sat on two hills.
_	Until the 1970s, the "Rights of Men" was typically considered disorganized, incoherent, illogical, and replete with "ad hominem" attacks (such as the suggestion that Burke would have promoted the crucifixion of Christ if he were a Jew).
_	"As any golfer who has watched his partner shank a short approach knows," Justice Stevens wrote, "it would be absurd to accept the suggestion that the resultant four-letter word uttered on the golf course describes sex or excrement and is therefore indecent...
_	The comparatively long limbs and phalanges with opposable 'thumbs' led to the suggestion that "Suminia" was adapted for grasping tree branches in an arboreal lifestyle.
_	In self-selection experiments, lame birds select more drugged feed than non-lame birds leading to the suggestion that leg problems in broilers are painful.
_	With "The Third Meaning" there is the suggestion that the photograph's reality, aside from all the messages it can be loaded with, might constitute an avant-garde value: not a message as such, aimed at the viewer/reader, but another kind of meaning that arises almost accidentally yet without being simply 'the material' or 'the accidental'; this is the eponymous third meaning.
_	Altars dedicated to him were usually small, simple and plain, leading to the suggestion that this god was mainly worshipped by people of low social status.
_	The name is almost certainly derived from the identically named Mga River on which it lies (which in turn is probably of Finno-Ugric origin); the suggestion that it comes from the initials of the owner of the land in the 19th century, Maria Grigorievna Apraksin (a member of the same family for which the Apraksin Dvor in St. Petersburg is named), is extremely unlikely.
_	During a backstage meeting with trombonist Marshall Brown in 1959, Armstrong received the suggestion that he should go to a doctor and receive proper treatment for his lips instead of relying on home remedies, but he didn't get around to doing it until the final years of his life, by which point his health was failing and doctors considered surgery too risky.
_	While mainstream Jewish religious leaders, including the chief rabbis of Israel, rejected the suggestion that killing Palestinians was authorized by the Torah, some extremist religious Jews have defended Goldstein's actions.
_	Pond is offended at the suggestion that his boys are not suitable company for the young ladies of St Swithin's, but he needs to appease Miss Whitchurch to salvage his chances of an appointment to a prestigious all-boys school for which he is in the running, and which depends on his ability to prevent his current post presenting the appearance of a beer garden.
_	Western economic historians have tended to dismiss the suggestion that these developments presaged a capitalist transformation.
_	Immunofluorescence using sera from these patients usually shows a typical staining of the nucleolus of cells, which sparked the suggestion that the antigen recognized by autoantibodies might be important in ribosome synthesis.
_	As for the suggestion that more water might be got in Longendale, this rested on overturning the settled views of an engineer with thirty years' experience in the valley by a last-minute survey lasting under thirty hours by Mr Easton, whose conduct was shameful and scandalous.
_	Wahid then made the suggestion that he may be forced to dissolve the DPR if that happened.
_	In the UK context, Lord Scarman disagreed with the suggestion that "habeas corpus" protection only extends to British nationals, stating in "Khera v. Secretary of State for the Home Department; Khawaja v. Secretary of State for the Home Department" (""Khawaja"", 1983), that "[e]very person within the jurisdiction enjoys the equal protection of our laws.
_	Their indifference was magnified after reading Romani's plea for "the reader's full indulgence" which appeared in the libretto with the suggestion that its faults were not his.
_	Roy Thomas, now a Marvel Comics staff writer in New York City, called his friend with the suggestion that freelance work might exist in the newly resurgent medium.
_	When presented with the suggestion that "Western observers are already likening the SCO to a military organisation that would stand in opposition to NATO", Putin answered that "this kind of comparison is inappropriate in both form and substance".
_	The problems with modelling this system and the proposed planets orbiting several other post-common envelope binaries has led to the suggestion that the eclipse timing variations used to infer the existence of planets has a non-planetary origin.
_	Katherine, Lady Darwin, and her family were very receptive to the idea of their home becoming the nucleus of a new college, and to the suggestion that it should bear the family's name.
_	However, the film's mentions of hunger strikes – and therefore the suggestion that food in South Korean prisons was so abundant that one could go on hunger strike – had the undesired effect of suggesting to the North Koreans that life in the South Korean prisons were not as bad as believed.
_	According to Ian Mobsby, the suggestion that the emerging church is mainly focused on deconstruction and the rejection of current forms of church should itself be rejected.
_	She also suggested that routine arming may become a reality but dismissed the suggestion that this was currently being considered.
_	Hilton has rejected the suggestion that he took conscious inspiration from paintings of dancers and bathers by Cézanne or Matisse, but admitted they were "probably subconsciously" important.
_	Official policy from the Ministry of Finance has traditionally been cautious, resisting the suggestion that unspecified risks should be borne by the Indonesian budget.
_	Both observations strengthen the suggestion that the hilly and lineated unit and the hummocky plains unit are directly related to the formation of Caloris, possibly through the focusing of seismic waves at the antipodal point.
_	The Court dismissed the suggestion that the shift in burden to the accused or the unconventional rules of procedure and evidence created by the Act have any effect on independence.
_	Some eyewitness accounts have led to the suggestion that, after several air raid alerts, the panic run for shelter was caused by a gigantic explosion of noise from the direction of the park.
_	His relationships with the European population were always tainted by the suggestion that he had taken part in cannibal feasts in his early raids with the Māori.
_	Beorhtwulf restarted a Mercian coinage early in his reign, and the extended gap in the 830s has led to the suggestion that Wiglaf's second reign was as a client king of Egbert's, without permission to mint his own coinage.
_	The close association between sodium deprivation and HSD2 neuron activation—and between salt ingestion and HSD2 neuron "in"activation—led to the suggestion that these neurons are important for driving sodium appetite.
_	The discovery of spindle neurons in diverse whale species has led to the suggestion that they are "a possible obligatory neuronal adaptation in very large brains, permitting fast information processing and transfer along highly specific projections and that evolved in relation to emerging social behaviors."
_	The crusaders accepted the suggestion that in lieu of payment they assist the Venetians in the capture of the (Christian) port of Zara in Dalmatia (vassal city of Venice, which had rebelled and placed itself under Hungary's protection in 1186).
_	McCarthy also claimed that while he had been away fighting for his country, La Follette had made huge profits from investments; the suggestion that La Follette had been guilty of war profiteering was deeply damaging.
_	He refused the suggestion that he simply arrest James because this would violate his own declarations and burden his relationship with his wife.
_	These observations have led to the suggestion that long-lasting bistable prionlike proteins play a role in the formation of long-term memory.
_	Flügels supporters felt that their club had essentially been dissolved rather than merged with, so rejected the suggestion that they should start supporting Marinos - who had been their crosstown rivals.
_	As for the suggestion that a water-baby is contrary to nature;
_	He was also opposed to the suggestion that Moldova become a federal state made up of three republics: Moldova, Gagauzia, and Transnistria.
_	A clever notion to pop up in the larger "Pokémon" epic, however, is the suggestion that The Professor (the Pokémon trainers' long-term, reliable guide to all things Pokémon) is actually Sam, now grown up in the present".
_	Alternatively the close association of the objects with depictions of stylised trees has led to the suggestion that it depicts fertilisation.
_	The paper's editor accused PLANS of alarming parents with claims for which there was no evidence, including the suggestion that Waldorf methods were disguised witchcraft teachings.
_	The novel includes many literary tips of the hat to the work of H.P. Lovecraft, including the suggestion that the novel's 'Ancient Enemy' is Lovecraft's god Nyarlathotep, also known as the 'Crawling Chaos'; and the fact that character of the air force specialist in potential contact with non-human intelligence is named 'Captain Arkham' (cf. Lovecraft's invention Arkham). .
_	Ian Carr (who had by then joined the trumpet section) approached Les Carter (who was directing rehearsals) with the suggestion that a friend of his might bring along an arrangement for the band to play through.
_	However, Microsoft rebuffed the suggestion that it was not providing specialized drivers for hybrid systems.
_	This has led to the suggestion that there exists a third non-eclipsing body in the system whose gravitational pull is responsible for these variations.
_	Born in Hounslow, Middlesex, England in 1914, to William John Hartree (1885–1952) and his wife Alice Hartree (née Crow) (1880–1965) as George Frederick Joffre Hartree, he took his stage name from the theatrical knight, Sir Charles Hawtrey, and encouraged the suggestion that he was his son.
_	This discrepancy is sometimes mentioned as "Méchain's error", with the suggestion that the tiny variation in the length of the meridian (not detected for nearly two hundred years) can be attributed to Méchain's calculations.
_	A compromise is reached and then the suggestion that Helen publish the book under the name 'Helene Alexienne DuBois' is broached.
_	Although the suggestion that the bureau eliminate the special coins, on which it lost money, came from Philadelphia Mint Superintendent Adam M. Joyce, and was approved by von Engelken, O'Reilly signed many of the letters to numismatists, and thus was blamed for the change in policy.
_	His speeches and writings, having made him famous, led to the suggestion that he was the author of the "Letters of Junius".
_	In February 1862 it was offered for sale, with the suggestion that it could be re-installed elsewhere as either a pier or a bridge.
_	In "The Guilty", the latter aspect underlines the mother-mother storyline, while the former brings an unease to the routine police scenes through the suggestion that soft-voiced compassion or encouragement of colleagues is something at which DCI Brand has to work.
_	According to Smyth, the fact the marriage between Sitric and Æthelstan's sister occurred at the old Mercian royal centre at Tamworth reinforces the suggestion that this marriage was supposed to perform as a similar function to the one in 918.
_	Susan and her brother Peter only discover Narnia after their younger siblings have already been there: their sister Lucy has been there twice but was not believed, and Edmund reaches Narnia once at the same time as Lucy, but spitefully denies it to support the suggestion that she made it up.
_	The household evades these questions, except for a final one when Lady Mary reacts with shock – "Oh no, impossible..." – to the suggestion that Crichton might become butler at her married household.
_	Commenting on the suggestion that he is "The Fixer" referred to in the song's title, Vedder stated, "My answer is, aren't we all?
_	Holyday told the "Toronto Sun" that there was the will in council to step up action against panhandlers, including squeegee kids; the proposition was mocked by some media, given the previous efforts, and the suggestion that the homeless would have to pay fines.
_	Another source of confusion is the suggestion that the company was reconstituted in 2000 as Tiburon Interactive Publishing, Inc.
_	On this proviso, the show wound up at the King's Head Theatre in Islington, London, where artistic director Adam Spreadbury-Maher made the suggestion that Tom Crowley adapt the script.
_	This was the suggestion that the queen had a son by Oxford, which first appears in an appendix to "The Life Story of Edward De Vere".
_	It seems that many of his works have a common artist, which has led to the suggestion that he illustrated his manuscripts personally, although this cannot be verified; possibly he is represented by the figure of an anonymous monk kneeling at the feet of St Benedict in a miniature from the "Eadwig Gospels."
_	Spitzer was able to use the notoriety surrounding Richter's announcement to gain the attention of the US Atomic Energy Commission (AEC) with the suggestion that the basic idea of controlled fusion was feasible.
_	In 2014, Beggs approached Roger King — a fellow member of Steve Hackett's band for several years — with the suggestion that King would produce Beggs' new band; King took up the offer.
_	The film ends with the suggestion that the "Burrower" attacks will continue.
_	Studies emerging since the 1940s refuted the suggestion that stereotype contents cannot be changed at will.
_	In Bathke's equation on "attractiveness level" of Weapons-grade nuclear material, the Figure of Merit(FOM) the calculation generates, returns the suggestion that Sodium Fast Breeder Reactors are unlikely to reach the desired level of proliferation resistance, while Molten Salt breeder reactors are more likely to do so.
_	The response to Brando's comments was exacerbated by an interview he gave in 1996, in which he repeated the suggestion that Hollywood was controlled by Jews.
_	At the suggestion that she should postpone her stage ambitions to be a normal child, she replies, "I've had a normal childhood.
_	She also ridiculed the suggestion that she was a spy and suggested that Pierre Trudeau would have been better able to manage the scandal than Pearson.
_	In 2004, an article in the BMJ examined the evidence for and against the suggestion that angiotensin receptor blockers may increase the risk of myocardial infarction (heart attack).
_	This has led to the suggestion that the poem was originally intended to laud the prince's exploits in Spain, but after his death was extended to cover his whole career.
_	These results led to the suggestion that Phobos might contain a substantial reservoir of ice.
_	The poetic versions have been cited as an example of orientalism with the suggestion that it screens anxieties about the cultural identity of the English people.
_	She argued that despite this the ideas of multiple non-"g" intelligences are very attractive to many due to the suggestion that everyone can be smart in some way.
_	The theological knowledge in the ode to God suggests training, supporting the suggestion that he was a friar.
_	One of these is the suggestion that Haitian witchdoctors can keep "zombies" in a state of pharmacologically induced trance for many years.
_	The term derives from the vaguely cuboid shape of many electronic devices (and their detachable power supplies) and the suggestion that the device can function only as a lifeless, square object, paperweight or doorstop.
_	Moore made the suggestion that the final work should be carved in white stone, to contrast with the dark windows of the building behind, rather than casting it in bronze as originally intended.
_	A controversial area of research into tax havens is the suggestion that tax havens actually promote global economic growth by solving perceived issues in the tax regimes of higher-taxed nations (e.g. the above discussion on the U.S. "worldwide" tax system as an example).
_	After Kelly was following some moves that Captain Stone was practicing, Cadet Major Rigby made the suggestion that they could incorporate the moves into a routine for regionals.
_	A century of research by archaeologists and Egyptologists has arguably found no evidence that can be directly related to the Exodus narrative of an Egyptian captivity and the escape and travels through the wilderness, leading to the suggestion that Iron Age Israel—the kingdoms of Judah and Israel—has its origins in Canaan, not in Egypt:
_	He also raised the suggestion that more ethnic minorities could be stopped simply because "they commit more crime".
_	Joe Anderson reacted angrily to the suggestion that he was putting football before his civic duty, and responded "Let me be clear to both EFC and Knowsley Council, you will not silence me on speaking out and representing what I believe to be in the best interests of the people of Liverpool, that is what I am elected to do."
_	The rl1908 reference transcribes Sean Fagan’s 2002 interview with Souths captain-coach Jack Rayner fuelling the suggestion that dubious refereeing decisions cost the Rabbitohs the 1952 title and prevented Souths from stringing together all six premierships of 1950 to 1955.
_	However, other Jacobites' correspondence suggests that some ill-treatment of Clementina by the Hays did occur, though the suggestion that Lady Inverness and James Stuart were having an affair, with Lord Inverness turning a blind eye, is less likely to be a fact than merely a rumour begun by Mar and the English government.
_	Mitzeee raises the suggestion that maybe Warren isn't over Louise and he should his peace with her and then the two of them can start their life together.
_	He made the suggestion that species may have both "improved" and "degenerated" after dispersing from a center of creation.
_	Martin himself was pleased with the suggestion that they adapt it as an HBO series, saying that he "never imagined it anywhere else".
_	But now the analogy is deeper and mathematically and physically supported: it comes from the suggestion that chaotic planetary orbits on very long time scales have preferred sizes, the roots of which go to fractal space-time and generalized Newtonian equation of motion which assumes the form of the quantum Schrödinger equation.
_	Smith later rejected the suggestion that Beadle could have had anything significant to tell them on his return, saying that "the only thing that Beadle could have done when he got back was to have talked us out of insisting on our questions".
_	Navone, who is an American, said the findings (of the Pew survey) were meaningless without a clearer definition of religion, and he strongly contested the suggestion that Italian people were not spiritual.
_	He also disproved the suggestion that landowners, labourers and farmers should unite under a single banner, instead he preferred cooperation when necessary.
_	He encouraged the suggestion that he was the earlier actor's son.
_	Though the paper contained eighteen proposals and forty-one individual reforms, the suggestion that carriage service providers (CSPs) be required to retain information on the way Australians use the internet and mobile phones elicited much consternation and comment from the community.
_	Evan Wolfson, who in 1996 ran the National Freedom to Marry Coalition, while an attorney at Lambda Legal, has also criticized the suggestion that DOMA was stopping something worse: "That's complete nonsense.
_	In reply to the suggestion that Henry Lincoln was also referred to in the book, since he has medical problems resulting in a severe limp, like the character of Leigh Teabing, Brown stated he was unaware of Lincoln's illness and the correspondence was a coincidence.
_	In 1993, reacting to the suggestion that the name indicated the corps remained associated with Academie Musicale, the corps changed its name to Les Stentors.
_	Stohrer the following day to forward the suggestion that the Duke and Duchess be detained for two weeks, but not let it appear that the suggestion came from him.
_	There have been some highly questionable claims made about Royston Cave and its history, including the suggestion that its Templar builders may, in effect, have been early Freemasons.
_	Potterley and his wife both remain disturbed by the death of their baby daughter in a house fire many years earlier, and there is the suggestion that he is subconsciously trying to exonerate the Carthaginians of child sacrifice as a way of exonerating himself of the possibility that "he" accidentally started the fire which killed his daughter.
_	This hypothesis appears supported by the type of animals in these rains: small and light, usually aquatic, and by the suggestion that the rain of animals is often preceded by a storm.
_	which rejects the suggestion that Harriet was Wellington's mistress.
_	The composer turned down the suggestion that she should conduct the performances herself, declining to make public appearances, but her sister made her debut, very successfully, in this production.
_	Its scarcity and the fact that it is the only one of its genus found in nightjars support the suggestion that it has crossed over from close relatives that normally infect owls.
_	The Browne Review was subsequently published in October 2010, and contained the suggestion that the government should remove outright the existing cap of £3,290 on tuition fees.
_	12("S")-HpETE and 12("S")-HETE induce itching responses when injected into the skin of mice; this has led to the suggestion that these metabolites contribute to the itching (i.e. clinical pruritus) which accompanies such conditions as atopic dermatitis, contact dermatitis, urticaria, chronic renal failure, and cholestasis.
_	This has led to the suggestion that, in higher primates, uric acid has taken over some of the functions of ascorbate.
_	It also makes the suggestion that global Jewry is the driving force behind both global capitalism and communism.
_	Sigmundur Davíð Gunnlaugsson, the leader of the Progressive Party, strongly objected to the suggestion that his party would assist the government in this matter, however.
_	It is hinted in the "Curse of the Judas Chalice" that Judson may be the original founder of the Library, although the suggestion that he might be over 2000 years old is something he finds "insulting".
_	The 13th-century discovery of a tomb thought to be that of St Osana has led to the suggestion that Osana was the daughter of Aldfrith, although this view is not widely held by modern historians.
_	Tiger is reluctant at first, but relents at the suggestion that a new persona might win back Miss Kitty.
_	Misconceptions about early versions of the device include the suggestion that the first working hemp decorticator was invented in the United States in 1935.
_	Seward's instructions to Adams included the suggestion that it should be made clear to Britain that a nation with widely scattered possessions, as well as a homeland that included Scotland and Ireland, should be very wary of "set[ting] a dangerous precedent."
_	PolitiFact finds the suggestion that "voter fraud is rampant" false, giving it its "Pants on Fire" rating.
_	Barry declined the suggestion that the two ships cruise together, they parted after clearing the capes.
_	This led to the capture of Sidi Rezegh and the suggestion that the 70th Division should begin its attack on 21 November, before the Axis armour had been defeated.
_	In a keynote speech at the Pontifical Gregorian University in February 2016, Cardinal Parolin defended celibacy as a "gift" that must be received and nurtured with "joyful perseverance" and criticized the suggestion that the shortage of vocations be addressed by modifying the requirement of priestly celibacy.
_	This uncertainty has led to the suggestion that it might have been located much further inland at Gourana.
_	That was even colder, having fewer wind breaks from the stands, with the suggestion that hot showers were only installed in 1996 at the expense of FC Barcelona, after third-tier Numancia had knocked three other top flight clubs out of the Spanish Cup that year.
_	The tensions of this period are revealed by the suggestion that in 1282 the men of Bromfield needed the King’s protection if they were to pass without molestation to and from the markets of Chester and Oswestry and Edward I himself is reported to have briefly stayed at Wrexham during his expedition to suppress the revolt of Madoc Ap Llewellyn in 1294.
_	Amenhotep refused, offended by the suggestion that an Egyptian princess be submitted for that ridicule of being married off to a foreign leader."
_	There is a great similarity between the principles of Kito Ryu and Kyushin Ryu and this has led to the suggestion that Kyushin Ryu had been derived (at least in part) from Kito Ryu.
_	Subsequent work led to the suggestion that the saccule was the end organ excited.
_	But there was “no genuine basis at all for the suggestion that the participants mocked the victims of the Holocaust”.
_	After this incident, there were headlines about possible conflicts of interest between his business interests and his mother's political visits; including the suggestion that he had received millions of pounds in commission in relation to the Al-Yamamah arms deal (see Career section below).
_	It is not clear what led to its abandonment, leading to the suggestion that Piperheugh was essentially an artisan encampment of gypsies or tinkers rather than a village of permanent dwellings, although it was significant enough to appear on Blaeu's map in the 17th century.
_	The earliest king authenticated through archaeological evidence is Enmebaragesi of Kish (c. 26th century BC), whose name is also mentioned in the Gilgamesh epic—leading to the suggestion that Gilgamesh himself might have been a historical king of Uruk.
_	By 70 AD the Romans had founded the fortress and town of Deva Victrix, now Chester, according to ancient cartographer Ptolemy, The fortress was 20% larger than other fortresses in Britannia built around the same time at York (Eboracum) and Caerleon (Isca Augusta); this has led to the suggestion that the fortress, rather than London (Londinium), was intended to become the capital of the Roman province of Britannia Superior.
_	His father Erik reacted coldly to the suggestion that he should abandon his religion, while his mother Thjóðhildr quickly became a Christian and built a church called Thjóðhild's Church.
_	In response to those claims, CEU issued a statement rejecting the suggestion that it was cheating and in breach of Hungarian regulations.
_	Mosley used her suffragette past to counter the criticism that National Socialism was anti-feminist saying that her prospective candidacy "killed for all time the suggestion that National Socialism proposed putting British women back in the home".
_	McDowell develops an account of that which Kant called the "spontaneity" of our judgement in perceptual experience, while trying to avoid the suggestion that the resulting account has any connection with idealism.
_	Mackintosh rejected the suggestion that he should remain with the invalid, insisting that it was his duty to ensure that every depot was laid.
_	The absence of spin-selective recombination of these radical pairs on the nanosecond to microsecond timescales seems to be incompatible with the suggestion that magnetoreception by cryptochromes is based on the forward light reaction.
_	He had annulled Lucrezia's marriage to Giovanni Sforza, who had responded to the suggestion that he was impotent with the unsubstantiated counter-claim that Alexander and Cesare indulged in incestuous relations with Lucrezia, in 1497.
_	The American historian Homer H. Dubs offered the suggestion that a lost legion from the Roman army of Crassus that fought at Carrhae encountered and even fought a Chinese army of the Han Dynasty in the region:
_	The film ends with a conversation between Crocker-Harris and Taplow, and the suggestion that Crocker-Harris will complete his translation of the "Agamemnon".
_	In 1973, Rossall approached Leander with the suggestion that the band record some material without Glitter.
_	Kane did not stay long, although is credited for the suggestion that they should change the name to Megadeth, knowing that Mustaine had written a song of the same name.
_	Its elongation led to the suggestion that Eunomia may be a binary object, but this has been refuted.
_	Because the theme involves a conspiracy within the Church over the life of Jesus and the suggestion that the Church has hidden the facts of his marriage, there has been a strong reaction against the novel and much material published examining and refuting its claims.
_	As a scared Bugs flees with the bear chasing him, Elmer calls out the suggestion that Bugs play dead.
_	Similar proteins in frog, mouse and zebrafish function as negative regulators of TGF-beta, which has led to the suggestion that the encoded protein may function to limit the signaling range of the TGF-beta family during early embryogenesis.
_	President Franklin D. Roosevelt agreed, making the suggestion that the title be revived.
_	This leads to the suggestion that many miRNA have regulatory sequences involved in cancer.
_	The song deals with the suggestion that the listener ""go up the river"", which is ultimately shown to be a metaphor as the river is ""the river of love, the river of life"" and the listener is told that ""One day you'll see the source of the river"".
_	It was later revealed that Bakulin was serving a previously unannounced doping suspension, casting the suggestion that Kaniskina was doing the same.
_	President Maskhadov's unconditional offer for peace talks with Russia was dismissed, and Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov compared such calls with the suggestion that Europe should conduct such talks with the former al-Qaeda leader Osama bin Laden.
_	Castlehill is the former site of a castle several hundred years ago, there is the suggestion that this may have been the site of the manor house that Robert the Bruce built in 1326 and died in 1329, however it seems more likely such a manor house would have been closer to the River Leven.
_	The proposal included the suggestion that "no pass or πολλ man may row after one year has elapsed from the date of him having passed his final examination.
_	Related to the latter reading is the suggestion that the poem addresses the relationship of a poet to the reader, who is enjoined to match the poet's imaginative response to the world.
_	This proposal was based solely on the suggestion that the aforementioned granite cone was directly related to the Pyramid of Elephantine.
_	These findings have led to the suggestion that olfactory testing may help in the diagnosis of several different neurodegenerative diseases.
_	He concluded that "the suggestion that members of the age group between 18 and 21 are threatened with unconstitutional discrimination, or that any hypothetical discrimination is likely to be affected by lowering the voting age, is little short of fanciful".
_	It has been said that these other groups are attracted by the mystique of the outlaw image while objecting to the suggestion that they are outlaws.
_	Frey and Martill rejected the suggestion that "Arambourgiania" was a "nomen dubium" or identical to "Quetzalcoatlus" and affirmed its validity in relation to "Titanopteryx".
_	In a 2013 article for "Nature", Dyke and five colleagues reported that while the “[d]iscovery of feathered theropod dinosaurs in China during the past two decades have prompted dramatic revisions of our ideas of the evolution of birds and the origins of flight — including the suggestion that the iconic fossil Archaeopteryx might have lain some distance from the ancestry of modern birds,” a new fossil discovery “restores Archaeopteryx as an early diverging avialan.
_	“The Debate on Democratization in the Broader Middle East”, which he co-authored with Mensur Akgun, Meliha Altunisik and Ayse Kadioglu, asserted that the suggestion that democracy can be created out of turmoil and chaos is fallacious.
_	However, the suggestion that he had exaggerated the extent of his injuries to avoid his duties on the exhibition tour caused a media storm.
_	The President's supporters and cabinet ministers, led by his wife Turai Yar'Adua, resisted the suggestion that the Vice-President should take over power whilst the President was incapacitated even though this was what the Nigerian constitution prescribed, Fani-Kayode added his voice to that of President Obasanjo, President Shehu Shagari, General Yakubu Gowon, Ernest Shonekan and other former heads of government, former cabinet ministers, former legislators, leading opposition figures and leading members of the ruling PDP party by publicly calling for the resignation of President Yaradua and for the transference of power to Vice-President Goodluck Jonathan at that critical time.
_	Lacking any experience as a painter, his decision to effectively quit comics in 1969 led him to "an artist friend who earned his living as a painter", from whom Steranko obtained an "hour-long lecture", and the suggestion that he work in acrylics rather than oils, for the sake of speed.
_	Surface evidence that a cross-trench was placed into the heart of the barrow has resulted in the suggestion that another excavation was carried out at some point, likely conducted by a member of the Wildman family who owned the Chilham Castle estate between 1792 and 1861.
_	Side-crimped pasties gave rise to the suggestion that the miner might have eaten the pasty holding the thick edge of pastry, which was later discarded, thereby ensuring that his dirty fingers (possibly including traces of arsenic) did not touch food or his mouth.
_	However, two of Cox's wives dismissed the suggestion that the love was more than platonic.
_	Vinson rejected the suggestion that the statute had not been narrowly drawn.
_	One longstanding theory is the suggestion that the Earls of Morton and Moray were behind the murder, directing Bothwell's actions, to forward Moray's ambitions.
_	Highland Chief started 11/4 favourite with Galliard, ridden by Archer, next in the betting on 9/2: he may have started favourite but for "ominous rumours", including the suggestion that Archer had place a wager on Highland Chief, who was trained by his brother Charley.
_	Despite the lack of solid conclusion on the issue, the suggestion that violent games cause youth violence together with the clear popularity of violent video game genres such as the first-person shooter have led some game designers to publish non-violent alternatives.
_	Finally there is the suggestion that Herodotus records this battle and Egyptian campaign in his writings about the pharaoh Necho, that are included in his famous Histories:
_	From the start of March 2008, rumors that Obama was born in Kenya before being flown to Hawaii were spread on conservative websites, with the suggestion that this would disqualify Obama from the presidency.
_	This has led to the suggestion that the song would be sung by smugglers.
_	Jácome de Bruges disappeared mysteriously, with the suggestion that he was murdered, thrown overboard while at sea, during a voyage.
_	Rutland's authorship was defended by the suggestion that the plots of the plays reflected details of his life, an argument that was to become important to claims for candidates proposed in the 20th century.
_	Lee elaborated on that claim in a 2007 interview, responding to the suggestion that the series title did not necessarily seem bad:
_	Although a tunnel, either under the inlet or as part of one of the suggested alternative schemes, has previously been dismissed, the suggestion that a tunnel might be built at some time in the future has not been totally dismissed.
_	A 2011 "Rolling Stone" article attributed to anthropologist David Graeber the suggestion that the Occupy movement represented the 99%.
_	However, he writes, he eventually embraced the idea, being very fond of his brain and liking the suggestion that it could live on.
_	Later that year whilst helping to promote the film with its producer Ryan Page at the Sheffield Documentary Festival, conversation led to the suggestion that O'Donnell should write an entire album of music composed and recorded in the same way as the song "Another Year Away".
_	He noted that Handke received the Order of the Serbian Knight from Milošević for his propaganda services during a visit to Belgrade, and that his "previous idiocies include the suggestion that Sarajevo's Muslims regularly massacred themselves and then blamed the Serbs; and his denial of the genocide carried out by Serbs at Srebrenica."
_	An inscription in Cornwall which – it has been suggested – includes the names of Conomor and Tristan has led to the suggestion that Conomor is the origin of the figure of King Mark in the Tristan legend.
_	The lack of sufficiently luminous WN stars and the discovery of apparent LBV supernova progenitors has also prompted the suggestion that certain types of LBVs explode as a supernova without evolving further.
_	The email included comments from an anonymous reviewer, which included the suggestion that male authors be added in order to improve the quality of the science and serve as a means of ensuring that incorrect interpretations of the data are not included.
_	After excerpts from the play were broadcast on BBC television, Paul McCartney criticized it for being biased against him and in favour of Lennon, objecting in particular to the suggestion that it was McCartney and not Lennon that was responsible for the break-up of The Beatles.
_	The novel ends with the suggestion that the painting is a window on another world where time stands still.
_	This is a radical step away from the suggestion that music means a series of overlapping transformations, even though in the Norton Lectures Bernstein mentions this program and claims his opinions about the meaning of music remained the same.
_	One notable execution included Canberra's Bradley Clyde inside a rodeo corral being stormed by a runaway bull with the suggestion that he is about to singlehandedly bring the bull to ground.
_	However, the suggestion that the number of positions that can be used for sex is essentially limitless also exists.
_	"The idea which will be presented at Monday's meeting will be the suggestion that chief be elected and a company organized, each member of which is to be assigned some special duty, thus making every move at a fire count."
_	This claim was later disputed, with the suggestion that Strawberry Bank near Huthwaite was the highest natural point, with others highlighting Newtonwood Lane, on the western edge of the county, as another possible contender.
_	Space travel also figures prominently in Voltaire's "Micromégas" (1752), which is also notable for the suggestion that people of other worlds may be in some ways more advanced than those of earth.
_	This has led to the suggestion that it was founded by one of the bishops, and the one candidate seems to be Roger de Clinton, a powerful magnate who was a mainstay of King Stephen's regime during the Anarchy of the mid-12th century and who died in 1148.
_	Nalewaja's campaign focused on the suggestion that Dorgan had served in the United States Congress for nearly 20 years, and had accomplished relatively little.
_	Similarities between the orbits of and have led to the suggestion that they were a binary object disrupted near aphelion during an encounter with a distant object.
_	Sylvester countered with the suggestion that they make a new episode of the original TV series.
_	Larger old items are often referred to as boat anchors with the suggestion that they are obsolete and of such low value that this is the only use left for them.
_	Crawford disproves the suggestion that the tune is based on a hornpipe from the burlesque "Golden Pippin" of c.1771, noting the chronology makes it likely that the hornpipe was based on the hymn tune, or at least derived from the shared source "Guardian angels".
_	At the First Quebec Conference in August 1943, Knox surprised King with the suggestion that King relinquish his CNO title to Horne.
_	A later story by Roy Thomas in "What If?" #4 (Aug. 1977), planted the suggestion that the Vision was actually made from a second android created by Horton, named Adam II.
_	Because places with this name generally do not lie near old Roman roads, the suggestion that the name is derived from "tlak" 'pavement' is unlikely.
_	This allowed two different depictions of the truth about her in British propaganda, which were a reply to enemy attempts to justify her shooting, including the suggestion that Cavell, during her interrogation, had given information that incriminated others.
_	The following month, he announced that the Social Democratic Party members would leave the G17 Plus parliamentary group to sit as independents, although he rejected the suggestion that this was due to a rift between the parties.
_	She also states that "the suggestion that the carvings are from a churchyard cross is difficult to substantiate".
_	Harvey initially balked at the suggestion that in-transit dining facilities be added to all AT&SF trains operating west of Kansas City.
_	Andrew Hunter has pointed to Robinson as being largely responsible for the suggestion that there was more to Thomson's death than accidental drowning.
_	While African American culture is a significant influence on its Canadian counterpart, many African and Caribbean Canadians reject the suggestion that their own culture is not distinctive.
_	Addressing the suggestion that the book was a "roman à clef", Drury wrote a very sharply worded preface which was only published in the new edition:
_	He is the one responsible for making the suggestion that Alpha 5 be used in "delivering the message of evil", as Rita Repulsa had called it, in "The Wedding".
_	In "Jerry Springer – The Opera" (BBC, 2005), the suggestion that the Christ character might be gay was found more controversial than the chant describing the Devil as "cunting, cunting, cunting, cunting cunt".
_	Ziegler later rejected as "absurd and patently false" the suggestion that he had compared Israelis to Nazis, saying that he was actually quoting an Israeli scholar when he made the remark.
_	She also details encounters with spirit lights, with the suggestion that these mysterious lights may be the result of phosphorus rising from swampland, or the work of mischievous local boys trying to scare other residents.
_	Their lieutenant objected to the suggestion that his men had caused the fire through drunkenness or carelessness and blamed a dirty, blocked fireplace in the hall; however, several witnesses later said the fireplace had not been the source of the fire.
_	On the other hand, the suggestion that self-deceivers typically successfully execute their self-deceptive strategies without knowing what they are up to may seem absurd; for an agent's effective execution of his plans seems generally to depend on his cognizance of them and their goals.
_	"As the writer of the lyric of the song 'God's Country', I am outraged by the suggestion that somehow I am connected with, believe in, or am sympathetic with Communist or totalitarian philosophy", he wrote to the House Un-American Activities Committee in 1950.
_	While Mogoeng's recognition of the pressing need for a female appointment was widely celebrated, the suggestion that he needed over a year to find one was said to be "patronising" and unconvincing.
_	However, in one newspaper account, there is the suggestion that his version of the account differed.
_	It is somewhat unlike other sandpipers in appearance, which has led to the suggestion that it should be placed into a monotypic genus "Crocethia".
_	It has been found at approximately 10% among the Mari people of the Volga-Ural region, leading to the suggestion that this region might be the source of the V among the Saami.
_	The assumption that the site was strictly cultic in purpose and not inhabited has also been challenged by the suggestion that the structures served as large communal houses, "similar in some ways to the large plank houses of the Northwest Coast of North America with their impressive house posts and totem poles."
_	Giuseppe’s brother made the suggestion that he "clean up the family mess" and marry an orphan instead of the daughter of separated parents.
_	Similarly, portrayals of any East German as "uncivilized", through extreme violence or delinquency, or the suggestion that East Germans might suffer from problems such as alcoholism or suicidal depression were also to be excluded.
_	However, in a pre-concert public interview at Lincoln Center, in May 2012, Previn laughed at the suggestion that he is related to Mahler.
_	Examples of this include the author's suggestion of the presence of a Mayan society in modern-day Peru, rather than in Central America, as well as the suggestion that the manuscript was written in 600 BC in the jungles of Peru, despite the fact that it is written in Aramaic.
_	Her devotion to him is so great that even the suggestion that he's come to harm is enough to send her into reactions that range from a mere evil stare (like when Mino Nenki makes a bad joke about it) to a feral rage (when Shougen refuses to tell her if Yashamaru is alive or not, and she brutally stabs him to death).
_	Many refused and were so offended by the suggestion that they removed him from office and replaced him with a new leader, the Ottawa chief Turkey Foot.
_	The presence of iron-sulfur clusters in some shell proteins, presumably in the central pore, has led to the suggestion that they can serve as a conduit through which electrons can be shuttled across the shell.
_	The few exceptions recorded, such as during emergencies and for the illegitimate sons of legionaries, do not warrant the suggestion that the rule was routinely ignored.
_	Richard Oram puts forward the suggestion that it was during this period, rather than earlier, that David granted Walter fitz
_	Although his older brother drove in the team's first season, the suggestion that Emerson might drive for the team was always in the air and only a year later he cancelled contract discussions with his then team McLaren at a very late stage and signed with Fittipaldi.
_	The pygmies ... are very low in the human scale, and the suggestion that Benga should be in a school instead of a cage ignores the high probability that school would be a place ... from which he could draw no advantage whatever.
_	In 1956 Ormerod Greenwood, working on a translation of "Gawain", made the suggestion that the author of "Pearl" and "Gawain" was one of the Masseys of Sale.
_	There is no student representation on the Browne Review: the youngest member of the review panel Rajay Naik rejected the suggestion that he is a representative of student interests, stating "I don't feel at all as if I represent only the student constituency, just as the other members aren't looking out for special interests".
_	His idea of supervising research was said to involve the suggestion that a proof of the transcendence of the Euler–Mascheroni constant was probably worth a doctorate.
_	Although she was not a target of the investigation and was not implicated in the probe, the suggestion that she must have or should have known that her political colleagues were corrupt, has been cited as one of the chief causes for her electoral loss.
_	The murders are complicated by sets of mysterious footprints appearing in the snow which seem to have been made in an impossible way and by the suggestion that the paralyzed mother has been seen walking in the halls.
_	Several anonymous press releases sent to media and local businesses in July and August 1998 led to the suggestion that the Marree Man was created by people from the United States.
_	She is overcome with the suggestion that Aber has proposed to her.
_	Rockwell was contacted by writer Elliott Caplin, brother of cartoonist Al Capp, with the suggestion that the three of them should make a daily comic strip together, with Caplin and his brother writing and Rockwell drawing.
_	To the suggestion that "Monuments…" is "a very Smashing Pumpkins-like album", Corgan responded, "I think people are hearing an emotional quality that reminds them of something in the past.
_	Mark Matthews of Caplin & Drysdale stated, "When clients who have lived abroad for years come in, concerned about whether they have an obligation under FATCA, they sometimes react to the suggestion that their kids might be American the way one might react to a horrible medical diagnosis."
_	Anthony Birley mentions the suggestion that Hadrian may have later felt remorse for this act, thus explaining why Hadrian adopted Nigrinus' son-in-law, Ceionius Commodus (who later, following his adoption of Marcus Aurelius, took the name Lucius Aelius).
_	The rare Old French variant spelling "luef" for Modern French "lieu" ('place') supports the suggestion that a final of the Old French word was in certain environments perceived as an .
_	The discovery of the sister species "Dakotaraptor", which has a larger flexor tubercle than most other dromaeosaurs, also supports the suggestion that "Dromaeosaurus" would have used its sickle claw less than other dromaeosaurids.
_	The presence of open-rooted upper canines in thylacosmilids has led to the suggestion that proborhyaenids are closely related to, or even ancestral to, this group, but this is still controversial.
_	To the suggestion that each Form is a thought existing in a soul, thus maintaining the unity of the Form, Parmenides replies that a thought must be a thought of something that is a Form.
_	The manual gives the suggestion that prisoners be deprived of sleep and food, and made to maintain rigid positions, such as standing at attention for long periods.
_	Because testosterone in general is important for sexual differentiation, this view offers an alternative to the suggestion that male homosexuality is genetic.
_	This came out of the suggestion that the 7-inch R.M.L. has neither sufficient range accuracy nor rapidity of fire for effective defence.
_	She visits Bodie and convinces him to give Namond a package to work, threatening to tell Wee-Bey with the suggestion that he might arrange something unpleasant for Bodie if he refuses.
_	Using the words "Madagascar" and "Constantinople" on them respectively as trigger words to put them in a trance, the two are given the suggestion that they are newlyweds who are madly in love before being reawakened.
_	Even the suggestion that data science is sexy was a paraphrased reference to Dr. Hans Rosling's 2011 BBC documentary quote, "Statistics, is now the sexiest subject around" .<nowiki>
_	Usually, the swift second movement after the Allemande is named either Courante (French style) or Corrente (Italian style), but in all these suites the second movements are named Courante, according to the Bach catalog listing, which supports the suggestion that these suites are "French".
_	Prominent among these rumours was the suggestion that Corbet had been murdered by his disaffected crew: historian William James wrote in 1827 that "There are many who will insist, that Captain Corbett's "[sic]" death-wound was inflicted by one of his own people." although he goes on to point out the unlikelihood of Corbet being shot by one of his own cannon.
_	Buttressing the suggestion that this is a royal symbol is an Edomite seal impression bearing the name of the Edomite king Qosgabri, which contains a very similar sphinx with an identical tail.#7
_	Subud literature rejects the suggestion that Subud is a religion, but rather describes it as "spiritual dancing."
_	Since the first known book printed under Spanish ecclesiastical authority was Keng Yong's printing probably between 1590 and 1592, the suggestion that the Spanish introduced printing to the Philippines has no basis in historical fact.
_	The tie-in publication "The Complete Book of Captain Scarlet", by Chris Bentley, refutes the suggestion that the Mysterons featured in the series are a type of energy being, stating explicitly that they are "sentient computers" forming a group consciousness, possessing the ability to manipulate matter.
_	A 2006 report from MIT researchers countered the suggestion that students acquire critical skills and competencies independently by interacting with popular culture, noting three continuing trends that suggest the need for policy and pedagogical interventions:"
_	The gap of some twenty years between the date of the Last Supper and the writing of I Corinthians and the even longer period before the Gospels were written have led to doubts as to their historical reliability and the suggestion that they reflect the concerns and situation of the early Christians at the time of writing rather than reporting objectively events which occurred decades before.
_	Archives, has made the suggestion that the so-called Propaganda Movement
_	The Report gave the suggestion that there are traces of a pillared temple in strata under the Mosque.
_	This observation has led to the suggestion that BSDL produced by lactating mammary gland and present within milk, may compensate for the low levels of other TG-digesting enzymes and aid newborns in lipid absorption.
_	Cameron and Hicks dispute the suggestion that he ran Turkish baths at Brighton attributing this to a confusion of Mahomed's father Frederick with his uncle, Arthur.
_	Evidence that persistent PCP use and abuse in humans results in lasting deficits beyond the period of treatment has led to the suggestion that this regime in rodents may be a more accurate model of schizophrenia than acute administration.
_	"What really does annoy me is the suggestion that I gave [the second penalty] to even things up.
_	The involvement of attention in such a vast array of cognitive processes has led to the suggestion that attentional deficit may act as an underlying factor in the range of cognitive deficits observed in patients experiencing post-traumatic amnesia (PTA).
_	The Arden edition of Shakespeare makes the suggestion that the name "Arden" comes from a combination of the classical region of Arcadia and the biblical garden of Eden, as there is a strong interplay of classical and Christian belief systems and philosophies within the play.
_	There have been various conspiracy theories proposed about the bombings, including the suggestion that the bombers were 'patsies', based on claims about timings of the trains and the train from Luton, supposed explosions underneath the carriages, and allegations of the faking of the one time-stamped and dated photograph of the bombers at Luton station.
_	These concepts were derived and stimulated through the suggestion that complexity leads to stability in food webs, such as increasing the number of trophic levels in more species rich ecosystems.
_	When presented with the suggestion that "Western observers are already likening the SCO to a military organization that would stand in opposition to NATO", Putin answered that "this kind of comparison is inappropriate in both form and substance".
_	Many older writers repeated the suggestion that it might come from the Gaelic word "lighe", meaning deluge, flood, or spate.
_	This observation supported the suggestion that AGS was an inflammatory disease, as did the later finding of increased levels of the inflammatory marker neopterin in CSF, and the demonstration that more than 90% of individuals with a genetic diagnosis of AGS, tested at any age, demonstrate an upregulation of interferon-induced gene transcripts - a so-called interferon signature.
_	David Bianculli, while previewing the episode for the "New York Daily News", called the plot "clever" and the suggestion that another alien race had defeated the Borg an "interesting possible springboard for future episodes".
_	However, some are critical of the suggestion that a Gaeltacht, whether neo or traditional, can be an area without residents who speak Irish.
_	Watt said that it might well be proper for Opas to leave the bar as his emotional involvement with the case had certainly distorted the facts, leading as it had to the suggestion that Ryan might not have fired the shot that killed Hodson.
_	Swindle, speaking after Tobin's 2006 conviction for the murder of Angelika Kluk, said that Tobin's age and the method of the murder sparked the suggestion that he may be a serial killer, as did interviews with Tobin.
_	Received by John Boyden with the suggestion that his brand would benefit from an injection of medieval music, the outcome was a Christmas album entitled "A Tapestry of Early Christmas Carols".
_	The [NiFe] and [NiFeSe] hydrogenases have remarkably similar structures, leading to the suggestion that one sulfur on a Fe-S cluster was replaced by a selenium atom, but these hydrogenases differ in catalytic reactivity and sensitivity to enzyme inhibitors.
_	The idea that Miraclo was addictive, combined with the suggestion that Tyler himself was addicted to crime fighting, made Hourman one of the superhero world's first cautionary tales.
_	Among them are the suggestion that Weadick first saw a similar event at the 1922 Gleichen Stampede, that he saw impromptu races between chuckwagon drivers as a kid growing up, or that cooks from two chuckwagons who had completed serving a barbecue at the 1919 Victory Stampede in Calgary then raced to the grandstand's exit, inspiring the event.
_	The direct benefits hypothesis (where the female obtains some immediate benefit for copulating with the male, food in this case) may explain why courtship feeding has evolved; however, this theory has recently been disputed with the suggestion that the rate of courtship feeding is a way for females to determine the quality of their mate through the handicap principle.
_	The similarity and the lack of evidence for sympatry with either "S. fuscicollis" or the black-mantled tamarin ("Saguinus nigricollis") lead to the suggestion that "S. tripartitus" should be reconsidered as a subspecies of "S. fuscicollis" rather than a species on its own; alternatively, other subspecies of "S. fuscicollis" should be raised in taxonomic rank.
_	It countered the US's argument with the suggestion that it was the US servicemen giving STIs to the prostitutes not the other way around.
_	The United Nations Observer Mission in Georgia's investigation into the incident found that the attackers were located on the Georgian side of the ceasefire line, about 100m from the buses, and that although hard evidence of the attackers' identities was lacking, inconsistencies merited further investigation, particularly the suggestion that the filming of the attack seemed anticipatory.
_	Monnerie’s ideas include the suggestion that many high strangeness ufo experiences involve a waking dream, sometimes triggered by an external stimulus of the sort responsible for IFO reports that creatively works up and produces an experiential narrative involving projections of mental images and materials that the experiencer holds personally and/or culturally significant.
_	This has led to the suggestion that kin selection may be a driving force in the evolution of eusociality, as individuals could provide cooperative care that establishes a favorable benefit to cost ratio (rB-c >
_	RBSS works to counter the suggestion that citizens of Raqqa welcomed the presence of ISIL.
_	The size difference between sexes has led to the suggestion that the Rodrigues solitaire was not monogamous as stated by Leguat, and that this deeply religious man attributed the trait to the bird for moral reasons.
_	From these two men came the suggestion that the district be named after the birthplace of the first mailman, Mr. Peter Hoy of Jedburgh, Scotland.
_	And the suggestion that we can gloss over them is wrong."
_	Jacobs dismisses the suggestion that "the Tannaim were influenced by the Roman legal system..." and that "even if the Rabbis were familiar with the Roman law, they might have reacted to it [instead] by preserving the patrilineal principle, holding fast to their own system."
_	In response to the suggestion that it was simply ironic or humorous, Hart argued that "a website referring to women as wenches and slags isn’t simply the harmless ‘banter’ the writers want us to believe".
_	Roy wrote widely on the 2005 civil unrest in France, rebutting the suggestion that the violence was religiously inspired.
_	The second request had included the suggestion that one person, with a gagging order in place, could represent the entire press corps, while joining the walk-through.
_	From Guido, for instance, the Pearl Poet and other English writers get the suggestion that Aeneas's safe departure from Troy with his possessions and family was a reward for treason, for which he was chastised by Hecuba.
_	A 2013 journal article explores a violent historical background behind the epistle and offers the suggestion that it was indeed written by James, the brother of Jesus, and it was written before AD 62, the year he was killed.
_	In 1848 the instructions to army medical officers in India included the suggestion that every soldier should be provided two "cholera belts".
_	Davis's claim has been criticized, particularly the suggestion that Haitian witch doctors can keep "zombies" in a state of pharmacologically induced trance for many years.
_	The new central station was to have the same basic plans as the suggestion that won the contest in 1946, though slightly modified, among other things keeping the old Oslo Ø building.
_	It was reported that donors might withhold some £100m in anger at the suggestion that the College might give in to the campaign, and the chair of the Commons Select Committee on Education said that she should consider her position, as the College had allowed the issue to spiral out of control.
_	The pottery of Phylakopi III:i is heavily influenced by Minoan forms and motifs, which, along with Minoan influence in architecture, has led to the suggestion that Phylakopi was under the political control of the Minoans.
_	The construction of a megaron, a feature of the Mycenaean palaces of the Greek mainland, has led to the suggestion that the Mycenaeans conquered and administered the settlement.
_	Finally, Iacobucci asserts that the suggestion that there is precedent for an "incremental approach" as a misrepresentation of the Court's view in "McKinney".
_	(There is no historical evidence for the suggestion that the name was an abbreviation of "Picture Magazine".)
_	He was not happy with the suggestion that he was in talks with Reading and suggested that his integrity was being questioned.
_	Legends spread in the years after Matilda's death, including the suggestion that her first husband, Henry, had not died but had in fact secretly become a hermit – making Matilda's second marriage illegitimate – and a tale that Matilda had an affair with Stephen, resulting in the conception of Henry II.
_	Mead is mentioned in many stanzas, sometimes with the suggestion that it is linked to their deaths.
_	The actions, statements, opinions, and recommendations outlined below have led to the suggestion that Internet access itself is or should become a civil or perhaps a human right.
_	At the suggestion that he include the phrase "pupil of Haydn", Beethoven bristled.
_	No evidence has been found to support the suggestion that the villa was somehow associated with Saint Illtud who founded the church at Llantwit Major in the 6th century.
_	Discrete categories of objects such as faces, body parts, tools, animals and buildings have been associated with preferential activation in specialised areas of the cerebral cortex, leading to the suggestion that they may be produced separately in discrete neural regions.
_	A notable aspect of the book is the bringing into contrast of the refinements of the medieval Islamic civilisation, which had been adopted by the Outremer noblemen, with the comparatively stark and crude European living conditions of the time, and the suggestion that the returning Crusaders brought Eastern standards of luxury and culture to the West.
_	A popular myth arose, modified to allude to the Hippolytus–Phaedra legend, with the suggestion that Constantine killed Crispus and Fausta for their immoralities; the largely fictional "Passion of Artemius" explicitly makes this connection.
_	It was heavily criticised for its extremely high cost estimates and absurdly long construction timeframe, with the suggestion that this meant the government had never intended the project to go ahead.
_	Buchanan recalled that Linn had given the band £10,000–£20,000 to make the record, but rejected the suggestion that the company had asked the band to make a record in a particular style that would show off the company's products in the best light, saying, "It was great because they left us to it.
_	Among these are references to a number of bureaucratic organisations including the VUE Commission and the Bird Facilities Industries (a parody of the British Film Institute which produced the film), the history of manned flight from Daedalus with the suggestion that birds may be responsible for the VUE (and that the film may thus be seen as a sequel to Hitchcock's "The Birds"), complex debates over the location of the epicentre of the VUE, and repeated references to Tulse Luper.
_	In the absence of any hard evidence, numerous theories arose —including rumours of sabotage (compounded by the later disappearance of two other aircraft also belonging to British South American Airways); speculation that the flight might have been blown up to destroy diplomatic documents being carried by passenger Paul Simpson; or even the suggestion that "Star Dust" might have been taken or destroyed by a UFO (an idea fuelled by unresolved questions about the flight's final Morse code message).
_	The fact that the unit's first surviving record (c. 125) attests a "Cohors I Dacorum" (without the "Ælia" title), and that its commander at the time, Marcus Cludius Severus, held the rank of "praefectus", has led to the suggestion that it was originally a "quingenaria" regiment (480-strong, divided into 6 "centuriae") and that it acquired its "Ælia" title when it was upgraded to "milliaria" status in 127.
_	However the trial judge did not accept this defence saying the suggestion that Galloway was guilty of "treason", "in Saddam's pay", and being "Saddam's little helper" caused him to conclude "the newspaper was not neutral but both embraced the allegations with relish and fervour and went on to embellish them".
_	But the suggestion that the position is 'recent' is baseless.
_	Atco distributed promos with a blank label and the suggestion that it was an English group whose name started with B. Many DJs thought it was a new Beatles song and played the song heavily.
_	This correlation, together with the differences in colour, support further the suggestion that the currently observed classical objects belong to at least two different overlapping populations, with different physical properties and orbital history.
_	The book uses politically incorrect language and, as with much of Milligan's writing, makes use of national and racial stereotypes however Milligan dismissed the suggestion that this was itself racist.
_	Following, Bishop Nicholas' 'coming out', he "received high-level support from the most senior official in the Anglican communion" as the Secretary General, Dr Josiah Idowu-Fearon, said that "the Anglican Communion has never made sexual orientation a condition of eligibility to hold office within the church and I reject the suggestion that it has".
_	According to Hanley's son Liam, his father laughed at the suggestion that "Boy" was autobiographical.
_	Another example of rumour was the suggestion that there were issues with the 'unshielded' power supply in the monitor affecting an optional hard drive that could be installed at the back of the base unit and further that this would be solved by taping tin foil or aluminum foil over the back of the base unit or the bottom of the monitor to shield the hard drive.
_	Interviewed on the Radio 4 "Today" programme, he rejected the suggestion that fracking was highly unpopular but when challenged was unable to name a single village which supported it.
_	He made the suggestion that species may have both "improved" and "degenerated" after dispersing from a center of creation.
_	If confirmed, the suggestion that it could be a single volcano would make the Tamu Massif the largest known volcano on Earth, dwarfing the current record-holder, Mauna Loa on the Hawaiian Islands.
_	He's also perplexed by the reference to "the poor cat in the adage", having no clue what cat appears in what adage, and is totally defeated by the suggestion that the "receipt of reason shall be a limbec only".
_	However, the suggestion that one and another will always equal two require an innate idea, as that would be a suggestion of things unwitnessed.
_	He was to the last an ardent opponent of the union (taking the opposite position to his father); he resigned his post at the port on 25 January 1799 so as not to be tainted by it or by the suggestion that his actions were motivated by a desire to retain it.
_	The edits following his analysis of the edits during 2009 and 2010, represented "a complete dismissal of the suggestion that the cylinder, or Cyrus' actions, represent concern for human rights or any kind of enlightened intent," in stark contrast to Cyrus' own reputation (among the people of Babylon) as written in the Old Testament.
_	The story was embellished with the suggestion that a secret tunnel connected the island to the inn, but no evidence of any tunnel has ever been found.
_	However, the PA's most notable policy point is the suggestion that Black Economic Empowerment be changed from a model that benefits selected black elite individuals to one that will benefit all registered voters from previously disadvantaged backgrounds.
_	IOC also rejected the suggestion that 'neutral' athletes could compete outside of national selection.
_	Wrong’s insights, which made this previously relatively neglected disease well-known, have prompted the suggestion that the disease should more properly be termed ‘Dent-Wrong’ disease.
_	While Anastas Mikoyan and Vyacheslav Molotov later claimed that Bukharin was never tortured and his letters from prison do not give the suggestion that he was tortured, it is also known that his interrogators were instructed with the order: "beating permitted".
_	However, in an interview with Giovanni Schiavo, the letter writer apparently attributed the suggestion that the name was Pecci to Cardinal Gibbons.
_	The Seminole were opposed to any such move, and especially to the suggestion that they join their Creek relations.
_	However, Downing Street's spokesman strongly denied the suggestion that Alexander was trying to distance Britain from US foreign policy and show that Britain would not necessarily, in Tony Blair's words, stand "shoulder to shoulder" with George W. Bush over future military interventions.
_	The presence of eye shades, blocking glare from over head, validates the suggestion that (at least some) trilobites were diurnal and not nocturnal,
_	Furthermore, Young questions how the constrained spatiality of the feminine body affects women's lives as a whole; she concludes with the suggestion that the lack of confidence women have about their physical abilities has resulted in their lack of confidence to be successful in cognitive or leadership abilities.
_	After Posthumus repents, she continues to point out the immorality of his actions, and resents the suggestion that she should accept her husband back unconditionally, but in the end accepts that "I must go home and make the best of it, as other women must."
_	Arguments adduced include the lack of an explicit dedication to Raymond, the evidence that substantial portions of book 1 were complete by mid-1259 (suggesting that Thomas started work on the book as early as 1257), and the suggestion that the work makes no effort to address tenets of Islam specifically.
_	However, the suggestion that the population now known as "T. s. tetrataenia" be referred to as "T. s. infernalis" and the current species "T. s. infernalis" be included with "T. s. concinnus" was denied by the International Commission on Zoological Nomenclature (ICZN) in 2000, and a neotype for T.s. infernalis was designated to conserve the traditional subspecies taxonomy.
_	In subsequent years, it was argued there was strong support for the suggestion that some animals (most likely amniotes) have at least simple conscious thoughts and feelings and that the view animals feel pain differently to humans is now a minority view.
_	An early incarnation of the lipid hypothesis which focused on hypercholesterolemia lead to the suggestion that mortality from CHD might be reduced by controlling dietary input of cholesterol.
_	The Court of Appeal's focus on the suggestion that residents have an entitlement or right to representation rather than on the purpose behind the statute has been described as embracing the "Fisher" approach and as a departure from the interpretive approach to constitutional interpretation espoused in section 9A of the Interpretation Act read with Article 2(9) of the Constitution.
_	He dismissed the suggestion that his candidacy would result in another LePage victory, stating that he wouldn't run if he didn't think he could win.
_	Among Local Group galaxies, only Leo A has a younger mean age, leading to the suggestion that delayed star formation could be correlated with galaxy isolation.
_	He worked out the calculations based on astronomical references, finding some errors in Colebrooke and came up with the suggestion that it could be either around 1181 or 1229 BC.
_	The hypotheses that the spermaceti organ is involved in buoyancy manipulation has been challenged by many authors, with the following points raised as problematic: the change in density that could be achieved by manipulation of spermaceti oil temperature would likely have a negligible impact on the animal’s overall buoyancy; the anatomical features that would be needed for heat exchange with the spermaceti organ don’t appear to be present; a mechanism of temperature regulation would necessitate high physical exertion while at great depth, which deep-diving animals tend to avoid; sperm whales appear to be highly active during dives, countering the suggestion that buoyancy manipulation would be advantageous because of its benefit in remaining motionless while diving; and the evolution of the spermaceti organ with buoyancy as a selective pressure would be very difficult and is unlikely due to the fact that the organ wouldn’t have any impact on buoyancy until it became extremely large in proportion to the body.
_	He said that there had been "no meaningful discussions" concerning the suggestion that the hedge funds which own 80% of the bank's equity were looking at buying up the Co-operative Group’s remaining 20% holding.
_	It stated, for example, that the suggestion that the "C. Bertelsmann Verlag" mounted resistance against National Socialism was clearly not accurate.
_	A chapel at St Dominick in Cornwall was dedicated to him, though the suggestion that Landrake was named after him has been deemed "impossible" [Lapidge].
_	Predictions from the 2006 time-frame expected "retail" grid parity for solar in the 2016 to 2020 era, but due to rapid downward pricing changes, more recent calculations have forced dramatic reductions in time scale, and the suggestion that solar has already reached grid parity in a wide variety of locations.
_	One of the important results was the corroboration of the species rank of "M. telona" and the suggestion that the taxon "punica" (type locality: Lambessa, Algeria) may represent a separate species from both "M. telona" and "M. phoebe".
_	Mac is outraged by the suggestion that Joe work for WIN, insisting that the boy is too young.
_	Torrens protested strongly at the suggestion that he was unfit for office, but in the event he died suddenly at his country house, Derrynoid Lodge, just after the spring assizes in 1856.
_	It was far from Warhol to remain unimpressed with the social depth of Sedgwick's background nor with her radiant beauty and she received the suggestion that, with her friend Chuck Wein, she might call in at The Factory, where he always was, his already famed working art studio.
_	Darvill (1996) dismisses as "folklore" the suggestion that the horse had been fashioned in the Anglo-Saxon period, more particularly during Alfred's reign: there is no evidence to support this.
_	The high specialization seems an extreme and unnecessary version of a bite-and-retreat version of the throat-shear, but the suggestion that machairodont species became more specialized to hunt one prey species is usually considered acceptable so long as the misconception that the machairodont hunted 'only' that species is taken.
_	Tantalizing him with the suggestion that she might cut him free him so he can escape arrest, trial, she muses that the knife she is holding in her hand may not be real, before calling in Cameron to take him away.
_	Despite the number of important posts that he held during his career, Sandwich's incompetence and corruption inspired the suggestion that his epitaph should read: "Seldom has any man held so many offices and accomplished so little."
_	Johnson insists that he is motivated by "love and compassion for Mormons", and that while he "[might] plead guilty to being against Mormon"ism"", he finds the suggestion that he is anti-"Mormon" "both offensive and inaccurate."
_	Despite the suggestion that his best position is centre-back, he often fills in at right-back.
_	Keyes replied, "I have to say I'm appalled by the suggestion that we retreat into some kind of Fortress America, and forget who we are.
_	The narrative ends with the suggestion that the "psychic warriors" are now back in business working for the U.S. military again, possibly in support of assassinations.
_	It has been found at a frequency of approximately 10% among the Maris of the Volga-Ural region, leading to the suggestion that this region might be the source of the V among the Saami.
_	He makes the suggestion that their father should be identified with a "M.Plotius Paulus qui et Zosimus", whose tombstone was recovered at Rome.
_	Although admitting that the BBC had "got it wrong", the organisation's Head of Newsgathering, Fran Unsworth, largely rejected the suggestion that Donald's race played a part in the lack of reportage, instead claiming it was mostly a product of "Scottish blindness".
_	This has led to the suggestion that rongorongo must be a recent creation, perhaps inspired by petroglyph designs or retaining individual petroglyphs as logograms (Macri 1995), but not old enough to have been incorporated into the petroglyphic tradition.
_	The novel was returned with the suggestion that she "spice up" and expand the story.
_	Shirley had originally been asked to fetch an item from the room, leading to the suggestion that May "waited until she thought Shirley was on her way to the storeroom.
_	Early modern scholarship tended to accept the Biblical and Greco-Roman accounts of child sacrifice at face value, although there were early suggestions that the biblical account might refer to a symbolic practice, among them an essay by John Selden of 1617 with the suggestion that the phrase "h'byr b'sh lmlk" "making to pass over the fire to Molek" might have entailed a "februation" (purification ritual) rather than human sacrifice.
_	This has led to the suggestion that the college was inspired by madrasas he saw on his travels, although this has been disputed, particularly as, unlike madrasas, the early Paris colleges did not teach.
_	There is an old coaching inn on the Epsom Road previously called the "Sanford Arms", which may derive from "Sand Ford", adding weight to the suggestion that the first part of "Guildford" and its many historic predecessors may refer to the very distinctive golden sand showing on the banks of the River Wey where it cuts through the sandy outcrop just south of the town.
_	Historians have drawn upon contemporary perceptions to explore the suggestion that Henry was homosexual.
_	He further argues that the suggestion that the Sumerians introduced a calendar which made agriculture viable ignored the fact that agriculture had already existed in the area for over a thousand years, saying that "the book is full of statements which only confirm O'Brien's ignorance of our current knowledge of prehistory."
_	Furthering this suggestively post-racial agenda, Herta's and Robert's consideration of the possibility of adoption serves as a subtle push that reasserts the suggestion that racism was confined to the Nazi era, and as such, a thing of the past.
_	The full titles of the first two albums lend credence to the suggestion that the three albums are thematically connected.
_	When Moon examined the suggestion that gaseous thermal diffusion be the method of choice to the MAUD committee, there was no agreement to move forward with it.
_	Some discussion occurred over whether the shroud was really necessary—in the Second World War, many old aircraft guns that did not have the tubing were issued to antiaircraft units of the British Home Guard and to British airfields, and others were used on vehicle mounts in the Western Desert; all were found to function properly without it, which led to the suggestion that Lewis had insisted on the cooling arrangement largely to show that his design was different from Maclean's earlier prototypes.
_	The ISU approved the suggestion that the 1932 Olympic speed skating competitions should be held as packstyle races, and Americans won all four gold medals.
_	The distribution of the stones around the site has led to the suggestion that the monument is actually part of a stone circle.
_	There is still less plausibility in the suggestion that the Kirghiz, who first became known as a people conquered by that Xiongnu and then re-emerged associated with other Turkic peoples in the 6th century, should have had Mongol style suffixes attached to all the various forms of their name that were transcribed into Chinese up to the 9th century.
_	Although acknowledging the suggestion that the bombs had been planted on Donaghy's body, Widgery decided that although he had been searched or examined by at least four people, "I think that on a balance of probabilities the bombs were in Donaghy's pockets throughout."
_	They noted that the condition lacked much attention despite being so common and indicated that despite the suggestion that keratoacanthoma was histologically malignant, they believed the lesion was clinically benign.
_	A key component to making sense of all of this is to simply recognize that all these issues in social evolution merely serve to support the suggestion that how one considers the nature of history will impact the interpretation and conclusions drawn about history.
_	I see no genuine basis at all for the suggestion that the participants mocked the victims of the Holocaust."
_	The attack on "blocks of five" with the suggestion that pious General Harrison was trying to buy the election did enliven the Democratic campaign, and it stimulated the nationwide movement to replace ballots printed and distributed by the parties with secret ballots.
_	Milkovich filed suit, alleging that the suggestion that he had lied had defamed him.
_	The group authored a letter to V.I. officials that some of its members found objectionable because it included the suggestion that some government officials were homosexual.
_	A genetic study in 2012 found clear differences between various populations of the Cuvier's dwarf caiman (Pantanal; Madeira River basin; Rio Negro basin) and these are apparently isolated from each others, leading to the suggestion that it may be a cryptic species complex.
_	These valuable items, all of which were imported goods created elsewhere in Europe, are rarely found in conjunction with other items, such as earthenware, bones, or stone heaps, which has led to the suggestion that they were not placed into the water with elaborate ritual or ceremony.
_	A full proposal for the decimalisation of sterling was then tabled in the House of Commons in June 1855, by William Brown, MP for Lancashire Southern, with the suggestion that the pound sterling be divided into one thousand parts, each called a "mil", or alternatively a farthing, as the pound was then equivalent to 960 farthings which could easily be rounded up to one thousand farthings in the new system.
_	The variety is currently thought to be lost, both in England and Ireland, but the Gloucestershire Orchard Trust has recently explored the suggestion that the old local variety 'Hen's Turd' may in fact be the 'Coccagee'.
_	In turn Gould said to "The New York Times" that the suggestion that he had interfered with the investigation "preposterous."
_	It is granted most commonly upon the suggestion that a party, who is to do something before a judge or in a court, is too weak to travel.
_	The bridge's name, given by Lord Byron as a translation from the Italian "Ponte dei sospiri" in the 19th century, comes from the suggestion that prisoners would sigh at their final view of beautiful Venice through the window before being taken down to their cells.
_	The land would otherwise have been logged; he rescued it via his purchase and donated it to the Audubon Society of Western Pennsylvania (ASWP) with the suggestion that it be turned into a nature reserve.
_	On one hand, some researchers believe that kleptomania is merely theft and dispute the suggestion that there are psychological mechanisms involved, while others observe kleptomania as part of a substance-related addiction.
_	Although he used the comparison to counter the suggestion that the statue was idolatrous, some Christians angrily protested his remarks, and Wade sent Karim to deliver an apology to Theodore Adrien Sarr, the Archbishop of Dakar.
_	These correspondences have led to the suggestion that the split between them occurred in the last common ancestor of the two daughters.
_	Coupled with this was the suggestion that the Music Director was a monkey called Barry, and featured an ad campaign where on-air talent were subjected to his mood.
_	In 2016, Vahnke established an official YouTube page titled Rodentia Productions and began issuing unreleased material with the suggestion that it would be made available for purchase.
_	Speaking during a debate with Open Europe’s Lorraine Mullally on Irish radio Newstalk, Europe Minister Dick Roche claimed the suggestion that Nicolas Sarkozy was reported to have said there should be a second referendum was "complete nonsense".
_	McGuinn also supported the suggestion that some band members had held back their best material, although he added "I don't think I was guilty of that.
_	Among these events presented is the suggestion that, as a young man, Number 6 caused a fatal car accident due to speeding.
_	The possibility of quantitative analysis of memes using neuroimaging tools and the suggestion that such studies have already been done was given by McNamara (2011).
_	However, the relatively low degrees of mutual intelligibility between some nonadjacent Ojibwe dialects led to the suggestion that Ojibwe "...could be said to consist of several languages...".
_	Regarding coverage of a loyalist band filmed playing tunes outside a Catholic church, McCausland said, "If someone was intending to be provocative or inflammatory which is the suggestion that is being made, it wasn't really very provocative...
_	The theme of the film is absorption in the obsessions, joys, and addictions of life, and there are many common threads between vignettes, such as the Tesla coil, medical knowledge, the suggestion that coffee and cigarettes don't make for a healthy meal (generally lunch), cousins, The Lees (Cinqué and Joie, and a mention of Spike Lee), delirium, miscommunication, musicians, the similarities between musicianship and medical skill, industrial music, acknowledged fame, and the idea of drinking coffee before sleeping in order to have fast dreams.
_	Lurie also refutes the suggestion that the song was written by songwriter Stephen Homner, and eventually sold to Elliot Lurie after Lurie expressed interest in the song.
_	Wilkinson offers the suggestion that the structure may be a tomb erected in honor of one of the Romanized kings of Armenia of the late 2nd century.
_	In Adams’ case, the court did not ignore the suggestion that he had hastened death and, as Devlin makes clear, he needed to clarify for the jury, and incidentally the medical profession, the extent to which the law allowed the orthodox doctor to go in easing the passing of the dying.
_	Coquín suggests that they not return, and Gutierre is infuriated at the suggestion that they betray the prison warden.
_	The novel diverges in many ways from the TV series and carries the suggestion that after abdicating the ex-King would go into politics and seek to be elected Prime Minister.
_	The excavations revealing a structure built after 1250 but which must have ceased to exist before 1275, along with the documentary evidence for the presence of the Friars de Ordine Martyrum supports the suggestion that this was the original Friary.
_	However, Eady did not accept this defence, saying the suggestion that Galloway was guilty of "treason", "in Saddam's pay" and of being "Saddam's little helper" caused him to conclude "the newspaper was not neutral but both embraced the allegations with relish and fervour and went on to embellish them".
_	He leaves Jennie an audio message, but she responds with the suggestion that he forget about her.
_	This has led to the suggestion that when the building was rebuilt in the 1760s, the south wall of the nave was moved further south to enlarge the building.
_	More likely is the suggestion that the "Awntyr of Gawane" represents "The Awntyrs off Arthure", an Arthurian poem in a rhymed alliterative stanza similar to "Swete Susan", which has several variants in multiple manuscripts.
_	Sometimes, the dogs chase the creature into a swamp and then disappear, with the suggestion that they were lured into the swamp to be killed.
_	As late as 1944 the magazine published articles such as "A Reply to Screamers" by Fred Eastman (Feb 16, 1944 204-6) which admonished the suggestion that there was a moral obligation for the United States to aid in the plight of European Jews being murdered during the Holocaust.
_	Such people are "morally" offended by the suggestion that they should treat someone who is not kin as if he were a brother, or a nigger as if he were white, or a queer as if he were normal, or an infidel as if she were a believer.
_	They are offended by the suggestion that they treat people whom they do not think of as human as if they were human.
_	Criticism of Bridbury's work have focused around his use of primary research material and the suggestion that he has been excessively optimistic in his interpretation of the quality of daily life during the medieval period.
_	Don, he comes to Rachel with the suggestion that they run away together to Los Angeles.
_	He returned to England, resuming his position as curate at Chipping Barnet in 1761, and began work on a book, publishing the lunar-distance method of longitude calculation and providing tables to facilitate its use in 1763 in "The British Mariner's Guide", which included the suggestion that to facilitate the finding of longitude at sea, lunar distances should be calculated beforehand for each year and published in a form accessible to navigators.
_	Patients with Schizophrenia have less frequent state changes than healthy patients, and this result has led to the suggestion that the disease is related to patients being stuck in certain brain states where the brain is unable to respond quickly to different queues.
_	A 1996 television segment from the CBC's archives features an explanation of what a website is, and the suggestion that "the internet website [was] simply another way" to facilitate public discourse among the Canadian population.
_	He was subsequently charged with mail fraud, with the suggestion that he had failed to pay for works from de Kooning and Degas.
_	Montesini's relations also mocked the suggestion that he held a title.
_	Richard Oram puts forward the suggestion that it was during this period that David granted Walter fitz
_	When Henry Frank, a Jewish opponent, accused him of anti-Semitism, La Guardia rejected the suggestion that he publicly disclose that his mother was Jewish as "self-serving".
_	Even the suggestion that a person wore the "copper collar" created pandemonium from the crowd.
_	Habitat differences and the broad overlap in distribution of the two subspecies in peninsular Florida have prompted the suggestion that they may warrant recognition as distinct species.
_	Pittsburgh Steelers owner Art Rooney dismissed the suggestion that the Steelers were "America's Team."
_	Uexküll first approached the Nobel Foundation with the suggestion that it establish two new awards, one for ecology and one relevant to the lives of the poor majority of the world's population.
_	His residence in the street has led to the suggestion that the nearby workhouse was probably the inspiration for Oliver Twist.
_	The argument relies on the 604 date for the battle found in the "Anglo-Saxon Chronicle" as well as the suggestion that a passage in Bede that specifically exculpates Augustine, which appears in the Latin but not in the early English translation of the text, was a later addition aimed at distancing the churchman from the violence he predicted.
_	The un-redacted portion of the document ends with the suggestion that substantial increases in Soviet Civil defense food stockpiles might be an early indicator that Nuclear Winter was beginning to influence Soviet upper echelon thinking.
_	This has led to the suggestion that athletes be withheld from exertion for a minimum of four weeks from the onset of illness.
_	According to a footnote in Green 1951, the suggestion that the notion of regularity be applied to semigroups was first made by David Rees.
_	A different kind of reverse causation lies in the suggestion that impending war could destroy or decrease democracy, because the preparation for war might include political restrictions, which may be the cause for the findings of democratic peace.
_	These new discoveries have prompted the suggestion that the animals may not be as rare as once thought.
_	But the Court had consistently rejected the suggestion that the Constitution required jury sentencing.
_	It was generally held at the time that they were a front for the Kaiser's money, which carried the suggestion that the Empire's tallest building had been built by its greatest rival.
_	The battle site was previously thought to be somewhere in the vicinity of Dunnichen in Angus, but reappraisal of the scant documentary evidence along with the reappraisal of Fortriu as being north of the Grampian Mountains has led to the suggestion that Dunachton is the true location.
_	Commenting on the suggestion that Apple Color Emoji could be the most significant font thus far released in the 21st century, font expert Stephen Coles said the idea was "an interesting one and [it] may prove to be true."
_	In agricultural areas the highest densities are found in Lucerne and this observation lead to the suggestion that Lucerne could be grown next to cotton as a trap crop for mirids.
_	Other editorial changes were made to the Atrahasis text in Gilgamesh to lessen the suggestion that the gods may have experienced human needs.
_	why we need it" released in 1981, civil defense countermeasures were presented as analogous to seat belts, and that the suggestion that knowing what steps to take in the "slight" possibility that a nuclear explosion occurs in your region, keeps such calamities high on the public mind, is "like saying people who wear seat belts are expecting to have more crashes than those who do not", and as with a seat belt, there is never a suggestion that if the countermeasure were implemented, it would save everyone.
_	When presented with the suggestion that "Western observers are already likening the SCO to a military organisation that would stand in opposition to NATO", Putin answered that "this kind of comparison is inappropriate in both form and substance".
_	This led to the suggestion that new memories are fragile in nature but as time passes they become solidified.
_	In subsequent years, it was argued there was strong support for the suggestion that some animals (most likely amniotes) have at least simple conscious thoughts and feelings and that the view animals feel pain differently to humans is now a minority view.
_	The committee made reform recommendations, including the suggestion that the police department adopt a civil service system.
_	Other news articles have criticized TIGHAR as seizing on unlikely possibilities as circumstantial evidence; for example, an article criticized the suggestion that a can of freckle ointment found on Nikumaroro might have been Earhart's, when the Electra was "virtually a flying gas station" with little room for amenities, as Earhart and Noonan carried extra gas tanks in every scrap of available space.
_	Laboratory simulations have led to the suggestion that enough organic material exists on Titan to start a chemical evolution analogous to what is thought to have started life on Earth.
_	Detailed study of genitalia however, subsequently led to the suggestion that they were nearer to the Acrididae, the short-horned grasshoppers.
_	According to this explanation, Krúdy misidentified three Soviet TB-3 bombers as German He 111s, but the suggestion that this identification was "hushed up" represented post-war Communist propaganda.
_	He further rejected the suggestion that the government's good intention (it was "for their own good") should have any bearing on the reasoning despite McLachlin's claim otherwise.
_	Criticism of free association is generally not on the clinical evidence, but the clinical data and the suggestion that they might be a patient's responses to the suggestions and expectations of the analyst rather than evidence of subconscious thought.
_	J similarly maintained his rejection of the reserved powers doctrine, holding that the constitutional question was limited to the interpretation of the express defence power and rejected the suggestion that the defence power was paramount, holding "All the subjects for legislation in sec. 51 are on the same logical level: there is no hierarchy in the powers, with the power as to defence on the top."
_	The final word 'Ordovs' of the inscription (after IACIT, "lies") is believed to refer to the Ordovices tribe of North Wales, with the suggestion that the stone was carved by local tribes in honour of a member of the Ordovices who had settled in the area.
_	Moreover, Wagner's wife Minna, in a letter of 28 October 1840 to Wagner's friend Apel, who had likely first made the suggestion that Wagner compose "Rienzi", mentions a plan to perform the overture to "Rienzi" "a fortnight hence", but contains a clear indication that her husband had just been committed to a debtors' prison.
_	Diop was teased as a child because of her dark skin tone, but after moving to Paris, France at age 15, she was repeatedly approached with the suggestion that she become a supermodel.
_	In the present state of our knowledge it seems reasonable to adopt as a working hypothesis the suggestion that the ziggurats developed out of the earlier temples on platforms and that small shrines stood on the highest stages..."
_	Ludens is appalled by the suggestion that Vallar is mentally ill.
_	In an opinion piece on the St. Charles incident, Eric Zorn (a staff writer for the "Chicago Tribune") opined that "the expression 'Straight Pride' can only be read as a gratuitous and contemptuous response to the suggestion that gay people not be marginalized."
_	Sources within the U.S. embassy in Guatemala were reported to have said that Monzón had, in private conversations, expressed concerns over communist influence in Guatemala, after he had been approached with the suggestion that he lead a coup against the government.
_	A study of this behaviour led to the suggestion that the two rearmost appendages may be more accurately termed "legs" rather than "arms".
_	These included the suggestion that Addis had become disoriented and wandered off into the Falklands hinterland, possibly succumbing to hypothermia.
_	To maintain its simplicity, Queen Victoria, under the guidance of Prince Albert, vetoed the suggestion that the award be called "The Military Order of Victoria" and instead suggested the name "Victoria Cross".
_	To investigate the suggestion that some of the anti-net neutrality comments might be fraudulently using the names of real people without their knowledge, Fight for the Future created a web site called comcastroturf, claiming [on May 23, 2017], "Someone has submitted nearly half a million anti-net neutrality comments to the FCC, many of which appear to be completely fake — using stolen names and addresses", and inviting the reader to see if comments had been filed by someone else in his / her name.
_	The story is frequently interrupted by the characters discussing puzzles, recounting dreams, unrelated stories (usually unfinished with the suggestion that the reader think of an ending), or mere asides.
_	The recognition of extensional faulting at various scales in these areas at the same time as deposition led to the suggestion that these basins reflect the gravitational collapse of this thickened zone.
_	It has been proposed that the St Andrews Sarcophagus was made for Causantín, but this is a minority view, as is the suggestion that the relics of Columba, perhaps including the Monymusk Reliquary, may have been translated from Iona to Dunkeld during Causantín's reign.
_	Test victories, Harvey named three Australian teams that he thought to be superiors, saying "no, far from it" in response to the suggestion that Waugh's men were the best team in history.
_	Some scholars have proposed that the author took the list from a now-lost Old Welsh poem which listed Arthur's twelve great victories, based on the fact that some of the names appear to rhyme and the suggestion that the odd description of Arthur bearing the image of the Virgin Mary on his shoulders at Guinnion might contain a confusion of the Welsh word "iscuit" (shield) for "iscuid" (shoulders).
_	Aarushi's friends and relatives were outraged at the character assassination of the family, especially at the suggestion that she was in a sexual relationship with Hemraj.
_	This finding has led to the suggestion that anemia-induced hyperfiltration in childhood is the principal cause of the adult glomerulopathy.
_	There her met the returning Crusader king Louis VII of France and his wife Eleanor of Aquitaine who were by then barely on speaking terms given the strains of the failed Crusade and the suggestion that Eleanor may have entered until a relationship with her uncle Raymond during the Crusade.
_	Both Blaikie and Maloway have rejected the suggestion that they planned to "swap" their federal and provincial seats, and Blaikie has said that he returned to political life on the request of Premier Gary Doer.
_	Williams put forward the suggestion that Banksy's work could be the work of a collective, and that Banksy himself may be Massive Attack's frontman, Robert Del Naja.
_	Mokotjo was utilised mostly as a substitute and as a utility player by manager Ronald Koeman during the first half of the 2011–12 season, which prompted the suggestion that he would leave the club in search of first team football.
_	Prime Minister David Cameron condemned the suggestion that this radicalisation was the fault of British authorities as "reprehensible", whilst Mayor of London Boris Johnson called it an "apology for terror".
_	When the code team learns that Lizzie has an aptitude for puzzles, Ripred makes the suggestion that she replace Boots.
_	It was further determined that Felfe had been mandated by his Soviet handlers to recruit former comrades from his time with the Nazi security services, though the West German Intelligence Services vehemently denied the suggestion that they employed significant numbers of former Nazi intelligence agents.
_	In a 2012 interview with Guyon Espiner, he hit out at the suggestion that being gay could prevent him from understanding the concerns of ordinary New Zealanders:
_	The film was also praised by the political right for portraying Bush's strong leadership in a time of crisis, while Michael Moore and others on the political left have branded the film as propaganda attempting to portray Bush as a strong leader in complete command of the situation, and also attempting a rebuttal to the suggestion that behind the scenes Cheney was running the show.
_	The paper also raised the suggestion that the majority of the submarines be constructed in Australia and that the number of submarines be increased beyond the six "Oberon"s.
_	The discovery of these impulse emissions led to the suggestion that a special unit be organized to intercept them in order to protect the troops against this kind o£ weapons.
_	Ibn Saud angrily responded, that he was insulted by the suggestion that he could be bribed for £20 million to accept resettlement of Arabs from Palestine.
_	Most common is the suggestion that is a reference to the seventh Homeric Hymn, in which it is explained how Dionysus was kidnapped by Etruscan pirates, who were unaware of his identity.
_	In that lawsuit, AARC denies the suggestion that it failed to investigate reports of abuse."
_	This “man of God” approached Sultan Walad with the suggestion that since had already produced a Mathnawi in the meter of Sanai’s Hadiqe, he should now set to work on a mathwnawi in the same meter as the Mathnawi of his father, Rumi.
_	Russell says that "I wanted the play to move at a kind of pace that was more in keeping with a theatrical tempo that has significantly increased in the thirty years since the play was first seen.", though he "vehemently disagrees" with the suggestion that he was "pandering to the needs of an audience" with a "limited attention span and who must increasingly be spoon-fed".
_	Wheeler rejected the suggestion that welfare reforms and council cuts relating to her Government had contributed to the rise.
_	In 1999, Liza Key was allowed to conduct two televised interviews with him, for a documentary called "A Question of Madness"; she put forward the suggestion that he may have been acting as part of a wider conspiracy.
_	The "Zohar" contains a number of interpretations of this verse, including the suggestion that "God saw the light that it was good" means that "the universe became lighted up and pervaded throughout with the divine life which preserves it for the common weal and happiness of created and animated beings."
_	In 1922, a geologist approached the Alpine Club of Canada with the suggestion that the club send a team to the mountain to reach the summit for the first time.
_	However, "Melissa" was dismissive of the suggestion that the slippers allegedly found near the pool, which were included among the belongings returned to Coriam's parents, had been hers.
_	Some sailors believed that polydactyl cats were better at catching pests, possibly connected with the suggestion that extra digits give a polydactyl cat better balance, important when at sea.
_	The lack of subsequent mention of him after 870 led to the suggestion that he died in that year, and as his heir was in the hands of his enemies, it was argued that García Jiménez then governed the kingdom as regent.
_	The fortress was 20% larger than other fortresses in Britannia built around the same time at York (Eboracum) and Caerleon (Isca Augusta); this has led to the suggestion that the fortress may have been intended to become the capital of the province rather than London (Londinium).
_	Isamu Oyama, a former soldier, mistakes her for a man (as usual) and even makes the suggestion that Noriko is actually a transgender... for which he gets slapped by her.
_	Trimmer, appalled by the suggestion that British children did not need to be brought up within the Established Church, wrote and published her "Comparative View" of the two systems in 1805, creating a schism between two very similar systems.
_	It states that 'the suggestion that $6 is an acceptable amount of money for poor households to pay reveals a profound lack of understanding of the reality of the lives of the poorest”.
_	However, the discontinuation was recalled three days later with the suggestion that customers not waste the food after La Madeleine allegedly received a "couple hundred responses...mostly complaints".
_	In August 2013, Obama rejected the suggestion that Snowden was a patriot, and in November said that "the benefit of the debate he generated was not worth the damage done, because there was another way of doing it."
_	Barbara Palmer suggests that the story of the Wakefield Master and the suggestion that the Second Shepherd's Play was performed as part of the Wakefield Cycle were both inventions of an amateur historian named J. M. W. Walker.
_	J similarly maintained his rejection of the reserved powers doctrine, holding that the constitutional question was limited to the interpretation of the express defence power and rejected the suggestion that the defence power was paramount, holding "All the subjects for legislation in sec. 51 are on the same logical level: there is no hierarchy in the powers, with the power as to defence on the top."
_	The Italian colonial powers were outraged at the suggestion that the Muslim population of Libya was being subjected to genocide.
_	Hohenheim would later plant the suggestion that the creature was not the actual Trisha, leading to the conclusion it was Alphonse possessing an artificially created body momentarily after losing his own.
_	One of Flusser's views which was particularly influential in Germany, being taken up and advocated also by Joachim Jeremias, was the suggestion that the name "Yeshu" used of Jesus in the Talmud was "in no way abusive" but was in fact a Galilean dialect version, since according to Flusser, Galileans found the final ayin of the name Yeshua difficult to pronounce.
_	Such an examination made it unnecessary for junior doctors to enter several membership examinations and removed the suggestion that the standards of the examination at the three Colleges were different.
_	The president of the company, Gerhart S. Suppiger, is credited with the suggestion that the water tower be designed to resemble one of the company's catsup bottles.
_	He and Herzog both dismiss immediately the suggestion that it acts as a deterrent of serious crimes.
_	Indian-owned factories such as Kundanmals, Oxford, and Bakson Garments were "not" attacked, giving credence to the suggestion that the mob was deliberately going after Sri Lankan Tamil targets.
_	In December 2000 Paul Carder, then the Dean of Business and Creative Arts at George Brown College, approached Albert Schultz the Artistic Director of Soulpepper Theatre Company with the suggestion that a partnership be struck between Soulpepper and the George Brown Theatre School.
_	This contrasts starkly with the many fantasy elements of the game, such as characters possessing magical armlets that give the wearer special abilities, and the suggestion that King Henry VI of England was possessed by demons and used them to aid his armies in destroying France during the Hundred Years' War.
_	Leia as a "huge" feminist icon, dismissing the suggestion that the character was ever a "damsel in distress".
_	As noted above, no historical basis can be found for the suggestion that the colour red was favoured because of the supposedly demoralising effect of blood stains on a uniform of a lighter colour.
_	While African American culture is a significant influence on its Canadian counterpart, many African and Caribbean Canadians reject the suggestion that their own culture is not distinctive.
_	Burns goes borderline crazy trying to get Houlihan back — he drinks up all of Hawkeye's booze; he cleans out Hawkeye and BJ's poker winnings of $200.00; he confesses that he wants to have affairs with two other nurses besides Houlihan: Nurse Kelly and a "little red haired nurse"; he nearly blows himself up with a grenade; he "captures" a Korean family with an ox and almost fires his carbine in Potter's office at the suggestion that he is heading for a Section Eight discharge.
_	The practice of murdering political opponents via "death flights", employed by the juntas of Argentina and Chile, has been the subject of numerous alt-right internet memes, with the suggestion that political enemies be given "free helicopter rides."
_	Of these, the most significant is that Cædmon felt "shame" for his inability to sing vernacular songs before his vision, and the suggestion that Hilda's scribes copied down his verse "æt muðe" "from his mouth".
_	A William Fairlie of that Ilk is recorded to have married Catherine Brisbane of Brisbane in the early eighteenth century which contradicts the suggestion that the seller of Fairlie in around 1650 was the last of the male line of the Fairlies of that Ilk although he may have been, for Elizabeth Craufurd of Craufurdland, daughter of John Craufurd and Elizabeth Kerr of Morrieston, married twice, her first husband being a William Fairlie of that Ilk.
_	However, Finn becomes terrified at the suggestion that they fight the First Order and decides he can no longer stay with them if they plan to confront the First Order.
_	Richards was a friend of Thomas Middleton, leading to the suggestion that the William Hammond to whom Middleton gave the manuscript of "A Game at Chess" in 1625 may have been of St Alban's Court (from the point of view of date, this would be the grandfather of William Hammond who died in 1685).
_	That development prompts the suggestion that Beau might reclaim his lost love upon returning home.
_	In broad academic perspective, both the idea that the Khazars converted "en masse" to Judaism, and the suggestion that they emigrated to form the core population of Ashkenazi Jewry, remain highly polemical issues.
_	In 1561, he wrote to Gresham – his employer – with the suggestion that something along the lines of the Antwerp Bourse could be established in London.
_	This machine was built using materials and engineering tolerances that would have been available to Babbage, quelling the suggestion that Babbage's designs could not have been produced using the manufacturing technology of his time.
_	The race result remains disputed by some due to the suggestion that the second-placed Holden Dealer Team entry of Colin Bond and John Harvey should have won the race due to a timing error.
_	Steiner's view appears to be that the similarities between the two writers are significant and substantial, but he accounts for this with the suggestion that Nietzsche arrived at a "Stirner-like world conception" on his own.
_	The High Court has recently affirmed the importance of Equity and dismissed the suggestion that unjust enrichment has explanatory power in relation to traditional equitable doctrines such as subrogation.
_	However, he criticized them for establishing a dichotomy between the suggestion that rape is an adaptation and the suggestion that rape is a byproduct of the human willingness to use violence, writing that this diverted attention from the more basic claim that rape is related to sex.
_	The lack of a defensive function and the focus on the burial mounds have led to the suggestion that the enclosure and road system had a ritual or sacred significance.
_	with the suggestion that the preceding statement be terminated with a semicolon.
_	Because of this, critics of Holocaust denial reject the suggestion that Hitler lost interest in anti-semitism after attaining power in 1933, finding it "hard to believe that a man who had lost his anti-semitism was so interested in situational reports on the killings of Jewish men, women and children while engaged in a war."
_	Wallace replied the next day with the suggestion that since some caterpillars "...are protected by a disagreeable taste or odour, it would be a positive advantage to them never to be mistaken for any of the palatable catterpillars ["sic"], because a slight wound such as would be caused by a peck of a bird’s bill almost always I believe kills a growing .
_	The novel ends with the suggestion that Ernie Munger may be starting down the same desperate and well-worn path as Billy Tully.
_	In 1994, the Court of Appeal of New Zealand dismissed the suggestion that the Minister for Immigration and his department were at liberty to ignore the convention, arguing that this would imply that the country's adherence was "at least partly window-dressing".
_	The imperial title was not mentioned, which led to the suggestion that, at that particular time, Charlemagne regarded the title as an honorary achievement that held no hereditary significance.
_	Although a tunnel, either under the inlet, or as part of one of the suggested alternative schemes, has previously been dismissed, the suggestion that a tunnel might be built at some time in the future has not been totally dismissed.
_	The discovery of this led to the suggestion that they might have been meant to be used together.
_	This led to the suggestion that florigen may be made up of two classes of flowering hormones:
_	In tomb number six of the "Tronchetti’s area", a piece of scrap for manufacturing shields was discovered, leading to the suggestion that the statues had been sculpted on the site and expressly for the necropolis.
_	Connected to this is the suggestion that moving the date would be seen as a significant symbolic act.
_	"Casually collected anecdotal records and early bounty analyses have, at times, prompted the suggestion that disease was a major factor in the extinction of the species, that occurred when the last known specimen died in Hobart Zoo during the night of 7th September, 1936."
_	He reputedly lured her to his headquarters in Rome by the suggestion that there was a message from her husband who was then being held in Berlin.
_	Because places with this name generally do not lie near old Roman roads, the suggestion that the name is derived from "tlak" 'pavement' is unlikely.
_	Alan Renwick likewise dismissed the suggestion that voting machines would be required, saying "The No camp [...] say that AV would require expensive voting machines.
_	A spokesman for Pell welcomed the suggestion that Marx saw no differences between the two groups.
_	Initially, disparities in distribution of housing construction funds for affordable housing came under scrutiny when it was revealed that areas least impacted by hurricane were receiving funds in greater proportion than heavily hit areas with the suggestion that towns with mayors friendly to Christie were favored.
_	Justice Thomas recoils at the suggestion that black students can only learn if they are sitting next to white students.
_	That Antimachus would list his own associate kings argues strongly against the suggestion that he was appointed as a Northern associate ruler of Euthydemus and Demetrius, an idea that anyway is more or less unprecedented among Hellenistic kings.
_	When later interviewed by François Truffaut, Hitchcock denied the suggestion that "Shadow of a Doubt" was his "favourite".
_	On June 20, 1862, "R. R. Cuyler"s Captain reported that Carpenter’s good work "justifies the suggestion that he should endeavor to obtain admission to the U.S. Naval Academy".
_	A 2009 defence of chiropractic, written by chiropractor Alan Breen, stated there is consistent evidence that manual therapies such as chiropractic manipulations are "helpful and generally produce moderate but significant and sustained improvement for back pain" and dismissed the suggestion that chiropractic does more harm than good as "specious".
_	This lends some weight to the suggestion that people were labelled 'witches' simply because they did not act the way a woman should (humble and grateful), or simply to suit personal agendas.
_	A summary by a Governing Body committee of "wrong teachings" being promoted as "new understandings" included the suggestion that God did not have an organization on earth.
_	Eduard Meyer, disagreeing with Beloch, instead put forth the suggestion that the real-life Achaeans were mainland pre-Dorian Greeks.
_	This gives some support to the suggestion that "Han" came from the Saxon "han" for cockerel.
_	Some doctors, for instance, were offended at the suggestion that they should wash their hands, feeling that their social status as gentlemen was inconsistent with the idea that their hands could be unclean.
_	Scullard prefers the suggestion that the town got the appellation "Regia" before the destruction of Carthage in 146 BC, indicating that it was not under Carthaginian control and belonged to the kingdom of Numidia.
_	This has led to the suggestion that these GM fish will survive better than the wild-type when conditions are very poor.
_	Browne in turn said he was not anti-Semitic, but a critic of Israel, and himself criticised "the suggestion that because you're critical of Israel, you're automatically anti-Semitic.
_	Rutter makes the suggestion that the bull's testicles substituted for the self-castration of devotees of Cybele, abhorrent to the Roman "ethos".
_	The University of Nottingham's Institute for Name-Studies has offered the suggestion that the name means "shelter for a herd of pigs".
_	One involves the suggestion that for Jesus and his disciples, the Passover could have begun at dawn Thursday, while for traditional Jews it would not have begun until dusk that same day.
_	Later she was imprisoned, being taken into custody the night before the 1987 coup; among her offenses was held to be making the suggestion that the army should be smaller.
_	Some authors also claim she was called Gladys on the suggestion that this was a Welsh word for princess.
_	The press conference was held at Robina Stadium, further reinforcing the suggestion that the new franchise will play at the 27,000 capacity stadium.
_	An important element of Tendai doctrine was the suggestion that enlightenment was accessible to "every creature".
_	Among the oddest was the suggestion that Adam Weishaupt, founder of the Bavarian Illuminati, killed George Washington and took on his identity as President of the United States.
_	The best-known is the suggestion that Nazi troops attempted to invade England and actually disembarked at the tip of the peninsula near Shingle Street, before being repelled with a wall of fire.
_	Their results challenge the suggestion that the play was a mere forgery by Theobald.
_	His posture reflects the altered position of the man in the foreground, raising the suggestion that he was painted in as a compositional response to the alteration made to the man at the front.
_	Finding himself hooked to the game, he pursued the rights and knowing Nintendo was planning to release the Game Boy, approached Nintendo of America head Minoru Arakawa with the suggestion that "Tetris" was the perfect title to be packaged with the handheld.
_	The fragile base class problem has been blamed on open recursion, with the suggestion that invoking methods on codice_1 default to closed recursion (static dispatch, early binding) rather than open recursion (dynamic dispatch, late binding), only using open recursion when it is specifically requested; external calls (not using codice_1) would be dynamically dispatched as usual.
_	This led to the suggestion that alizarin was a derivative of naphthalene, a C10 hydrocarbon, although Schunck pointed out that this did not explain the reactions of alizarin.
_	On 18 August 1296, the Pope, who had received a suggestion from King Philip IV that negotiations for peace with King Edward might better be conducted at the Papal Court, eagerly accepted the suggestion that the King send his brother the Comte d'Alençon to him so that they could deal conveniently with confidential matters.
_	The notion of "intrinsic duality" in "Crime and Punishment" has been commented upon, with the suggestion that there is a degree of symmetry to the book.
_	Vortigern was then coerced into agreeing to a "treaty" that included the cession of Sussex to the Anglo-Saxons and the suggestion that "Mercredesburne" means ""river of the frontier agreed by treaty"" is seen as confirmation of this assertion.
_	He also dismissed the suggestion that the dignity of Sulpicius’ status was higher than that of Murena and made favourable points in regard to Murena’s.
_	Subsequent reporting in multiple outlets pointed out that the suggestion that Emmert had been “personally informed” was actually a misleading reference to widely publicized accounts coming from Michigan State during 2010.
_	To the suggestion that a non-Nazi Germany might, as an earnest of good faith, restore some of the territorial acquisitions of Adolf Hitler, von Trott returned an uncompromising negative".
_	These findings led to the suggestion that this domain, common to NBP-45, HMG14 and HMG17 is responsible for binding of the proteins to nucleosomes in chromatin.
_	His advice to his celebrity clients included the suggestion that they study fashion magazines to help decide what they wanted in color and design.
_	In contrast the Oxford English Dictionary simply characterizes freeware as being "available free of charge (sometimes with the suggestion that users should make a donation to the provider)".
_	Though further work is required to either confirm or disprove such hypotheses, one example is the suggestion that all the members of the Mycteroptidae ("Megarachne", "Mycterops" and "Woodwardopterus") might represent ontogenic stages of a single genus, "Mycterops".
_	The Seminoles were opposed to the move, and especially to the suggestion that they should be placed on the Creek reservation.
_	The commissioner denied the suggestion that the move was a suspension of operations.
_	A study of DNA also suggested a close relationship to "A. hentzi", in accordance with the suggestion that the holotype was actually this species.
_	At this time, the acting director of the State Railway Office, Engineer Eduard Engelmann jr., brought forth the suggestion that the Mariazell Railway be electrified using single-phase alternating current.
_	Grant refused the suggestion that the treaty drop the Dominican statehood clause.
_	His analysis of energy flow in ecosystems, and the differences in the potential energy of sunlight, fresh water currents, wind and ocean currents led him to make the suggestion that when two or more different energy sources drive a system, they cannot be added without first converting them to a common measure that accounts for their differences in energy quality.
_	During this time, Šormaz opposed the suggestion that Serbia should join the North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO) and suggested that even Serbia's co-operation with NATO was threatened by the military alliance's attitude toward the status of Kosovo and Metohija.
_	At first, the pits in the fringe were considered to have a sensory function, but the suggestion that they may play a role in filtering food particles now seems generally accepted.
_	It was added into the game with the suggestion that it could help you relax.
_	In a publication of 1614, François de Monceaux popularized the suggestion that Claudia was the daughter of the British resistance leader Caratacus, an idea which has continued to be popular with British Israelite pseudohistory, but beyond the fact that Caratacus is known to have ended his life in Rome, there is no evidence to connect him to Claudia.
_	His crossing experiments with bean plants of different periods in 1935 demonstrated that the next generation had periods of intermediate durations, supporting the suggestion that circadian rhythms are heritable.
_	More drastic was the suggestion that the entire
_	Tutu, who as a little boy knew Huddleston and swears to his innocence, was particularly affronted by the suggestion that Huddleston was anything other than a protector of children.
_	At the suggestion that Chotiner could defend him, Nixon worried that the attorney might not be willing to do so.
_	Having already stated that they would only pay a "sensible" amount for the club, the group was thought to have baulked at the suggestion that the Glazers' valuation of the club was significantly higher than the amount they were willing to pay.
_	At that meeting Mosley announced that "he was glad indeed to have the opportunity of introducing the first candidate, and ... [thereby] killed for all time the suggestion that National Socialism proposed putting British women back into the home; this is simply not true.
_	She also criticised the complexity of the emotions expressed by Tracy, as they were being repeated by other children who cannot understand them; for example, the suggestion that they are deprived because they do not have enough sweets.
_	Little evidence has accumulated to support the suggestion that increased blood flow plays a role, but recently Bateman et al.
_	Although the Colonial Office rejected the suggestion that the "African Sentinel" fell under the provisions of the Sedition Ordinance, the incident generated much publicity and convinced Wallace-Johnson to pursue his political exploits in Sierra Leone.
_	However, a common criticism of the genre is the suggestion that its appeal lies in prurience and voyeurism.
_	Explanations range from the surmise that the song was disadvantaged by being drawn to be performed very early in the show to the suggestion that in Eurovision terms it was simply ahead of its time and would have registered a less disastrous result in a later contest.
_	He added, "the only step I achieved on the Karabakh issue was the suggestion that the situation be frozen."
_	For example, reacting to a speech by Archbishop of Canterbury Rowan Williams which raised the suggestion that Muslims in Britain should be allowed to have their own courts in matters of family law, Allam wrote that
_	But he said his exchange list was so long he could not do so, making the suggestion that if she would advertise his paper in "The Tablet" he would send it to her for a year.
_	Instead proposals for construction of a second lighthouse on Bald Head Island started in 1889 with the suggestion that a new , , masonry tower be built at a cost of $150,000.
_	The reliability of the narrator is not a given, and sometimes there seems the suggestion that he is not the actual source of the woman's irritation, but merely considers himself to be so.
_	Author Peter David said he was "underwhelmed" by the suggestion that all events of consequence in the series had been manipulated so that Jasmine could be born.
_	Jim is quietly hurt by the suggestion that Pam would not miss him if he left.
_	She found Blaine's advice to Kurt "misleading and dangerous", especially the suggestion that targeted children should be held responsible for confronting their attackers and putting themselves at risk of further injury, rather than for protecting themselves.
_	The "Human Resource Exploitation Training Manual -- 1983" gives the suggestion that interrogators show the prisoner letters from home to give the prisoner the impression that the prisoner's relatives are in danger or suffering.
_	The Mayor apologized for the suggestion that people Uptown (a mixed neighborhood) were racist, noting the importance of that section of town in the city's recovery.
_	Its scarcity and the fact that it is the only one of its genus found in nightjars support the suggestion that it has crossed over from close relatives that normally infect owls.
_	Some were offended at the suggestion that she had loved Walters, saying it was damaging to the young woman's reputation.
_	This has led to the suggestion that these cells have plasticity and can respond to environmental cues.
_	The genetic studies to date along with the extremely high frequency patterns in some European countries lead to the suggestion that the mutation could have been easily spread by Vikings and later by the Normans, indicating a genetic link between hereditary hemochromatosis and Viking ancestry.
_	However the suggestion that this referred to old, unusable timber, which was called "bracken", is disputed.
_	During an interview with Paul Cameron, the anti-gay psychologist and sex researcher, Cameron made a number of comments, among these were the suggestion that homosexuality was equivalent to drug abuse, that homosexuals were addicted to homosexual activity, and cited a study conducted by his own Family Research Institute which reported that gays and lesbians in the military are far more likely to rape or sexually abuse fellow soldiers.
_	Their hypothesis relies heavily on the suggestion that large lunar craters, generally assumed to be formed from meteor impact, are generally too shallow and have flat or even convex bottoms.
_	This is often seen as the first instance of true monotheism in history, although the details of Atenist theology are still unclear and the suggestion that it was monotheistic is disputed.
_	Some evidence for the suggestion that herbals were utilized with knowledgeable intent, was the addition of several chapters of plants, lists of symptoms, habitat information, and plant synonyms added to texts such as the "Herbarium".
_	Cryo-electron tomography has been able to visualize mitochondrial division in frozen hydrated cells and has led to the suggestion that mitochondria divide by budding.
_	The actions of Brendel and Mortensgaard do not take the plot forward, although Mortensgaard reveals to Rosmer that Beata sent his newspaper a letter denying any rumors that her husband was unfaithful with Rebecca: the suggestion that his wife even considered such unfounded suspicion, which may have contributed to her decision to kill herself, upsets Rosmer greatly.
_	According to them, these false claims included the suggestion that their work was "an example of facile enthusiasm for adaptationist explanations of evolutionary phenomena" and that they forced their data to support their conclusions.
_	In "The Gas Heart", Tzara appears to have aimed at overturning theatrical tradition, in particular the three-act play, which resulted in the suggestion that the text is "the greatest three-act hoax of the century".
_	These diatribes may have prompted the suggestion that Stuart was Junius.
_	The presence of some East Midland forms - those of the contemporary dialect of London - has led to the suggestion that the poet may have been part of the household of a lord whose seat was in the north-west, but who had connections with London and the court.
_	She also supports the suggestion that Dumbledore should be laid to rest at Hogwarts.
_	This allows C7 to contribute directly to increased neck length and has given rise to the suggestion that T1 is actually C8, and that giraffes have added an extra cervical vertebra.
_	None survive in mensural notation, but this has not prevented the suggestion that "De chanter" is in the second mode.
_	Ruth made the suggestion that the current concrete beams be switched out for concrete beams with low alkali content.
_	Reviewers in the Irish Times and Irish Examiner consider that Abbs has, given the dearth of sources available, relied upon her own 'unsubstantiated speculations' on subjects such as incest, the nature of Lucia Joyce's mental illnesses, and the suggestion that schizophrenia resulted, in Joyce's case, entirely from her mother's neglect (the author's bias against Nora Joyce, in support of this baseless theory, being further emphasised by Abbs's decision to represent Nora, referred to in disparaging terms throughout, as speaking with 'Oirish' dialect: 'her dialogue is studded with numerous so-called Irish colloquialisms...
_	Rumours about a cover-up of the cause of the Helderberg crash abounded for years - including the suggestion that the fire was caused by illicit cargo of rocket fuel and ammunition.
_	The Football Association Press Officer at the time, David Bloomfield, who had been a fan of Joy Division, contacted Tony Wilson, the head of New Order's label Factory Records, with the suggestion that the band record a track for the forthcoming World Cup in Italy.
_	This included a letter from Robert Aickman, a literary agent and aspiring author, who made the suggestion that a society to campaign for the regeneration of canals should be formed.
_	Beneath the spectacle that is the megamusical, Evita's worth is degraded by the suggestion that to come to power she must abuse her sexuality and “manipulate” those around her.
_	Mubarak also repeated the suggestion that no one had been killed "There is no body and no proof he has been murdered.
_	While in Spain, el-Mejjati became associated with Jamal Zougam, who had helped construct the bombs, leading to the suggestion that he had been involved in the March 11 Madrid bombings.
_	Atwood has resisted the suggestion that "The Handmaid's Tale" and "Oryx and Crake" are science fiction, suggesting to "The Guardian" in 2003 that they are speculative fiction instead: "Science fiction has monsters and spaceships; speculative fiction could really happen."
_	In the editorial, Maddox ultimately rejected the suggestion that the book should be burned.
_	Tolkien at first foresaw a link between the wights and the Ringwraiths, initially describing the Black Riders as horsed wights, but the suggestion that they were the same kind of creatures was dropped in the published work.
_	In a statement, Mylan said, "There is no truth to the suggestion that the company's efforts were anything but straightforward or that we are aware of anyone advocating inappropriately for the right of schoolchildren to have access to potential life-saving medicine."
_	The "let-7" RNA was found to be conserved in many species, leading to the suggestion that "let-7" RNA and additional "small temporal RNAs" might regulate the timing of development in diverse animals, including humans.
_	Federal officials raised the suggestion that the trees be replaced with artificial trees, but this was actively opposed by the live Christmas tree industry and the idea was dropped.
_	Unlike other ITC productions, which were created in order to be sold to the U.S. market, "Strange Report" was created in collaboration with NBC's films unit Arena in the United States (the show's executive producer was Norman Felton, better known for his involvement in "The_Man_from_U.N.C.L.E."), with the suggestion that the first half of the series would take place in the United Kingdom and the second half would see Strange visiting the United States.
_	The name of the castle led to the suggestion that it derived from Tiberius Caesar, however 'Tibbers' comes from the Gaelic word 'Toibar' meaning a well.
_	Based on the structure of the petiole and abdomen in ""E.". sulcatus" and the suggestion that "E. petiolatus" had the same morphology, "Electrostephanus" was designated a junior synonym of "Denaeostephanus" in 2004.
_	While they're talking however, Cyril regains consciousness and declines the suggestion that an ambulance be called although he has been knocked senseless.
_	The nonsense achieves part of its humor by fulfilling the structural and phonetic requirements of an extant form, but substituting silly syllables for meaningful ones, thereby allowing the listener or reader to enjoy the suggestion that the usual words are empty placeholders (e.g. when Jonathan Swift's King of Lilliput has a royal title ending in "Ully Mully Goo," the nonsense sounds and weighs the same as the titles of real kings and, implicitly, is just as meaningful).
_	Further accusations, and hints of accusations, followed, including the suggestion that the murder of Sergey Kirov in 1934, the event that sparked the Great Terror, could be included in the list of Stalin's crimes.
_	Simon credits his editor John Sterling with the suggestion that he observe a single corner in Baltimore.
_	Climate change denial literature often features the suggestion that we should wait for better technologies before addressing climate change, when they will be more affordable and effective.
_	In Shaw's case the suggestion that he play solitaire is the trigger.
_	Are you, as a trained medical man, prepared to accept as a reasonable possibility the suggestion that by the carrying out of the exercises of psycho-physical guidance by way of conscious control, one can get complete immunity against disease?" – "It might be possible...animals living in a wild state when they come to the end of their days do not suffer from many of the prevalent diseases."
_	The Jewish philosopher and pantheist Baruch Spinoza echoed Hobbes's doubts about the provenance of the historical books in his "A Theologico-Political Treatise" (published in 1670), and elaborated on the suggestion that the final redaction of these texts was post-exilic under the auspices of Ezra (Chapter IX).
_	O'Hanlon's mother remained firmly committed to the IRA and was hurt by the suggestion that there was an alternative to IRA activity or that her son was anything other than an Irish hero.
_	He also established contacts with Dutch national newspapers and periodicals with the suggestion that he worked for them in Afghanistan.
_	He then proceeded to mock the suggestion that African-American New Yorkers living in high-crime neighborhoods should adopt certain behaviors in order to avoid confrontations with police officers.
_	Reviewing the film for "History Extra", the official website of "BBC History Magazine", Stokes said the film contains a number of historical inaccuracies, such as the suggestion that Grace's speech to the Red Cross Ball in Monaco on October 9, 1962, "defused the [tax] crisis".
_	The composer turned down the suggestion that she should conduct the performances herself, declining to make public appearances, but her sister made her debut, very successfully, in this production.
_	The Hells Angels' website denies the suggestion that any misfit or malcontent troops are connected with the motorcycle club.
_	Suggestions were prompted as to why she abandoned touring, among them her reputed need to be in total control of the final product, which is incompatible with live stage performance; a rumour of a crippling fear of flying; and the suggestion that the death of 21-year-old Bill Duffield severely affected her.
_	This contradiction among critics confirms the suggestion that the expansion of scholarship had rendered consensus unreachable.
_	Adelaide has a Mediterranean climate (Köppen climate classification "Csa"), with warm to hot dry summers and cool to mild winters and with most precipitation falling in the winter months, leading to the suggestion that the climate be classified as a "cold monsoon".
_	Among other points of interest are the intersection of Shamanic traditions and mythology/folk religion in the earlier textual material, such as "Tianwen" (possibly based on even more ancient shamanic temple murals), the whole question of the interpretation of the 11 verses of the "Jiu Ge" ("Nine Songs") as the libretto of a shamanic dramatic performance, the motif of shamanic spirit flight from "Li Sao" through subsequent pieces, the evidence of possible regional variations in wu shamanism between Chu, Wei, Qi, and other states (or shamanic colleges associated with those regions), and the suggestion that some of the newer textual material was modified to please Han Wudi, by Liu An, the Prince of Huainan, or his circle.
_	Andrew Hunter has pointed to Robinson as being largely responsible for the suggestion that there was more to Thomson's death than accidental drowning.
_	However, "the suggestion that the eunuch is or at least might be a Gentile in the story, by both his ethnic and possibly physical description" may leave more formative possibility than if he had been explicitly categorized.
_	The most famous is the suggestion that he died from the strain of trying to recite a long sentence from his "Antigone" without pausing to take a breath.
_	Hansen also rejected the suggestion that the BCCI and Cricket Australia reached an agreement which he simply rubber-stamped.
_	The medical journalist Maggie Mahar has criticized the bill for the suggestion that people with pre-existing conditions should be moved into high risk pools run in each state.
_	The accident was ascribed to pilot error, with the suggestion that in his enthusiasm to demonstrate the aircraft's potential, Prévot exceed the safe speed range.
_	The Committee rejected entirely the allegation that everything in Friern was arranged for the benefit of the staff, including the suggestion that "the Physician Superintendent was seldom in the hospital for more than one or two hours a day".
_	Three days later, Lowe announced that 2011 could possibly be the final edition of 'Masterpieces', concluding the show with "Hallelujah" from Jeff Buckley's album "Grace", stating that the idea of the feature originally came from the suggestion that the album "Grace" be played on the air from beginning to end.
_	On a different topic, after the discovery of the strong infrared emission from some galaxies, Pacini, together with Martin Harwit, put forward the suggestion that these sources are related to an intense burst of formation of massive stars, a scenario which is now generally accepted.
_	The ending "-ayim" indicates the dual in Hebrew, thus leading to the suggestion that the name refers to the two hills on which the city sits.
_	This has led to the suggestion that the work had been left incomplete by Malouel, who had been given wood for five altarpieces as long ago as 1398.
_	The rise of professional trustee companies has led to the suggestion that it may become of significant case law in the future.
_	In 1939 archaeological excavations revealed a wood lined shaft in the north-west side of the sandpit and a fragment of a Medieval jug was discovered within, raising the suggestion that this site had been used as a kitchen-refuse dump for Borland Castle.
_	On 29 January 2009 the UK Government's interim report into digital communication for the future by Lord Carter, "Digital Britain", made the suggestion that DAB would be the future direction of digital radio in the United Kingdom.
_	Jemima is invited back to the convent by Reverend Mother Ancilla, where she uncovers a number of mysteries, including the suggestion that Miriam, whose family owned the convent lands, may have written a second will bequeathing them away from the Order, and into the hands of another charity.
_	I'm also concerned by the suggestion that they could be tried for terrorism offences.
_	A selection committee finally came up with the suggestion that the raccoon be used.
_	The growth of Toowong State School and the need for a more conveniently placed school for Toowong pupils, after the opening of schools at Milton and Indooroopilly, led to the suggestion that the school be moved.
_	This was sometimes modified with the suggestion that it was the ruling class alone that was the problem.
_	The crusaders accepted the suggestion that in lieu of payment they assist the Venetians in the capture of the (Christian) port of Zara in Dalmatia (vassal city of Venice, which had rebelled and placed itself under Hungary's protection in 1186).
_	The final sentence may remind readers of the suggestion raised in Sir Thursday by Dame Primus that the Trustees are wittingly or unwittingly part of a plan to destroy the House, and itself makes the suggestion that the sender believes the House to be doomed.
_	Soon after the Atari buyout, Microsoft approached Tramiel with the suggestion that they port Windows to the platform, but the delivery date was out by two years, far too long for their needs.
_	In 2015, Lynne Sneddon, Director of Bioveterinary Science at the University of Liverpool, published a review of the evidence gathered investigating the suggestion that cephalopods can experience pain.
_	This consensus was challenged in the late 1960s in an important article by Sara Japhet, and today three positions dominate discussion: first, an affirmation that a Chronicler's History existed and included all or part of Ezra–Nehemiah; second, a denial that Chronicles and Ezra–Nehemiah were ever combined; and third, the suggestion that the two were by the same author but written at different times and issued as separate works.
_	Some link Epaphroditus with another proper name in the New Testament, Epaphras (Colossians 1.7, 4.12; Philemon 23), with the suggestion that the latter is a “contracted” or “pet form” for the Philippian envoy.
_	These recommendations have led to the suggestion that Internet access itself is or should become a fundamental human right.
_	Moreover, the suggestion that employees will forgo their 210 options and rely solely on state remedies is simply too speculative a basis on which to rest a pre-emption finding.
_	His most memorable contribution is the suggestion that judgments of sensory differences are relative and not absolute.
_	Almost three months after the strike had started, Lorenzo was interviewed and responded to the suggestion that he was "one of the nation's toughest bosses" by saying: "I'm not paid to be a candy ass.
_	Wahid then made the suggestion that he may be forced to dissolve the DPR if that happened.
_	She was deeply unhappy at their unauthorised publication and at the suggestion that she had had an affair with one of her teachers.
_	The scarps occurring in the polar regions do appear to be the result of thrust faulting, which substantiates the suggestion that contraction occurred concurrently with spin-down.
_	Rev. Berkeley's discussion of "A. ebenoides" and the horticultural possibilities of hybridizing ferns prompted D. C. Eaton to question whether "A. ebenoides" was distinct from "A. hendersonii", but this was strongly rebutted by Berkeley, as well as the suggestion that it might be a form of "A. pinnatifidum".
_	"But the suggestion that Congress may constitutionally authorize any process other than a fully judicial one immediately raises the gravest doubts."
_	He dismissed the suggestion that federalism could lead separation, saying that separatist movements only took root in unitary states.
_	A 2008 study found that sperm whales sleep in vertical postures just under the surface in passive shallow 'drift-dives', generally during the day, during which whales do not respond to passing vessels unless they are in contact, leading to the suggestion that whales possibly sleep during such dives.
_	As an example of an Internet theory which they imply their readers should not take seriously, "The Independent" and the "Huffington Post" have reported the suggestion that Pitbull and Shakira's song released in 2012 "Get It Started" displays prior knowledge of Flight 370's disappearance.
_	This led to the suggestion that "limited" interbreeding between the different types prevented significant genetic differentiation, and enabled each type to maintain a degree of morphological plasticity, which may be necessary to enable them to feed on different conifers when their preferred food species has a crop failure.
_	Molloy's problems with women were not over, with the suggestion that he was dominated by his wife.
_	This leads to the suggestion that, since Luci feels hot, Bom should stand on a chair and urinate over Luci's face.
_	Similarly, the suggestion that scientific evidence was lacking to support the hypothesis that subdividing habitat increases extinction rates (fundamentally the problem addressed by the SLOSS debate) was refuted.
_	The board members decided to begin a contest soliciting name suggestions for the Athletic teams of Ohio University and offered a $10 prize for the suggestion that best showed the fighting spirit of Ohio.
_	The connections between the Apostles and Druitt led to the suggestion that he was part of the same social set.
_	Because places with this name generally do not lie near old Roman roads, the suggestion that the name is derived from "tlak" 'pavement' is unlikely.
_	Rose was enthusiastic about the new score when initially he saw the piano reduction made by Ingolf Dahl, but later was dismayed by the sound of the orchestra, and offended the composer by telegraphing the suggestion that Stravinsky should allow the scoring to be "retouched" by Robert Russell Bennett, who "orchestrates even the works of Cole Porter".
_	For the next century historians followed the suggestion that the church was dedicated to the Roman saint of Cæsarea.
_	During Wilson's reelection campaign in 2004, Romero ran advertisements that made the suggestion that her votes in Congress aided Osama bin Laden because she had voted against a bill to require the screening of cargo holds.
_	Various reasons were put forward for the speedy conclusion of the operation (including the suggestion that James was seen in Gibraltar smoking and drunk), though the most likely explanation is the one put forward by Dennis Wheatley (who was part of the British deception efforts during the war) in "The Deception Planners" published in the 1980s.
_	In a 2006 survey of American economists (83 responders), "87.5% agree that the U.S. should eliminate remaining tariffs and other barriers to trade" and "90.1% disagree with the suggestion that the U.S. should restrict employers from outsourcing work to foreign countries."
_	Under pressure from higher-ups at CBS to quash the suggestion that Kate and Allie were lesbians, the producers were instructed to show Kate and Allie entering separate bedrooms to sleep at the end of each episode.
_	The Committee for Skeptical Inquiry have put forward the suggestion that the initial identification was premature and created bias among subsequent team members.
_	Upon its discovery the stone achieved some notoriety due to the suggestion that "Artognou" was connected to the legendary King Arthur, though scholars such as John Koch have criticized the evidence for this connection.
_	Several abecedaries (lists of the alphabet) are known, but all are written in different orders, giving strength to the suggestion that the script was casually learned rather than taught systematically.
_	Wallace had told him that the paper was to "feel the pulse of scientific men" about the hypothesis, and Brooke was indignant at the suggestion that "bigotry & intolerance" would be aroused by novel views: this would explain Wallace's ambiguity.
_	A study of the skeletal features in 1919 led to the suggestion that the nearest relative was the harpy eagle.
_	One is the suggestion that US-Ethiopia relations would cool under the new US administration.
_	Even the suggestion that his plan increased the possibility of suffering from gout and catching cold did not cause Frederick to change his mind.
_	One argument against female participation, both at the World Anti-Slavery Convention, and commonly in the nineteenth century, was the suggestion that women were ill-constituted to assume male responsibilities.
_	On 21 December 2016, the Japanese government confirmed the closure and decommissiong of the Monju reactor, with the suggestion that this would cost at least ¥375 billion.
_	...Moreover, he greatly resented the suggestion that Israel should be used as a prostitute in providing services for the great powers.
_	This unusual coincidence led to the suggestion that Parkinson's may possibly have some sort of environmental trigger.
_	In response to the suggestion that the enterovirus might be taking over the role of polio, Nath said that enterovirus 68 was far less virulent and spread much more slowly than polio, and that, unlike in polio, only a few cases of paralysis were seen per thousand children infected.
_	The Law Commission directly rejected the suggestion that the promisor should have every defence in a dispute with a third party that he would have in a dispute with the promisee (regardless of whether or not it could be applied to the disputed term).
_	Some exorcists attribute the rise in demand of exorcisms to the rise in drug abuse and violence, which leads to the suggestion that such things might work hand in hand.
_	Simon credits his editor John Sterling with the suggestion that he observe a single drug corner.
_	The authority rejected the suggestion that it was quibbling over newspaper headlines and not Johnson's actual words.
_	The chant ""Taffy was a Welshman, Taffy was a thief"" was chanted at Lloyd George by workers and referred to the suggestion that Welshman Lloyd George was taking their wages away from them.
_	In these articles Jacobsen discusses the extinction of the Norn language of the Shetland Islands and examines the nature of Faroese as an independent language, ridiculing the suggestion that it is really only a dialect; in another essay, "Den yderste Kyst" (The Farthest Shore), he produces an outstandingly beautiful and poetical description of the outlying island of Mykines.
_	"The prominence in the Sonnets of Rose imagery associated with and symbolic of the "faire friend" has given rise to the suggestion that the Rose imagery alludes to Henry Wriothesley, third earl of Southampton…
_	So, the next time they met, Breuer makes the suggestion that, while he treats Nietzsche's body, Nietzsche must "treat" Breuer of the despair that he feels after falling in love with one of his patients, Bertha Pappenheim (played by Michal Yannai), otherwise known as Anna O., a famous case which was discussed in a joint book by Breuer and Freud, later on.
_	The minority opinion devoted several sentences to the suggestion that the workhouse at Occoquan was nothing like a penitentiary.
_	It also rejected the suggestion that Teslin form its own riding, since it was seen as too small in population.
_	This has led to the suggestion that a second gunman actually fired the fatal shot, a possibility supported by Chief Medical Examiner-Coroner for the County of Los Angeles Thomas Noguchi, who stated that the fatal shot was behind Kennedy's right ear and had been fired at a distance of approximately one inch.
_	They reiterated the suggestion that MBH98 only went back to 1400 to avoid showing the Medieval Warm Period, and implied that it too suffered from the tree ring divergence problem which actually affected a different reconstruction and not MBH98.
_	In 2002, he made the suggestion that some could be given residency in Australia, but denied that this should apply to black farm workers as well.
_	Yet in his Parliamentary speech of 1774, entitled "On American Taxation", Burke responded to the suggestion that America was virtually represented in Parliament by remarking, What!
_	Challe, the deputy chief of staff of the French armed forces, made the suggestion that "Israel would be invited to attack the Egyptian army in Sinai and pose a threat to the Suez Canal and this would provide Britain and France with the pretext to activate their military plans and occupy the Suez Canal Zone, ostensibly in order to separate the combatants and protect the canal."
_	In an article rejecting the suggestion that the division of BiH's middle level of government into four entities would remove Republika Srpska from the map, the SNSD give a clear statement:
_	The first of these contains the suggestion that there will not be justice in cities unless they are ruled by philosopher kings; those responsible for enforcing the laws are compelled to hold their women, children, and property in common; and the individual is taught to pursue the common good through noble lies; the "Republic" says that such a city is likely impossible, however, generally assuming that philosophers would refuse to rule and the people would refuse to compel them to do so.
_	Within this account is the suggestion that the lives of Dorothea and Lydgate are unfulfilled because of these "disastrous marriages".
_	However, the suggestion that the Philistines were the Cherethites is disputed.
_	The guppy has also been hybridised with the Endler's livebearer ("Poecilia wingei") to produce fertile offspring, with the suggestion that, despite physical and behavioural differences, Endler's may represent a subspecies of "Poecilia reticulata" rather than a distinct species.
_	The book includes details not present in the film and omits others: additional details include the description of the sensations experienced by a vessel upon its awakening and the suggestion that a narf's presence activates the lawn sprinklers.
_	The second controversial allegation in the film was the suggestion that Plame's name had been leaked to the press, and specifically to Robert Novak, by someone in the White House, as retribution for Wilson's critical public comments about the uranium claim.
_	The Bolshevik decision makers had little experience in pipelines, so when they made the suggestion that wooden pipes be used, experts informed them that not only was there no suitable forest to provide the timber, but also wooden pipes would not be able to take the necessary pressure.
_	In part of another subsequent segment on August 15, Oliver examined remarks by Donald Trump, who during the previous week had made the suggestion that supporters of the Second Amendment could stop opposing Democratic Party Presidential nominee Hillary Clinton from enforcing gun control policy proposals (an open-ended remark widely considered as suggesting violence against Clinton, but downplayed by Trump and many of his Republican surrogates to suggest his supporters should take political action against her) and claimed that President Barack Obama and Clinton were "the founder[s] of ISIS," citing in the latter that Obama's decision to reduce the number of U.S. ground troops in Iraq in 2013 created a governance vacuum that led to the radical Jihadist terror group's rise (although the U.S. military reduction did play a factor in its development, ISIS traces its origins to 2004, one year after the Iraq War began under the partial guidance of Obama's predecessor George W. Bush, as an Iraq-based arm of al-Qaeda).
_	There, too, Dart detailed how Taung’s endocast was expanded globally in three different regions, contrary to the suggestion that he believed hominin brains evolved back-end-first, in a so-called mosaic fashion.
_	The Conclusion returns to the subject of Peter and rebukes the suggestion that this is a "Jest upon the Youth".
_	The episode ends with the suggestion that this mathematically modelled society is run on data—performance targets, quotas, statistics—and these figures, combined with the exaggerated belief in human selfishness, have created "a cage" for Western humans.
_	Her maiden speech was notable for the suggestion that the voting age in the state should be dropped to 16, but her first major contribution came in July, when she was appointed to a Ministerial committee on gay and lesbian law reform with a wide mandate to make recommendations regarding the elimination of discrimination in state law.
_	Although of a construction date of 1590 to 1620, the house uses much material of earlier dates, including medieval stonework and an Elizabethan doorcase and the architectural historian John Newman notes the suggestion that some of the masonry came from Raglan Castle, 4 miles to the west of Pant-glas.
_	In early 1990, a few ideas offered to the Officer of Exiles (the bureau in charge of emigrants after arriving in Germany) in order to retain Russian Germans, or to promote their return included the suggestion that the necessary important village specialists (mechanics, teachers, doctors, etc.) should be offered incentives such as Trade Associations and additional training in order to keep, or to attract them to Russia.
_	Two of Cox's wives, however, dismissed the suggestion that the love was more than platonic.
_	The following year, laser pulse photoinhibition experiments done by Itzhak Ohad's group led to the suggestion that charge recombination reactions may be damaging because they can lead to production of singlet oxygen.
_	This supports the suggestion that they are deceptively manipulating the other's behaviour.
_	Neave denied the suggestion that there was indecent dancing at the club.
_	Dr. James R. Davila has similarly pointed out that the idea that while the scrolls show that "some of the material found in the Five Books of Moses existed in the First Temple period", the suggestion that they are "proof that the Five Books of Moses were in existence during the First Temple period" (as described in an article in the Israeli newspaper "Haaretz") is "an overinterpretation of the evidence."
_	When asked why the CIA had made an exception to its general practice of not commenting on books, a spokesman wrote that it was because "the allegations were so egregious—including the suggestion that the agency broke the law—that we felt a response was both necessary and appropriate".
_	However the suggestion that 'the area must have formed one hundred originally' is disputed by the noted Cornish historian, the Rev W M M Picken, who believes the names to be derived from the Saxon twi-feald-scir, meaning 'two-fold shire.'
_	Equally dismissive of the allegations of collusion, Willie Gallagher of the Republican Socialist Movement offered the suggestion that had the INLA not killed Wright, he would have been released from prison shortly afterwards.
_	It put forward the suggestion that state and national boards of examination be set up and state level evaluation machinery be put in place.
_	Waurin's account gave rise to the suggestion that Somerset ordered a force of mounted spearmen to conceal itself in Castle Hill Wood, ready to charge into the Yorkist left flank at an opportune time in battle.
_	Several contributions are responses to the suggestion that the category of "organism" may well not be adequate in biology.
_	I have decided to stop taking offense at the suggestion that we are buying influence," she wrote.
_	The Berlin Zoo rallied in support of the baby polar bear, vowing not to harm him and rejecting the suggestion that it would be kinder to euthanise him.
_	The form of the flagella, the tubular cristae within the mitochondria, and other characters have led to the suggestion that the desmothoracids belong among what is now the Cercozoa.
_	The "b"-value decrease observed prior to the failure of samples deformed in the laboratory has led to the suggestion that this is a precursor to major macro-failure.
_	Cassiodorus mentions sixteen books of Columella, which has led to the suggestion that "De arboribus" formed part of a work in four volumes.
_	It was during this period that, having created a serviceable running track on Whale Island (which had been largely created when dumping the mud spoil from the excavation of the basins which were to form Portsmouth dockyards), he put forward the suggestion that Whale Island should be levelled and drained to allow the construction of a new gunnery establishment to replace the 80-year-old ship which at the time was rotting and needed replacement.
_	In the same interview, he flatly denies the suggestion that he at all exaggerated his tales for the film, stating: "The behind-the-scenes footage of Kinski screaming at the crew member; as well as the interview footage with Kinski in my own "Please Kill Mr. Kinski" – should be enough to document Kinski's volatile behavior.
_	His choice of appointments caused lasting damage to his reputation, worsened by the suggestion that the first draft of the list had been written by his political secretary Marcia Williams on lavender notepaper (it became known as the "Lavender List").
_	Of course, the suggestion that the Carron has changed course in this area has been questioned by other researchers.
_	This leads to the suggestion that John's son Donald Balloch stirred up rebellion in 1429 to avenge his father's death.
_	In terms of the suggestion that it promotes a style of teaching and learning that seeks to undermine a Cartesian separation of mind and body, its greatest debt is to work in Neuroscience by academics such as Andy Clark, and to phenomenology of the kind developed by Husserl.
_	Fraser and Navarro speculate that Juan Perón made the suggestion that performers create a union, and the other performers likely felt it was good politics to elect his mistress.
_	A subadult described by David Martill and Darren Naish from the University of Portsmouth in 2006 had not yet fully developed its crest, which supports the suggestion that the crest was a marker for sexual maturity.
_	As for the "direct effect" in the United States, the Court rejected the suggestion that under the FSIA the effect in the United States necessarily needed to be "substantial" or "foreseeable" and instead concluded that in order to be "direct", the effect need only "follow as an immediate consequence" of the defendant's activity.
_	This period was far shorter than astronomers considered pulsars capable of reaching, and led to the suggestion that pulsars can be spun-up by accreting mass from a companion.
_	Confirmation from articles in the Dundee Courier in 1910 confirming completion dates of Watson's first and second aeroplanes pour cold water on the suggestion that he built and flew rocking wing aircraft any earlier.
_	Pollen of "Ephedra" spp. was found in the Shanidar IV burial site in Iraq, which led to the suggestion that its use as a medicinal plant dates to over 60,000 years ago.
_	The University of Nottingham's Institute for Name-Studies has offered the suggestion that the name Crompton means "river-bend settlement", which may reflect Crompton's location on a meander of the River Beal.
_	Explaining his project, named "#HeyTwitter", in a YouTube video, Shapira claimed to having reported around 300 tweets to the company within six months, receiving only nine responses from the company, each rejecting the suggestion that the tweets were a violation of the company's terms of service.
_	The reasoning for the move was that the logistical and financial issues of hosting what was becoming an increasingly large and potentially popular event, which then was increased from one venue to three, were too great for the Manx hosts to surmount, with the suggestion that Székely Land would be able to obtain the necessary support from the Hungarian government.
_	Closely related to questions arising from the paradoxes of implication comes the suggestion that logic ought to tolerate inconsistency.
_	In response to the suggestion that it would have been more prudent to abort her child and that she only carried her child to term because of her mother's views on the issue she responded:
_	Although not present in the sequenced Denisova genome, the distribution pattern and divergence of HLA-B*73 from other HLA alleles has led to the suggestion that it introgressed from Denisovans into humans in west Asia.
_	The newspaper was owned by James G. Stahlman, a Vanderbilt trustee who was "strongly anti-integration"; it published misleading stories, including the suggestion that Lawson had incited others to "violate the law."
_	He also wrote of how, when he placed a fragment of copper into the solution, the copper turned a deep green hue, lending further validity to the suggestion that orpiment or realgar was used, as they are both arsenic ores, and this would be the hue achieved from the copper after it had been placed in the arsenic trioxide had the substance formed been copper arsenite.
_	The group authored a letter to V.I. officials that some of its members found objectionable because it included the suggestion that some government officials were homosexual.
_	In a letter to Joseph Dalton Hooker on 1 February 1871, Darwin discussed the suggestion that the original spark of life may have begun in a "warm little pond, with all sorts of ammonia and phosphoric salts, light, heat, electricity, , present, that a compound was chemically formed ready to undergo still more complex changes."
_	This portion of the poem was thought "probably corrupt" until the helmet was discovered, with the suggestion that "the scribe himself does not appear to have understood it"; the meaning of "the notorious '," in particular, was only guessed at.
_	In 1927 the archivist Peleo Bacci made the suggestion that Barna had never existed and that the paintings are the work of Lippo Memmi.
_	There is also the suggestion that the educated bishop (or abbot) is not as wise as the uneducated brother (or shepherd) - implying there is a "native wit" that is more valuable than school-book wisdom.
_	Indeed, no articles printed during Hoy's lifetime have been found to support the suggestion that he influenced the creation of signals, nor did he ever maintain that he had such a role.
_	The 'parcels' are entirely an invention of the author, as is the "Sons of Sieve", and the suggestion that Ellen Kelly and Harry Power were lovers.
_	Ivan calms the crowd, but is interrupted by envoys from the khanate of Kazan, who send him a ceremonial knife with the suggestion that he do himself a favor by using it to commit suicide.
_	Grant refused the suggestion that the treaty drop the Dominican statehood clause.
_	In this next few hours after the first lunch, all refugees had severe diarrhea, which led to the suggestion that they had been poisoned.
_	A member of the staff of the Jewish organization J Street then stepped forward to say that while she was arranging speaking engagements for Shavit he had caressed her hand and propositioned her with the suggestion that they go out for drinks.
_	The similarity of the name "Hayasa" to the endonym of the Armenians, "Hayk" or "Hay" and the Armenian name for Armenia, "Hayastan" has prompted the suggestion that the Hayasa-Azzi confereration was involved in the Armenian ethnogenesis.
_	Citing a 1995 article from "The New York Times", Anne Applebaum said the suggestion that the EU and NATO had provoked Russia was "based on revisionist history promoted by the current Russian regime—and it is wrong.
_	The combination of original music, unique theme, and implicit questioning of traditional theodicies have led to the suggestion that the play may stand at the very beginning of non-liturgical and vernacular drama in Europe.
_	Octavian's wife hears this and tries to comfort him with the suggestion that they build an abbey and dedicate it to the Virgin Mary.
_	Nelson conducted pioneering fieldwork on the habits and communication methods of gannets and boobies; among his key hypotheses was the suggestion that gannets use a gesture known as "skypointing" to warn mates that they are about to leave the nest.
_	On September 10, 1964, the Prime Minister yielded to the suggestion that the matter be referred to a special flag committee.
_	The fact that the two types of microscopic colitis share many features including epidemiology, risk factors and, response to therapy has led to the suggestion that they are actually subtypes of the same disease.
_	Supporting this hypothesis is the suggestion that the orogens have "truncated ends" that can be matched and that both share the commonality of having carbonate platform sediments at what is today their western side.
_	Her name is not reliably recorded, and the suggestion that she is to be identified with Dunna, Abbess of Withington, is broadly rejected.
_	If, however, it was realised that Beyers's remarks had been made, "in reply as it were," to the suggestion that those who suffered most were "loan sharks," the reference to "thousands of little men" must have been intended to "emphasise the potential damage that could be caused, by the type of fraud committed by the appellant, to employees of furniture manufacturers."
_	The timing of the album, between Crosby, Stills, Nash & Young reunions, the fact that it was produced by David Crosby, and the presence of the individual band members' names on the album cover has led to the suggestion that the album was something of a substitute for CSNY.
_	DeStefano called the suggestion that he was a Democratic plant ""a bunch of crap"".
_	A contemporary account states that "Sir Guy Carleton observed that no interpretation could be put upon the article [article 7 of the peace treaty] inconsistent with prior [promises] binding the National Honor which must be kept with all colors", and Carleton rebuked Washington for the suggestion that a British officer would consent to a "notorious breach of the public faith towards people of any complexion".
_	Stochastic theories of aging is the suggestion that aging is caused by small changes in the body over time and the body's failure to restore the system and mend the damages to the body.
_	Economist Tyler Cowen, who called Klein's rhetoric "ridiculous" and the book a "true economics disaster", says that the book contains "a series of fabricated claims, such as the suggestion that Margaret Thatcher created the Falkland Islands crisis to crush the unions and foist unfettered capitalism upon an unwilling British public."
_	The term learner-generated context originated in the suggestion that an educational context might be described as a learner-centric ecology of resources and that a learner generated context is one in which a group of users collaboratively marshall available resources to create an ecology that meets their needs.
_	This also led to the suggestion that early clusters of Nav1.2 and Nav1.6 channels are destined to later become nodes of Ranvier.
_	Rabois came to Thiel's attention after he was found outside an instructor's home, shouting homophobic slurs and the suggestion that the instructor "die of AIDS."
_	A student manual published by the church has suggested that the suggestion that the consumption of meat be limited to wintertime may to some degree be a historical relic of the time in which the "Word of Wisdom" was delivered by Smith:
_	As the search for Jessica commences, Viki denies the suggestion that she had stolen the child as Niki.
_	Any bandwidth used between rate and ceil is borrowed from a parent class, hence the suggestion that rate and ceil be the same in the top-level class.
_	The CJC explicitly rejected the suggestion that anything short of fraud, such as exaggerations or perception of a truth.
_	Especially the river's upper parts at the headwaters are clear and flow through rocky country, leading to the suggestion that sediments mainly originate from the lower parts.
_	The author's name is not known, but similarities to "Le Morte d'Arthur" have led to the suggestion that the poem may have been written by Sir Thomas Malory.
_	(7) Monoyahwism, to avoid the suggestion that there were several deities named YHVH.
_	It is generally agreed that his disappearance was a simple case of an accidental drowning, but a number of conspiracy theories still surfaced, most famously the suggestion that he had been collected by a Chinese submarine.
_	This house, which stands close to the staggered cross-roads at Oaks in Charnwood, has an ornamental tiled roof and chamfered stone door and window surrounds, features which are thought to lend weight to the suggestion that it was designed by E.W Pugin.
_	He was also opposed to the suggestion that Moldova become a federal state made up of three republics: Moldova, Gagauzia and Transnistria.
_	An alternative view of the bipolar reduction technique is offered by Jan Willem Van der Drift which contradicts the suggestion that there is little control over fracturing.
_	This prompted the suggestion that the Anglia Class 86 fleet be replaced by the 15 Class 90 locomotives from Virgin Trains, which were soon to be made redundant by the introduction of new Class 390 "Pendolino" units.
_	Other notable suspects included Locusta, a professional poisoner, and Xenophon, Claudius' royal physician, who, in line with the suggestion that the poison was not immediately fatal, is said to have carried an ailing Claudius out of the banquet, taken him to his room and forced a poisoned feather into his mouth on the pretence of encouraging him to regurgitate.
_	Along with the suggestion that Great Britain's and Germany's best interests would be served by Neville Chamberlain being replaced as Prime Minister by Winston Churchill, Schwerin advocated that pressure for an internal military coup by anti-Nazi elements of the Wehrmacht that he was aware of back in Germany could be induced by the deployment of a squadron of Royal Navy battleships taking up a hostile position off Germany's Northern shore in the Baltic Sea, and the Royal Air Force moving elements of its Bomber Command to a pre-battle theatre station in French airfields, as a means of indicating the British Empire's ultimate willingness for a confrontation with the Nazi regime.
_	Lord Shaftesbury (as Ashley had become upon his father's death in 1851) was the chief witness and opposed the suggestion that the certification of insanity be made more difficult and that early treatment of insanity was essential if there was to be any prospect of a cure.
_	This has spawned the suggestion that her views are anti-feminist.
_	He rejected the suggestion that the Confederate flag be placed in a glass case by saying, "Encasement represents entombment," and by saying that he wanted "no part in symbolically burying the Confederate banner."
_	Implicit here, but not fully articulated, is the suggestion that there was a type of affective devotion and an effort to craft or shock an emotional response, but that the emotions were different than those that would be evoked in later affective devotional practice.
_	A 2001 study found that 30% of Native Americans agreed with the suggestion that police officers are honest (compared to 57% of whites and 15% of Black/African-Americans).
_	In Yealland’s view, patients were more amenable to the suggestion that they suffered from a physiological disturbance that could be potentially remedied by a physical treatment such as faradism.
_	In "The New York Times", Anatole Broyard countered the suggestion that Iris Murdoch "writes too many novels and they are all the same" by saying that "having mastered her particular form and style", Iris Murdoch should continue to work in the same vein as long as it suited her to do so.
_	In all of these works, the embellishments appear in the first editions published under Mozart's guidance, with the suggestion that they represent examples of embellishments for lesser pianists than himself to follow.
_	Newcastle was particularly annoyed by what he saw as the abandonment of Austria, and by the suggestion that Walpole no longer trusted him.
_	Browning brings up the suggestion that Riley could actually be Lynsey's killer, and this is accepted by the court, resulting in both Browning and Mercedes being released, and Riley posthumously charged with Lynsey's murder.
_	However, the suggestion that this could have applied to Obama was rejected by Janice Okubo, director of communications for the Hawaii Department of Health:
_	This could reinforce the suggestion that some members of the village are retirees who chose to live in the parish for a relaxing retirement with peaceful surroundings.
_	His residence in the street has led to the suggestion that the nearby workhouse was probably the inspiration for "Oliver Twist".
_	Research exploring this typology and its third component – cumulative talk, in which ideas are shared but not built upon or critically analysed – has found "evidence of the link between the development of children's communication skills and improvements in their critical thinking.", leading to the suggestion that there should be more focus on these skills in classrooms, and commensurately teacher education programs, including in the context of computer use.
_	Lord Goff then addressed briefly the suggestion that Mr and Mrs Goss had never received the advance (because it had been paid over directly to Mr Haddon).
_	An example is the metaphorical phrase "Nature abhors a vacuum", which contains the suggestion that nature is capable of abhorring something.
_	From a more modern point of view, discarding the simple “push” concept of Le Sage, the suggestion that the neutrino (or some other particle similar to the neutrino) might be the mediating particle in a quantum field theory of gravitation was considered and disproved by Feynman.
_	Sree Chithira Thirunal's conditions were accepted by the Indian representatives and V. P. Menon, the chief Indian negotiator, put forward the suggestion that as Sree Chithira Thirunal was unwilling to take the oath, he should write a letter to the Indian government assuring them his full co-operation and commitment to the post of "Rajpramukh".
_	Republican Donna Nalewaja, State Senator's campaign focused on the suggestion that Dorgan had served in the United States Congress for nearly 20 years, and had accomplished relatively little.
_	In the TV version, the Prime Minister is presented with forged evidence of financial irregularity following a short-lived affair years previously; with the suggestion that he should resign rather than see the story made public.
_	Later that year, Zhang was serving as the prefect of Shu Prefecture (蜀州, in modern Chengdu), when he made the suggestion that Shu Prefecture, which was required to send 500 conscript soldiers to take up garrison at Yao Prefecture (姚州, roughly modern Chuxiong Yi Autonomous Prefecture, Yunnan), no longer be required to do so, as the road was treacherous and the conditions were so severe that many would die—and further that no garrison be put up at Yao Prefecture at all, treating it as vassal territory rather than part of Zhou proper.
_	Rival Mercury nominees, and favorites for the prize, the Kaiser Chiefs suggested that Anohni got in on a technicality; despite the fact she was born in the United Kingdom she spent much of her time in the US – although they later apologized for the suggestion that she wasn't a deserving winner.
_	The intercutting of the scene between Daniel and the girl's perspectives is largely identical to "Double Dare", as is the suggestion that the girl will meet a horrible fate if Daniel does not intervene.
_	There is also the suggestion that speed creates vulgarity, as suggested by the parallel seductions held at the chateau.
_	The Hollow Moon hypothesis is the suggestion that the Moon is hollow, usually as a product of an alien civilization.
_	The authors rejected the suggestion that Bohlin's two teeth may have differed from being in different places in the jaw, and separated their species on the basis of details of the wear surfaces and placement of ridges.
_	Eight years later the commission became more open to the suggestion that recreational uses might be as legitimate as commercial ones and agreed to the special conditions the sixth marquess had stubbornly laid down.
_	Nevertheless, she rejects the suggestion that she makes "women’s films".
_	He said that the suggestion that skiers from Australia and New Zealand should not compete on downhill courses gave him motivation to prove that they were capable of doing so.
_	Their case hinged on Chase's history of mental illness and the suggestion that his crimes were not premeditated.
_	Former condition, that the arch must be preserved was watered down into the suggestion that the new bridge should resemble the old one, but a day later Folić said that it is just a recommendation and that city doesn't have to follow it, also trivializing the bridge itself labeling it "just one of many generic German bridges".
_	Impressed by his old friend's thoughts and the fledgling Potomac Bonsai Association's first show at the National Arboretum, Dr. Creech then approached his departmental heads with the suggestion that acquiring a major bonsai collection might play a role in the Department of Agriculture's bicentennial plans.
_	Bernard Heuvelmans, a cryptozoologist who had helped Hergé envision lunar exploration for the two-part "Destination Moon" and "Explorers on the Moon", had given him a copy of his book ("On the Trail of Unknown Animals") in 1955, inscribing on the inside the suggestion that one day Tintin should meet the Yeti.
_	Several prominent individuals representing Maya of Guatemala decried the suggestion that the world would end with the 13th b'ak'tun.
_	There is no evidence to support the suggestion that this was in response to the earlier petition from the sister of James Collis.
_	In addition to numerous factual errors, he claimed that the two actors did not hate each other, and that the suggestion that "Steptoe and Son" ruined either actor's career was nonsense.
_	Although the "welcome of newcomers" came in fourth, the suggestion that the parish "address the needs of the Gay Community in Hollywood and West Hollywood" came in dead last (52nd).
_	One of the many arguments used to support Excalibur, and SDI as a whole, was the suggestion that the Soviets were working on the same ideas.
_	The prank was inspired by the suggestion that a similar fake-newspaper caper had been perpetrated by the University of Southern California against the University of California, Los Angeles in the past, and the paper was prepared in just two weeks with 15,000 issues printed.
_	A civilized human is therefore not only imbalanced and unhappy because of the mismatch between civilized life and human nature, but unlike Hobbes, Rousseau also became well known for the suggestion that primitive humans had been happier, "noble savages".
_	Boycott disputes the suggestion that the run-out was deliberate in his autobiography, referring to Botham's account as "a story that gets bigger and more fanciful with every telling".
_	An unnamed Israeli official dismissed the suggestion that it would join the NPT and questioned the effectiveness of the treaty.
_	This has led to the suggestion that the "Sheffield" of the Domesday book somehow encompassed the area that later became known as "Sheffield Park", the historic town and castle being in Hallam.
_	Admitting only to doing 'odd jobs' in the magical community, she derides the suggestion that she is in trouble, observing for a woman who survived the attention of the SS and concentration camp conditions, the worst the British prison system has to offer holds no terrors, and that the effort to keep a magical practitioner incarcerated simply isn’t worth the effort, concluding with a gnomic comment "'If you're afraid of wolves, don't go into the woods"'.
_	Johnston rejected the suggestion that any treaties made before the protectorate was established could transfer sovereignty to individuals or companies.
_	In 1985, the "BC 1921 Elversberg", a German carom billiards club, ordered four new carambolage tables from the Belgian company "Deque" They expected to be able to negotiate the price a few percent down, however "Deque" did not agree, but instead, made the suggestion that their official representative, Raymond Ceulemans could hold a demonstration at the inauguration.
_	More recently, postcranial remains of "Hadropithecus" found in the early 2000s prompted the suggestion that the monkey lemurs were more closely related to the lemurids.
_	The first is the suggestion that an ancient hill figure had once been carved into the side of Wandlebury Hill, similar to the Cerne Abbas Giant.
_	Ceaușescu allowed him to receive a new pension, but he was denied reintegration into the Academy, with the suggestion that such a move would dampen Romania–Russia relations.
_	Hill with the suggestion that the garden should become publicly owned and offering the hall which could be used as a museum, but there was as yet no organisation with the necessary legal powers for holding the property for permanent preservation.
_	Wawrinka has downplayed the suggestion that he be included in an expanded "Big Five", describing Murray as "well ahead" of him.
_	The lyrics make the suggestion that this may not be the first time the female protagonist has engaged in such behaviors, noting her familiarity with this particular hotel.
_	He also rejected the suggestion that economic development should take precedence over environmental protection:
_	The band's rhythm section, Tina Weymouth and Chris Frantz, covertly approached Belew with the suggestion that he should replace Byrne as the band's frontman, an offer which Belew politely turned down.
_	The premise of the film is based on the suggestion that "white people often never see skin colour, but black people always do".
_	Seward's instructions to Adams included the suggestion that it be made clear to Britain that a nation with widely-scattered possessions, as well as a homeland that included Scotland and Ireland, should be very wary of "set[ting] a dangerous precedent."
_	CIA involvement ranged from no knowledge, to knowledge but no participation, to knowledge with the suggestion that less brutal techniques were appropriate, to participation or observation.
_	European Socialist leader Sergey Stanishev condemned the statements made by Traian Băsescu, claiming that declarations to Gabriela Firea are provocative and inflammatory, and the suggestion that her husband could "disappear" is beyond the limits of decency.
_	Eager for the men to remain in the settlement permanently the settlers eagerly embraced the suggestion that they consider silk production (sericulture).
_	He made the suggestion that Hogg should record a complete album of hymns.
_	He initially offered qualified support to the suggestion that Quebec should establish its own citizenship, but he later rejected it on the grounds that it was unnecessarily provocative and offered no concrete benefits.
_	This abundance leads to the suggestion that it will not be long before solar energy will become the world's primary energy source.
_	In 2004, lawyers for the devolved Scottish Parliament advised that it was within the legal competence of the Scottish Parliament to choose a national anthem for Scotland, countering the suggestion that it would be a matter reserved to the Parliament of the United Kingdom.
_	In the story of the 1994 film, this is explained as being the result of forced deportations by aliens, with the suggestion that most ancient mythologies are the result of aliens posing as gods in the distant past (as in the unproven ancient astronaut hypothesis).
_	In light of steady increase, without any sign of limitation, the suggestion that life expectancy will top out must be treated with caution.
_	He later castigates Brenton for the suggestion that Corbet committed suicide, suggesting that the wound alone was the cause of death.
_	This uncertainty results from the suggestion that, because some colonies have been shown to have high levels of genetic diversity, worker ants could be inseminated by males and act as supplementary reproductives.
_	Angry at the suggestion that he did not already have the Spirit, he threw it away.
_	Paul Carder, Dean of Business and Creative Arts at George Brown College, approached Soulpepper theatre company, with the suggestion that a partnership be struck between Soulpepper and the George Brown Theatre Department to create a new performance/education facility.
_	The aversion of most predators toward hunting honey badgers has led to the suggestion that the countershaded coats of cheetah cubs evolved in imitation of the honey badger's colouration, which warns off predators.
_	He notes the suggestion that the offer was pre-arranged, in order to deprive the CIA of their camera, and thereby doom the FULCRUM effort.
_	He was helped to accept Gibraltar by the suggestion that, in the event of war, he could be transferred to command the forces in the Middle East; as he believed no major force could usefully be sent to France, this seemed to him likely to be the main focus of British attention in the war.
_	The Church of England expressed disapproval of Atkins' views, specifically the suggestion that increasing tolerance of homosexuality in the church was the cause of a declining number of people seeking to become ordained.
_	This was done in order to avoid the suggestion that the Holy Eucharist was a material Peace Offering to God made by his Church in and with Christ by the very same sacrifice he had offered once for all and now made present as a sacrament.
_	Emmet Scout suggested that "queerbaiting works on its audience because it offers the suggestion that queer people do have a vital place in these stories, that they might even be the defining figures, the heroes.
_	I don't like the suggestion that polymorphous perversity of the imagination is somehow second-best to literal polymorphous perversity.
_	A survey found that 72.2% of black, 68.0% of white, and 69.2% of Hispanic youths agree with the suggestion that rap music videos contain 'too many' references to sex.
_	The German 7.92×57mm Mauser "s.S. Patrone" service round was slightly more powerful with a heavier and larger diameter bullet, so the suggestion that Saginaw Steering Gear abandoned the project because .30-06 Springfield is more powerful is untrue.
_	"Stereogum"s Tom Breihan called "Fun" a "divorce" song, referring to Martin's breakup with Gwyneth Paltrow, and said the song ends "with the suggestion that maybe they'll get back together someday".
_	In an interview after the Sandy Hook Elementary School shooting in 2012, he expressed "annoyance" at the suggestion that there is a link between the two, saying, "I think it's disrespectful to [the] memory of those who died to talk about movies ...
_	Aesthetic opposition to the scheme was aggravated by the suggestion that Manchester Corporation would improve on nature and varied in tone and thoughtfulness: the Carlisle Patriot thought Manchester welcome to take all the water it needed, provided only that it must not "destroy or deface those natural features which constitute the glory of the Lake District" and advised against any attempt to mitigate the offence by tree-planting; Thirlmere had "..a character of its own which makes the suggested artificiality intolerable.
_	A radio show host on WSCR made the suggestion that Birck should buy the team.
_	This supports the suggestion that the aminopentol part of FB occupies the space of sphinganine in the enzyme.
_	Nevertheless, the work continued, and on 16 December Riel forwarded the committee's petition to the government, along with the suggestion that delegates be sent to Ottawa to engage in direct negotiation.
_	One of his findings was the suggestion that the caudal heart of fish pumped lymph, a theory that is no longer considered valid.
_	"The regional analyses lend some support to the suggestion that much of western and central Europe was repopulated largely from the southwest when the climate improved.
_	The prevailing thesis, by David Lim and José Pedro Machado, suggests that the name had its origin in the Arabic terms "câ" (for "tight valley") and "Llûs" (meaning "almond"), affirming the suggestion that it was in "The Valley of the Almond Tree".
_	Steering Committee chair Scott Reid rejected the suggestion that the group's focus on antisemitism is misdirected, since he argued that these will not use up all of the goodwill that exists on the part of Canadians for resolving issues related hate directed at minority groups: “I think the best way to think of this is [that as a result of our hearings into antisemitism, Canada's] anti-xenophobic, anti-racist, anti-bigotry muscle gets exercised and the more it gets exercised, the stronger it is for dealing with all of those other forms of racism, xenophobia and bigotry.
_	Although FIFA imposed a rule banning barefoot play following 1948 Olympics where India had played barefoot, the suggestion that the Indian team refused to play because they were not allowed to play barefoot is not entirely true; according to the then-Indian captain Sailen Manna, it was invented to cover up.
_	This led to the suggestion that "Brasilitherium" had early evolution of the mammalian brain.
_	Jenny Sager calls the suggestion that Falstaff was based on Greene fanciful and "cringe-worthy".
_	The report stated that the Director General of Police in Chhattisgarh had conceded Sen's peaceful approach however the DGP rejected the suggestion that Sen had been arrested for criticising crimes such as extra-judicial killings in staged "fake encounters".
_	Wilensky makes the suggestion that after the Second World War the Allies should have set up another international trial to prosecute any members of the clergy who may have been guilty of incitement or persecution of Jews before, during and after World War II.
_	Responding to the suggestion that the train's video might have been used to detect the points damage and thereby prevent the accident, a Network Rail spokesman said:
_	Whether Cassius Dionysius worked independently, or on the basis of Silanus's work, is not known; however, his residence in Utica, in formerly Carthaginian north Africa, leads to the suggestion that he knew Punic as well as Greek and Latin.
_	Simon credits his editor John Sterling with the suggestion that he observe a single drug corner.
_	O'Sullivan himself has dismissed the suggestion that he is the greatest player and believes that a player must equal Hendry's haul of seven world titles to be regarded in this capacity.
_	Some welcome the portrayal of Jesus as a strong character, whom no one dared oppose, and praise the use of familiar stereotypes to stimulate interest in religion, whilst others ridicule the suggestion that Jesus was a salesman.
_	This has led to the suggestion that the gene originally served a neurogenetic function in the ancestral bilaterian.
_	German Lutheran theologian Andreas Osiander took a different view, proposing in "Harmonia evangelica" (1537) a number of attempted harmonisations, including the suggestion that Jesus must have been crowned with thorns twice, and that there were three separate episodes of cleansing of the Temple.
_	As manager of IG Farben's Leverkusen plant he immediately took up the suggestion that the traditional May Day holiday should instead be celebrated as a new Nazi holiday for industrial excellence.
_	This codon is rarely used in this species, which has led to the suggestion that stochastic encoding is deleterious to the organism.
_	While the game is not pronounced "Rear", it has been misinterpreted that way in parts of the gaming community, leading to the suggestion that the game is associated with the buttocks.
_	The exterior design has been described as one that "takes the form of a gentle concrete puffball hovering just above the surface of the rock, rather as if it had been tossed there by the wind," with the suggestion that "the spiritual world (of the dome) passing silently around the temporal one (of the floor) without ever quite meeting it."
_	Additionally, Huarte's position on women provides support for the suggestion that the Renaissance was a time for men to make intellectual strides, and that women did not have this chance.
_	In the bottom right corner, next to a calf, a fish is very clearly visible, hence the suggestion that sometimes the god of the chariot would be Poseidon .
_	America rapper GZA makes a reference to the "Impeach the President" sample on his verse on "As High as Wu-Tang Get" by Wu-Tang Clan on the 1997 album "Wu-Tang Forever", with the suggestion that the snare drum in the sample is easy to rap over.
_	Several members of Presley's band later stated that Parker had no idea just how bad the situation was, although others have stood by the suggestion that Parker just didn't want to admit there was such a problem because he didn't know how to deal with it and was worried about any negative publicity it would create.
_	If a riding mac was worn there was the suggestion that it had been bought for a specific purpose.
_	In his book "", anthropologist David Graeber argues against the suggestion that money was invented to replace barter.
_	In the United States the concept was recommended as early as 1908 in the Colorado newspaper - the "Ouray Herald" (November 13) - when the editor repeated the suggestion that miners in the San Juan Mountains adopt "snowslide ribbons" to safeguard their travels to and from the mines.
_	Embarrassed, he turns down the suggestion that he sleeps in her compartment to key an eye on her but he does agree to sleep in the connecting washroom.
_	Elias CJ rejected the suggestion that notification was necessary for commercial efficacy, especially regarding the possibility that a vendor may require certainty regarding back to back deals of sale and purchase.
_	Some economists further developed its distinction from consumer surplus and role as an uncertainty risk aversion premium, leading to the suggestion that a concept of "option price" may be more appropriate.
_	In 1973, Pearl P. Randolph, a school bus driver in Virginia, won a new school bus in a national contest held by Wayne Corporation for the suggestion that sound baffles be installed in the ceiling of school buses.
_	A Roman road leading from Mistley to the nearby provincial capital of Roman Britain at Camulodunum (modern Colchester) has led to the suggestion that there may have been a port in the vicinity of the modern village which served the town in the Roman period.
_	To the suggestion that the CDF doctrinal assessment may have occurred because the sisters supported the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act while the bishops were against that legislation, Deacon said that the doctrinal assessment "was started before that."
_	This generalization suffered from many exceptions, and was subsequently replaced by the suggestion that valences were fixed at certain oxidation states.
_	This would eliminate the suggestion that Bhanugupta alluded to a battle with Toramana in his inscription.
_	The Marxist philosopher Lucien Goldmann argues in his posthumously published "" (1973) that the concept of reification as employed in Heidegger's "Being and Time" (1927) showed the strong influence of "History and Class Consciousness" (1923), although Heidegger never mentions Lukács in his writing and Laurence Paul Hemming, writing in "Heidegger and Marx" (2013), finds the suggestion that Lukács influenced Heidegger to be highly unlikely at best.
_	Cohen syndrome patients have been shown to have defective protein glycosylation, which is a major function of the Golgi, thus supporting the suggestion that Golgi dysfunction contributes to Cohen syndrome pathology.
_	In general, these criticisms drew heavily on the suggestion that he was too close to MI5 to be impartial, and that indeed his link with the Service (formalised with his privileged access to the defectors Gordievsky and Mitrokhin) made him a "court historian" instead of a clear-eyed and critical historian.
_	There is no evidence to support the suggestion that he was a member of the SAS.
_	The High Court subsequently found that the suggestion that their failure to call the police had contributed to Asher's death was based on speculation.
_	This proposal originated in late 1962 when mounting frustration over the high failure rate of Thor and Atlas-Agena prompted the suggestion that greater standardization of launch vehicles would improve reliability.
_	The Electoral Commission is unsure when this practice arose, but dates it to 1931, with the suggestion that it was made to coincide with market day; this would ease voting for those who had to travel into the towns to cast their ballot.
_	Billy appears to be a male ventriloquist's dummy, as its jaw is movable to give the suggestion that it is talking; however, it is not used in the same manner, as the entire doll is frequently seen moving on its own.
_	At this point, Criado Perez said that she was receiving about 50 such threats each hour, and found somewhat inadequate the suggestion that she fill in an on-line form for Twitter detailing the behaviour she had experienced.
_	Claims that the femur is indeed a musical instrument are, however, contested by alternative theories including the suggestion that the femur may have been gnawed by carnivores to produce holes.
_	In a three-hour discussion held that afternoon with the Captain of the Port, the British Vice Consul, and commanding officers of other American ships in the area, "Vicksburg"s commanding officer supported his action further with the fact that the passengers were seen to throw articles overboard just before the boarding party arrived and with the suggestion that the "Alexander Agassiz" had been fitted out as a raider.
_	Denny recoils at the suggestion that Kitchener, a man revered throughout the British Empire, would be capable of giving such criminal orders.
_	There is also the suggestion that a tree is vulnerable to careless handling like a woman.
_	They also put before the court the suggestion that Alexander III had designated Bruce as heir when he himself was still childless.
_	Both Canada and Australia are heavily royalist countries, and Nigger is shocked at one point by the suggestion that Australia could become a republic.
_	The historical study "Theodosian Empresses: Women and Imperial Dominion in Late Antiquity" (1982) by Kenneth Holum, further introduced the suggestion that her father, Leontius, was a native of Antioch rather than Athens, drawing from the "traditional link" between the two cities and their philosophers.
_	Many critics found Ackroyd's nationalist tone narrow and conservative, in particular the suggestion that the variety of writers, composers and artists were serving a homogenous vision.
_	In 1898, George Darwin made the suggestion that the Earth and Moon were once a single body.
_	He also put forward the suggestion that Hadrian's defensive system also included a number of forts along the Cumberland coast.
_	Krens dismissed the suggestion that Armani rented out the Guggenheim to show its wares, saying, "It's a non-story.
_	The reasons for this is the suggestion that women are "prone to believing and because the demon basically seeks to corrupt the faith, he assails them in particular."
_	Despite the suggestion that this through the librarian, "having no doubt spotted its hidden heresy", considering the historical context, it is more likely that the heretical content would be seen as the attacks on Sir Walter Scott, Paley's teleological immutability by Special Creation, and his other gripe, nobility and entail.
_	In view of this, it is perhaps surprising that, when Arthur Lupton retired at the end of the 1927 season, Hawke was one of the sponsors of the suggestion that Herbert Sutcliffe should become Yorkshire captain.
_	Little attention was paid to labor-management relations, with the B of LF mildly offering the suggestion that "the oldest firemen in service" should be promoted to positions as engineers "when they are competent and worthy, and opportunity offers".
_	In 1866, Sophus Bugge "followed up his explanation of the Weland picture on the front of the casket with the suggestion that the bowman on the top piece is Egil, Weland's brother, and thinks that the 'carving tells a story about him of which we know nothing.
_	He suggests that Robert Scaratt implanted the suggestion that Canning had been held at the Wells's house, as a useful decoy, and that he had somehow been involved in an unwanted pregnancy.
_	Research on mental models and reasoning has led to the suggestion that people are rational in principle but err in practice.
_	All the evidence collected by Police Magistrate Edward Denny Day and provided in evidence at the two trials clearly contradicts the suggestion that it occurred in a stockyard.
_	Analysis of density functional theory and coupled cluster calculations showed that the d orbitals are involved in bonding, leading to the suggestion that mercury should be considered a transition metal after all.
_	Clapton immediately agreed, on the condition that Baker hire Bruce as the group's bassist; according to Clapton, Baker was so surprised at the suggestion that he almost crashed the car.
_	The basic argument presented is that Amlaíb mac Gofrith did not rule in York and the suggestion that only one Amlaíb, Amlaíb Cuarán, was king there may explain some of the apparent anomalies in the numismatic record.
_	On October 16, Alderden said, "the suggestion that the boy ... was coached to hide seems inconceivable."
_	He made note of the glossary of unfamiliar terms for the Dungeon Master to reference and helpful hints on play, and concluded with the suggestion that "Palace of the Silver Princess" should replace "The Keep on the Borderlands" in the "D&D Basic Set".
_	This framework is the suggestion that government activity should be separated into three functions or "branches," macroeconomic stabilization, income redistribution and resource allocation.
_	The term derives from the vaguely rectangular shape of many electronic devices (and their detachable power supplies) and the suggestion that the device can function only as a lifeless, square object, paperweight or doorstop.
_	In a 2013 interview, in response to the suggestion that such a tour seemed "unthinkable" in the present day, Love said: "The '60s was a time of unthinkabilities."
_	In 1969 the educational psychologist Arthur Jensen published a long article with the suggestion that compensatory education had failed to that date because of genetic group differences.
_	Jon Benjamin, chief executive of the Board of Deputies of British Jews, said: "We are outraged and shocked at these offensive comments about Jewish victims of the Holocaust and the suggestion that Jews should have learned a lesson from the experience."
_	Finkelstein agreed to remove the suggestion that Dershowitz was not the true author of "The Case for Israel" because, as the publisher said, "he couldn't document that".
_	As the film progresses, it is revealed that during the coroner's examination of William's body, semen was found on clothing and on William's leg, leading to the suggestion that Delbert had killed William in an episode of "sex gone bad."
_	In turn Gould said to the Times that the suggestion that he had interfered with the investigation “preposterous."
_	The fact that several civilizations collapsed around 1175 BCE, has led to the suggestion that the Sea Peoples may have been involved in the end of the Hittite, Mycenaean and Mitanni kingdoms.
_	Assange responded to the suggestion that eavesdropping on Chinese hackers played a crucial part in the early days of WikiLeaks by saying "the imputation is incorrect.
_	However, the suggestion that the city remains in the grip of mobsters has been strongly denied by leaders of the 300 strong Italian community in Aberdeen.
_	There was never any thought that the Tsar, who had left the capital for Tsarskoye Selo on the advice of the ministers, would actually meet Gapon; the suggestion that some other member of the imperial family receive the petition was rejected.
_	Võ Nguyên Giáp disagrees with the suggestion that the proposals are not valid and not honest, as if replacing French colonialism with Chinese domination, but Hoàng Minh Giám thought that the unification of Vietnam With the Nationalist parties will reduce the opposition and strengthen the power of the Việt Minh, as the Chinese are relieved and the French have to worry.
_	During April 2006, scientists from the Census of Marine Zooplankton observed a number of rare deep-sea ctenophores, which led to a re-examination of the cydippid ctenophore taxonomy and the suggestion that there be two new families of cydippid ctenophore.
_	During the Congress a group of veteran party members approached Kirov with the suggestion that he replace Stalin as the party leader.
_	Demand for rules that are responsive to increasingly rapid changes has led to the suggestion that there can be, in appropriate circumstances, such a concept as "instant custom".
_	She dismissed the suggestion that the administration was using family separations as political leverage to force Congress to support Trump's broader immigration agenda or to deter migrants from coming to the United States.
_	Davie's o'the Mill lay nearby and is thought to have been a flax or lint mill, leading to the suggestion that these industrial activities all located along Threepwood Road and nearby may have been inter-dependent business ventures.
_	Individuals in every age who promote political ideology, caste systems, palliative sedation, mercy killing, utopia and other means including preternatural mental techniques to eliminate suffering generally reject the suggestion that suffering can have any value or redemptive merit.
_	Much of humanity is similarly offended by the suggestion that the moral community be extended to nonhumans.
_	In addition, marine natural history is drawn on as a novel source of imagery to such an extent that it has led to the suggestion that Diaper was drawing on Oppian’s "Halieutica" well before he made it a translation project.
_	Hindu scriptures, dated to between 5th century and 1st century BC, while discussing human diet, initially suggest "kosher" meat may be eaten, evolving it with the suggestion that only meat obtained through ritual sacrifice can be eaten, then that one should eat no meat because it hurts animals, with verses describing the noble life as one that lives on flowers, roots and fruits alone.
_	This has led to the suggestion that galaxies are largely formed by dark matter, and that the minimum size may indicate a form of warm dark matter incapable of gravitational coalescence on a smaller scale.
_	He refused to apologise to the Reubens at the time, instead offering "a complete apology to the people of Iran for the suggestion that they may be linked in any way to the Reuben brothers".
_	Also in May, Burroughs contacted producer Bernard H. Hyman with the suggestion that Tarzan films be released as seasonal events.
_	The exact meaning of the name is unknown, but the suggestion that it was derived from the Spanish "mata hombre" is a weak one.
_	Late 19th and early 20th century scholar Henry Adams Bellows translates "Lævateinn" as 'wounding wand' and says that "the suggestion that the reference is to the mistletoe with which Baldr was killed seems hardly reasonable."
_	It was then widely accepted, as validating the suggestion that man was much older than previously been believed, for example than the 6,000 years implied by some traditional chronologies.
_	Its proximity to a spring has resulted in the suggestion that it was dedicated to a water goddess.
_	He offered the suggestion that the effect was caused by a transition state (TS) stabilization effect: on entering the TS the free electron pair on the nucleophile moves away from the nucleus causing a partial positive charge which can be stabilized by an adjacent lone pair as for instance happens in any carbocation.
_	The Northern press had a field day; Hammerstein, when asked for comment, responded that he did not think the legislators were representing their constituents very well, and that he was surprised at the suggestion that anything kind and decent must necessarily originate in Moscow.
_	She answers her own question with the suggestion that Acton, born in 1799, was "in taste and in spirit, a child of the eighteenth century."
_	Meanwhile, the suggestion that Harvard may not be a suitable site for the library had begun cropping up.
_	Not understanding the significance of the stool, Hodgson clearly had no inkling of the storm his words would produce; the suggestion that he, a foreigner, should sit upon and defile the Golden Stool, the very embodiment of the Ashanti state, and very symbol of the Ashanti peoples, living, dead, and yet to be born, was far too insufferable for the crowd.
_	Foreshoreways are usually concerned with the idea of sustainable transport and the term is used to avoid the suggestion that the route favours either pedestrians (footpath) or cyclists (bikeway).
_	In fact, more coins with Christian symbols have been found near Bukhara than anywhere else in Central Asia, prompting the suggestion that Christianity was the religion of the ruling dynasty or even state religion in the principality where this coinage was issued.
_	He concludes his comparisons by considering the suggestion that the United States' violent history is the cause, but notes the similarly violent histories of Germany, Japan, France, and the United Kingdom (68 incidents per year).
_	More plausible is the suggestion that St Bega was the personification of a Cumbrian cult centred on 'her' bracelet (Old English: beag)".
_	Jennifer Van Bergen, a journalist with a law degree, responds to the comment that habeas corpus has never been afforded to foreign combatants with the suggestion that, using the current sweeping definition of war on terror and unlawful combatant, it is impossible to know where the battlefield is and who combatants are.
_	Adding to the evidence against vocal learning in non-human primates is the suggestion that regional differences in calls maybe be attributed to genetic differences between populations and not vocal learning.
_	This has led to the suggestion that a second gunman actually fired the fatal shot, a possibility supported by Chief Medical Examiner and Coroner for the County of Los Angeles Thomas Noguchi who stated that the fatal shot was behind Kennedy's right ear and had been fired at a distance of approximately one inch.
_	In response to the suggestion that his work is derivative, Young suggested in a 2009 interview with "The New York Times" that "Ocean Eyes" is perhaps the "next chapter" after The Postal Service: "The Postal Service released a record in 2003, and that was it.
_	Its occasional recovery from stool has led to the suggestion that it exists as a periodic, clinically insignificant colonist of the distal gut.
_	Neurotensin has been implicated in the modulation of dopamine signaling, and produces a spectrum of pharmacological effects resembling those of antipsychotic drugs, leading to the suggestion that neurotensin may be an endogenous neuroleptic.
_	Wilson seems from his diary not to have particularly welcomed the suggestion that he become CIGS.
_	The architectural motifs and style of the two - churches-within-churches - are rare and bear such a striking resemblance to one another that with the suggestion that Donato Bramante may have had a hand in the design of both.
_	Important discoveries are the board of Hellenistic wall, that confirm the suggestion that on this position was the ancient Greek city "Herakleion" and the gate in the wall of the donjon.
_	The conjunction of these two previous findings led to the suggestion that awareness may be a computed feature constructed by an expert system in the brain, that at least partly overlaps the TPJ and STS.
_	Charles advanced various proposals, the most tempting of which was the suggestion that if Isabella and Prince Edward were to travel to Paris, and the Prince was to give homage to the French King for Gascony, he would terminate the war and return the Agenais.
_	Grubb (2003), however, commented that the US, having per-capita emissions twice that of most other OECD countries, was vulnerable to the suggestion that it had huge potential for making reductions.
_	O'Connor was so angry at the suggestion that he walked out of their meeting and later told Muchnick not to book him for events in Chicago.
_	However, the names of tribes in the eastern Alps are not included, leading to the suggestion that the subjugation of the latter was achieved with much less bloodshed.
_	He headed a committee of the council which rejected the suggestion that the council buy out the shareholders in the development companies.
_	However, the collection of Toronto Papers of Gardner's writings has been investigated by American scholars such as Aidan Kelly, leading to the suggestion that their names are Cernunnos and Aradia.
_	Philip Martin tends toward agreement with Atkins, but refutes the suggestion that the reader is "not to take the couplet's 'unless' seriously," asserting instead that, "the poem's ending is...deliberately and properly tentative".
_	The authors discussed but dismissed the suggestion that the carboxylate function might bind to the catalytically functional zinc ion present at the active site.
_	This arrangement led to the suggestion that there are directional bonds between OH groups in adjacent layers.
_	The precise function of various patterns of animal coloration that have been called countershading has been debated by zoologists such as Hannah Rowland (2009), with the suggestion that there may be multiple functions including flattening and background matching when viewed from the side; background matching when viewed from above or below, implying separate colour schemes for the top and bottom surfaces; outline obliteration from above; and a variety of largely untested non-camouflage theories.
_	Along with the portrayal of Indian culture as subordinate to white culture is the suggestion that white children should abide by their superior cultural codes.
_	He considered its authors' "general argument" reasonable, and rejected the suggestion that their view that rape is either an adaptation or a by-product is trivial.
_	Higgins J described the suggestion that the Commonwealth be deprived of the appellate assistance of the very efficient State Courts as an extreme step.
_	Within a few days, other local observers reported having seen the animal alive, leading to the suggestion that this may be a manufactured story.
_	The local government formed a committee to consider requests that the 1986 accident be commemorated for future generations, including the suggestion that three vertical supports and girders closest to Amarube Station be retained.
_	Significant plot elements remain unresolved by the end of the series run, due to cancellation; a crucial story arc from the series was the suggestion that the memory expansion used on self-aware androids was part non-human DNA and that a material found by a remote base on Mars could create a hybrid of human and android DNA.
_	Bonaparte had ordered the fleet to anchor in Aboukir Bay, a shallow and exposed anchorage, but had supplemented the orders with the suggestion that, if Aboukir Bay was too dangerous, Brueys could sail north to Corfu, leaving only the transports and a handful of lighter warships at Alexandria.
_	Furthermore, Almond wrote that his only significant contribution to the song's instrumentation (besides the vocals) was the suggestion that the song begin with a characteristic "bink bink" sound which would repeat periodically throughout.
_	There is some limited evidence in favor of the suggestion that the Philistines did originally speak some Indo-European language, which would help explain the markedly Aegean Greek origin of Philistine pottery styles and decorative motifs, particularly Philistine Bichrome ware.
_	In a 2015 interview Leno reiterated his stance that O'Brien's own performance led to his ouster from 11:35 and that he remained mystified by the suggestion that he should have refused the time slot when it was offered back to him, saying "Why?
_	Johnston rejected the suggestion that any treaties made before the British Central Africa Protectorate was established in 1891 could transfer sovereignty to Sharrer, but he accepted that these treaties were evidence of sales of land to him.
_	The site was again excavated by John Garstang between 1930 and 1936, who again raised the suggestion that remains of the upper wall was that described in the Bible, and dated to around 1400 BCE.
_	Small variations in the phase of pulsation led to the suggestion that the star was being orbited by a giant planet which caused the pulsations to be delayed due to the varying distance to the star caused by the reflex motion about the system's centre-of-mass.
_	Jurists of the Hanafi school took up the question seriously, considering, but ultimately rejecting the suggestion that homosexual pleasures were, like wine, forbidden in this world but enjoyed in the afterlife.
_	In 1857, a bill was brought forth to the Ohio State Legislature seeking protection for the passenger pigeon, yet a Select Committee of the Senate filed a report stating that the bird did not need protection, being "wonderfully prolific", and dismissing the suggestion that the species could be destroyed.
_	Lucius Shepard, responding to a negative review by George Turner, decried the suggestion that he "haul a gob of rubber science out of the vat in order to justify and explain [his] physics".
_	Doubt has been cast on these figures, with the suggestion that Okamura often conflates numbers of supporters with actual members.
_	This motif is also found in other proteins of different functions, which led to the suggestion that WAP is associated with antiprotease or antibacterial properties.
_	Breast enlargement supplements are frequently portrayed as being a natural means to increase breast size, and with the suggestion that they are free from risk.
_	One of the most important trends to emerge in criminological thinking about OC in recent years is the suggestion that it is not, in a formal sense, "organized" at all.
_	This provided experimental evidence for the suggestion that the N-terminal region of ZP2 consists of three ZP-N repeats and revealed that - despite insignificant sequence identity - ZP2 is structurally similar to VERL, the vitelline envelope receptor for egg lysin of the mollusk abalone ().
_	However if paresthesia does occur, the results of this study are consistent with the suggestion that it is significantly more likely to do so if either articaine or prilocaine is used.
_	This has led to the suggestion that at some point the capital may have been moved south to the Niger River.
_	A plan to strengthen the fatiguing steel trusses under the bridge was scrapped, some claim in part due to the $2 million cost of those repairs, although Mn/DOT engineers "scoffed" at the suggestion that this was a major factor in the decision.
_	A variation on this argument is the suggestion that the word Paraclete (παράκλητος "paraklētos") in the text of the Greek New Testament was a corruption or alteration of the original Greek word Periclyte (περικλυτός "periklytos"), meaning "widely famed".
_	His scientific accomplishments included (in 1851) collaborating with Theodor Bilharz on the first description of the blood-fluke "Schistosoma haematobium", (in 1853) the elucidation of the life cycle of the tapeworm "Echinococcus granulosus", (in 1854) the suggestion that the cercariae of the fluke "Fasciola hepatica" were the infective stage which passed from the invertebrate to the vertebrate host, and (in 1856) the discovery of parthenogenesis in insects.
_	McNair later denied the suggestion that he would have assaulted the police officer if confronted, claiming that he had renounced violence after his initial arrest.
_	By the third century AD, the difference between Sappho's literary reputation as a poet and her moral reputation as a woman had become so significant that the suggestion that there were in fact two Sapphos began to develop.
_	Typical is the suggestion that the acquisition of Marc Nygaard, on a free transfer from Brescia Calcio, resulted in a £60,000 payment to agent Brian Hassell.
_	Spivak's writing has received some criticism, including the suggestion that her work puts style ahead of substance.
_	Peter made the suggestion that his surname came from King CARL Gustav of Sweden who had married a Princess of STEIN giving him the name of Carlstein.
_	In the 1910s, responding to the suggestion that Frankston was named after Frank Liardet, Wilbraham's grandson stated that the family believed it had been named after the early white settler Charles Franks.
_	An ancient Dacian pot bearing the words “Decebalus per Scorilo” led to the suggestion that this might mean "Decebalus son of Scorilo".
_	Alley lost popularity with the suggestion that the military should retreat back to the barracks, and was eventually reduced to a mouthpiece for Kouandété.
_	Egan resists the suggestion that religious understanding could be a further last stage, arguing instead that religious explanations are examples of ironic understanding preserving a richly developed somatic understanding.
_	Laboratory simulations have led to the suggestion that enough organic material exists on Titan to start a chemical evolution analogous to what is thought to have started life on Earth.
_	This technique has led to the suggestion that a low frequency dead region may be related to a loss of 40-50 dB.
_	Frederick was infuriated by the suggestion that he was dependent on the Pope, and in the storm which ensued the legates were glad to escape with their lives.
_	Nothing was as certain to unite the northern provinces as the suggestion that they should abandon their hard-fought sovereignty.
_	The committee was chaired by the then Chief Justice, Mr. Justice Michael de la Bastide; recommendations included encouragement of public consultation on the matter, and the suggestion that "The Order of Trinidad & Tobago" should be considered as "the Trinity Cross...was perceived as a Christian symbol" in this multi-religious society.
_	Therefore, the authors raised the suggestion that later revisions and phylogenetic analyses would result in the abandonment of the name "Kansajsuchus", and a referral of its type species to "Sunosuchus".
_	From that effort came the suggestion that several structures in the center of the village be nominated to the new Department of the Interior's National Register of Historic Places.
_	In a 1982 case, "Plyler v. Doe," the Supreme Court rejected the suggestion that illegal immigrants to the United States might not be "subject to the jurisdiction" of the United States within the meaning of the Fourteenth Amendment.
_	Though obviously a successful performer, a chance encounter at about this time with the great Russian cellist Gregor Piatigorsky resulted in a challenge for her to pursue a higher degree of technical mastery with the suggestion that she study in New York City with the incomparable Josef Lhévinne.
_	Carl Larsson received the ruling of the board as a confirmation that the museum accepted his painting, but he declared that he would not make the suggested changes, nor would he accept the suggestion that the painting should be installed in the Stockholm City Hall instead.
_	In a 2006 survey of American economists (83 responders), "87.5% agree that the U.S. should eliminate remaining tariffs and other barriers to trade" and "90.1% disagree with the suggestion that the U.S. should restrict employers from outsourcing work to foreign countries."
_	In 2008, he was invited by John Lasseter to join Disney Animation as a director, with the suggestion that he develop a story set in the world of video games.
_	The latter gave rise to the suggestion that values are processed automatically because this occurs even when responding to values is much slower than responding to sizes.
_	Although Albert assures Rodney that the suggestion that he was fathered by Freddie Robdal were just rumours, "Sleepless in Peckham" settles the issue that Freddie was Rodney's father, and this is further confirmed in the 2010 prequel trilogy "Rock & Chips", in which Freddie (played by Nicholas Lyndhurst) has an affair with Del's mother and conceives Rodney.
_	This did not sit well with Marvel Comics' editor-in-chief at the time, Jim Shooter, who disapproved of the suggestion that a nineteen-year-old boy was sleeping with a fourteen-year-old girl.
_	K.T.H. Farrer argued that "it is impossible to see how one could ingest from the canned food the amount of lead, 3.3 mg per day over eight months, required to raise the PbB to the level 80 μg/dL at which symptoms of lead poisoning begin to appear in adults and the suggestion that bone lead in adults could be 'swamped' by lead ingested from food over a period of a few months, or even three years, seems scarcely tenable."
_	This viewpoint was shared by many who feared the increasingly aggressive U.S. foreign policy under George W. Bush, and who resented the suggestion that Canada may not have an independent foreign policy.
_	Alarmed by reports from other drivers of excessive tyre blistering and the suggestion that Piquet's accident may have been caused by a tyre deflation, Goodyear withdrew all the tyres issued to teams (the original compounds taken to Imola were actually different to those supplied for a scheduled test at the circuit the week prior to the race).
_	A French reference also lists morphine in the mix, and notes that it can also be called "insane person mix", though it's unclear whether this refers to the potential results of its use, or the suggestion that "you have to be crazy to take it."
_	Awad laughed off the suggestion that she might be used as a fig leaf to cover up the Israeli government's actions.
_	The charcoal, red-scorching, and fired clay briquetage is seen as evidence that fires and heating took place at the mounds, and so, since some of the briquetage has traces of green-glaze on its surfaces caused by the vitrification of clay with salt acting as a fluxing agent, the suggestion that salt water, stored in the water-tight tanks, was being heated in clay trays to obtain salt as the end product is seen as the most likely purpose of the Red Hills.
_	The Gutenberg discontinuity coincides with the expected LAB depth in many studies and has also been found to become deeper under older crust, thus supporting the suggestion that the discontinuity is closely interrelated to the LAB.
_	Watch, while condemning the executions of the juveniles, stated "there is no evidence that this was a consensual act", and observed that "the bulk of evidence suggests that the youths were tried on allegations of raping a 13-year-old, with the suggestion that they were tried for consensual homosexual conduct seemingly based almost entirely on mistranslations and on cursory news reporting magnified by the Western press".
_	In 1927, the defense raised the suggestion that the fatal bullet had been planted, calling attention to the awkward scratches on the base of the bullet that differed from those on other bullets.
_	The South German Confederation, contemplated by the 6th article of the Treaty of Prague, never came into being; and, though Prussia, in order not to excite the alarm of France, opposed the suggestion that the southern states should join the North German Confederation, the bonds of Bavaria (as of the other southern states) with the north were strengthened by an offensive and defensive alliance with Prussia, as the result of Napoleon's demand for "compensation" in the Palatinate.
_	These considerations end with the suggestion that the relief could depict be the Fates (Moirai or Parcae) determining the child's fate in life.
_	The fragile base class problem has been blamed on open recursion (dynamic dispatch of methods on codice_1), with the suggestion that invoking methods on codice_1 default to closed recursion (static dispatch, early binding) rather than open recursion (dynamic dispatch, late binding), only using open recursion when it is specifically requested; external calls (not using codice_1) would be dynamically dispatched as usual.
_	In an article in "Biblical Archaeology Review" of July, 1983, Cohen put forward the suggestion that the Exodus took place at the start of MBI and that the MBI people were, in fact, the Israelites.
_	The content has led to the suggestion that it was written pseudonymously by a man.
_	However, criticism has sprung up over the possibility that in the interest of generating revenue, particular animals may undergo tranquilisation too frequently, with a case alleged where tranquilisation occurred once every two weeks, and the suggestion that this may be traumatising to the animals, with consequences poorly studied.
_	With this in mind then, Eugene M. Waith makes the suggestion that Shakespeare was attempting to appeal to both levels of his audience, groundlings and intelligentsia; he embraced the traditions of violence so as to ensure high box office, but the style of the play and the numerous classical allusions suggest he was writing with an educated audience in mind.
_	Along with Michael Harner, Harris is one of the scholars most associated with the suggestion that Aztec cannibalism occurred, and was the result of protein deficiency in the Aztec diet.
_	Upon the death of Pope Paul VI in 1978, Casey opposed the suggestion that the Church should elect a Third World pope.
_	Some sailors believed that polydactyl cats were better at catching pests, possibly connected with the suggestion that extra digits give a polydactyl cat better balance, important when at sea.
_	Women and Imperial Dominion in Late Antiquity" (1982) by Kenneth Holum, further introduced the suggestion that Leontius was a native of Antioch rather than Athens, drawing from the "traditional link" between the two cities and their philosophers.
_	The ISU approved the suggestion that the speed skating at the 1932 Winter Olympics should be held as packstyle races, and Americans won all four gold medals.
_	Cordemoy’s proposals were at once attacked by the engineer Amédée-François Frézier, well-versed himself in a knowledge of Gothic construction, but contemptuous of the suggestion that the Gothic arrangement might be reflected by columns and lintels – lintels, given the qualities of French stone, were altogether impractical for long spans, arches were to be preferred.
_	Statues draped in dust sheets decorate plinths high up near the darkened ceiling and sound-effects of chiselling can be heard to give the suggestion that this renovation is currently ongoing and unfinished.
_	After the Tripartite Pact was signed by Axis Powers Germany, Japan and Italy, in October 1940, Stalin approached Germany with the suggestion that it too join the Axis alliance.
_	But as of series three he has become more open to the suggestion that not everything can be easily explained by science.
_	In the Hopscotch - Criterion Collection DVD special feature "Introduction by Neame & Garfield", director Neame stated that Matthau's agent made the suggestion that they put in some Mozart because this would greatly please Matthau.
_	The 1999 science fiction-action film "The Matrix", among others, popularized the simulation hypothesis — the suggestion that reality is in fact a simulation of which those affected by the simulants are generally unaware.
_	Local historians regard the suggestion that the name is a derivation of "Sunning Hill" as a dubious story which has no substance.
_	A major thread of this perception is the suggestion that, to attract and convert people to Christianity, the Nicene Church incorporated Pagan beliefs and practices within the Christian religion, mostly Graeco-Roman rituals, mysteries, and festivals.
_	Accordingly, the American Ornithologists' Union's South American Classification Committee voted in 2008 to remove "S. zelichi" from their list, with two voters favoring the suggestion that it is a morph of the marsh seedeater.
_	Most relevant to the criticisms discussed in this section, the MSHA explicitly disputed the suggestion that "MSHA has grown 'too soft' on mine operators and has not been aggressive enough in enforcing the Mine Act."
_	At the thing, the god Heimdallr puts forth the suggestion that, in place of Freyja, Thor should be dressed as the bride, complete with jewels, women's clothing down to his knees, a bridal head-dress, and the necklace Brísingamen.
_	The agreement repeated the suggestion that Italy join in the proposal.
_	A 2009 study from Washington University in St. Louis has illuminated important connections between sleep debt, orexin, and amyloid beta, with the suggestion that the development of Alzheimer's disease could hypothetically be a result of chronic sleep debt or excessive periods of wakefulness.
_	Covent Garden, protective of its status, objected to the suggestion that the Sadler's Wells company should be called "The British National Opera" or "The National Opera", although neither Scottish Opera nor the Welsh National Opera opposed such a change.
_	At its birth, the genre of industrial music was different from any other music, and its use of technology and disturbing lyrics and themes to tear apart preconceptions about the necessary rules of musical form supports the suggestion that industrial music is modernist music.
_	Eady also concluded that the use of an English "nom de guerre" weakened the suggestion that there was a Nazi element to the incident.
_	However Räikkönen angrily shot down the suggestion that he would race, claiming that Renault had simply used his name for "their own marketing purposes".
_	The group and other feminists had criticised the police for victim-blaming, especially the suggestion that women should remain indoors at night.
_	While the left became radicalized, the right became weary of Ovando's vacillating statements, which included the suggestion that private property be abolished.
_	It is thought that this flexibility of interpretation, as well as the suggestion that there is a moral obligation to deliberate on the findings of the scryer, that led to rhapsodomancy falling out of favour with the I Ching.
_	The court did not ignore the suggestion that Adams had hastened Mrs Morrell's death, and Devlin clarified for the jury and medical profession how far the law allowed the orthodox doctor to go in easing the passing of the dying.
_	Martin dispelled the suggestion that there was any tension between the bandmates and Rihanna, saying, "There's a bit of a love story thread so we really needed someone to sing higher than me.
_	More recent data favor direct charging of pyrrolysine on to the tRNA(CUA) by the protein product of the "pylS" gene, leading to the suggestion that the LysRS1:LysRS2 complex may participate in a parallel pathway designed to ensure that proteins containing the UAG codon can be fully translated using lysine as a substitute amino acid in the event of pyrrolysine deficiency.
_	In the Cabinet Office, Sir Humphrey meets Sir Norman Block, the Permanent Secretary of the Ministry of Defence, who is incredulous at the suggestion that the dog be rescued—potentially a very expensive operation.
_	Trigger similarly observed racist elements in some of Childe's culture-historical writings, including the suggestion that Nordic peoples had a "superiority in physique", although Childe later disavowed these ideas.
_	Labrecque also said he looked forward to seeing how Michael regained his job, and raised the suggestion that the reason Michael clashed so much with Charles was because he was intimidated by the man's race.
_	The novel was criticised by "The Daily Mail" for its sexual content, with the suggestion that writing in this style was unsuitable for a "schoolgirl".
_	He dismissed the suggestion that Lloyd George was insinuating Liberal principles onto the Conservative ministers and believed that breaking up the Coalition would destroy the machinery that would best tackle future political issues and artificially revive the two-party system.
_	Svirbely the last of his adrenal-derived hexuronic acid with the suggestion that it might be the anti-scorbutic factor.
_	Lesbian feminists and others also opposed the suggestion that sexuality was a choice.
_	He asserted that "the suggestion that we should be feeling some concern for modern day Aborigines for suffering in the past is balanced a bit by the alternative view of whether you can feel sympathy for people who eat their babies".
_	Voice in the Wilderness or a lone voice in the wilderness is an English idiom for someone who expresses an idea or opinion that is not popular or that the individual is the sole person expressing that particular opinion with the suggestion that the opinion is then ignored.
_	Communications officer Lieutenant Thomas Keefer, an intellectual and initially a sympathetic character, plants the suggestion that Queeg might be mentally ill in the mind of "Caine"s executive officer, Lieutenant Stephen Maryk.
_	The site was again excavated by John Garstang between 1930 and 1936, who again raised the suggestion that remains of the upper wall was that described in the Bible.
_	Seconding this analysis of the book's emphasis on form over content, Paul Rosenfeld reviewed "Finnegans Wake" in 1939 with the suggestion that "the writing is not so much about something as it is that something itself [..] in "Finnegans Wake" the style, the essential qualities and movement of the words, their rhythmic and melodic sequences, and the emotional color of the page are the main representatives of the author's thought and feeling.
_	These demands were unrealistic as was the suggestion that James' illegitimate son the Duke of Berwick be appointed leader; this reflected the absence of any senior Scottish regional magnates.
_	Snegur also opposed the suggestion that Moldova become a federal state made up of three "republics": Moldova, Gagauzia, and Transnistria.
_	Vivianne Ihekweazu, of Mintel (a market research company) said that In 2008 when Delia Smith launched her book "How to Cheat at Cooking", some consumers were enraged at the suggestion that tinned mince could be substituted for fresh mince in the recipes.
_	With this in mind, Hackett approached guitarist Brian May of Queen with the suggestion that he join the project.
_	The Commissioners declared that the suggestion that police had intimidated Stuart into signing the confession was "quite unacceptable", and on 3 December 1959, the Commission concluded that Stuart's conviction was justified.
_	This has led to the suggestion that when the building was rebuilt in the 1760s, the south wall of the nave was moved further south to enlarge the building.
_	Because of evidence that shows use of on its own within Satawalese speech, the suggestion that it is its own phoneme has a stronger stance.
_	Addressing the suggestion that the book was a "roman à clef", Drury wrote a very sharply worded preface which was only published in the new edition:
_	This resulted in the suggestion that, whenever a woman had no children by her own husband, the state ought to allow her to live with another man.
_	At first they were offended at the suggestion that Harley-Davidson riders were not "nice people."
_	At Picture Cave, discovered by Carol Diaz-Granados, there exists a pictograph the central figure of which wears prosopic earpieces, leading to the suggestion that he represents an early form of Red Horn.
_	These results further support the suggestion that despite generally consistent definitions of sexual desire, perceived differing end goals of sexual desire may exist between the sexes.
_	Lewis A. and Lewis L. McArthur, in the seventh edition of "Oregon Geographic Names" find no support for the suggestion that employees of the Hudson's Bay Company had earlier named the stream St. Marys River.
_	This is the basis for the suggestion that dreaming involves a reversed sequence of perceptual events.
_	Ultimately, Bradley makes the suggestion that the War in the Pacific, the Korean War and the Vietnam War would have been avoided had President Franklin Roosevelt not been unduly influenced by the China Lobby that supported Chiang Kai-shek.
_	The D/L method has been criticized on the grounds that wickets are a much more heavily weighted resource than overs, leading to the suggestion that if teams are chasing big targets, and there is the prospect of rain, a winning strategy could be to not lose wickets and score at what would seem to be a "losing" rate (e.g. if the required rate was 6.1, it could be enough to score at 4.75 an over for the first 20–25 overs).
_	"The Village Voice"s Robert Christgau of "The Village Voice" wrote, "They're in love and they don't know why—with rock and roll, which is heartening in a time when so many college dropouts have lost touch with the verities", while concluding with the suggestion that "getting famous too fast could ruin them".
_	In 1954 Cliff Barrows, song leader for Billy Graham, was handed a copy with the suggestion that it be added to the song book for the London Crusade.
_	Although no formal legislative action was taken on the document, the heavy debate surrounding it, and the suggestion that some sort of anti-secession law would be passed, was viewed by many in Taiwan as evidence of hostile intent by the PRC government towards Taiwan independence supporters.
_	The fact that the mint of Rome was inactive for a short time before the monetary reform of 274 could be a consequence of this revolt, and the poor quality of the coinage at the beginning of Aurelian's reign supports the suggestion that the workers at the mint were adulterating the coinage.
_	Among these, one significant recommendation was the suggestion that there should be a substantially increased transfer of power to the 'new ruling elite' in Iraq.
_	He motivated his move with the suggestion that everybody must have a choice, while the website "Putin must go" did not provide an option to vote for Putin's staying.
_	Semmelweis could offer no acceptable scientific explanation for his findings, and some doctors were offended at the suggestion that they should wash their hands.
_	So I made the suggestion that it would be better to take advantage of my trip looking for the original characters of The Battle of Chile.
_	Rolston tempered his criticism with the suggestion that voice acting "can be a powerful expressive tool" and can contribute significantly to the charm and ambience of the game.
_	The crusaders accepted the suggestion that in lieu of payment they assist the Venetians in the capture of the Christian port of Zara in Dalmatia.
_	This can be seen as either discounting some of the ancient games of cooperation from Asia (e.g. polo, numerous martial arts forms, and various, now assimilated football varieties) and even from the Americas (e.g. lacrosse); or as the suggestion that while these sports did exist, modern team sports did not directly derive from them.
_	The court then held that the problem with the suggestion that Santam had acquired its own lien was that the expenditure in question had to occur while the party claiming the lien was in possession of the subject-matter; Santam, however, incurred no expenditure, and made no improvement to the car, after it took possession.
_	In January 2013 widespread publicity was given to work led by Terje Berntsen of the University of Oslo, Julia Hargreaves of the Research Institute for Global Change in Yokohama, and Nic Lewis, an independent climate scientist, which reportedly found lower climate sensitivities than IPCC estimates and the suggestion that there is a 90% probability that doubling emissions will increase temperatures by lower values than those estimated by the climate models used by the IPCC was featured in news outlets including "The Economist".
_	Although the suggestion that a Roman fort was established between two arms of the Soar around  50 cannot be ruled out, there is no evidence yet discovered of an associated fort.
_	Most episodes conclude with the suggestion that the adventure has simply been Justine's dream, daydream or fantasy.
_	There has been the suggestion that the above diagnoses really represent one entity.
_	In 1839, Adolphe Quetelet of Brussels Observatory in Belgium and Edward C. Herrick in Connecticut independently made the suggestion that the Quadrantids are an annual shower.
_	Americans like to see their nation as a meritocracy where everyone regardless of their skin color, sex, and income level is completely equal with exactly the same opportunities in life regardless of who they are, and the suggestion that some Americans might be disadvantaged because of their race, sex and/or income level is a painful one, implying their nation is not living up to its ideals.
_	Worried about her reputation, Isabella rejects the suggestion that she elope with Lelio, while Valerio reiterates his threat to leave home and join the army.
_	The PPP's main problem with Wahid was his visit to Israel and the suggestion that he was willing to re-establish diplomatic relations with that nation.
_	The equipment failure, inadequate training, and miscalculated sea room theories were disproven by the two Royal Commissions, leaving the suggestion that either a communication error aboard one of the ships caused "Voyager" to manoeuvre in an undesired manner, or the officers aboard "Voyager" were incorrectly aware of their vessel's position in relation to the much larger aircraft carrier.
_	He rejected the suggestion that the church could rebrand itself in the manner of American televangelists, saying "I don't think you can sell religion like soap."
_	There is little evidence to support the suggestion that the Welsh costume was worn just to please visitors, but it possible that this happened.
_	One example of "partnership" which would not be considered "egal" is the suggestion that in minyanim where only men are allowed to "sound" the shofar (ram's horn), women could call out the commands that describe the pattern of sounds called for at that point in the service.
_	I say it with all respect—as is the suggestion that the claim of a colored citizen to use, upon the same terms as is permitted to white citizens, the accommodations of public highways, or public inns, or places of public amusement, established under the license of the law, is an invasion of the social rights of the white race.
_	The sexual tension between Xena and Ares, and the suggestion that he is secretly in love with her, have been there all along.
_	The book ends with the suggestion that, with Marrow being a prison for the Bleak and the Great Ship an extension of that prison, the universe itself could be a further layer constructed by the Builders.
_	Peter M. Head feels that 'the suggestion that formula_1 is a manuscript of Marcion’s Gospel is a very clever idea which is however not proven and not the most plausible context for making sense of this fascinating manuscript'.
_	With tail flukes, reduced limb musculature, and long bones histologically comparable to other obligately aquatic animals, they were almost certainly incapable of terrestrial locomotion; combined with an unusually tall hip opening, as also seen in other obligately aquatic reptiles including the viviparous "Keichousaurus", this has lent credence to the suggestion that metriorhynchids gave live birth.
_	The name "Coregonus maraena" has been adopted following the suggestion that the name "Coregonus lavaretus" should only be applied narrowly to some whitefish populations in France and Switzerland, as advocated by Kottelat and Freyhof, and repeated by the IUCN and FishBase.
_	When Tutankhamun's tomb was discovered in 1922, many small items similar to those found in the KV54 cache were found in the initial entryway, leading to the suggestion that following the initial robbery of the tomb, the embalming materials and burial party refuse were moved to KV54.
_	Amongst the more notable ideas to have emerged from these inquiries has been the suggestion that, as more and more 3D printers start to enter people's homes, the conventional relationship between the home and the workplace might get further eroded.
_	However, some of these appear strange - including the suggestion that they are expensive (modern dive computers are cheap, especially when compared with the cost of other equipment and diving gases recommended by the DIR approach), and too conservative (the approach to decompression promoted by DIR - ratio decompression - leads to decompression profiles of varying conservatism, but are often very conservative).
_	Many judged his performance to be one of the best of his career, defying the suggestion that his best years were behind him.
_	As the search for Jessica commences, Viki denies the suggestion that she had stolen the child as Niki.
_	However, due to Iyasu's youth, Menelik agreed to the suggestion that he appoint a Regent ("Enderase") during the minority of his heir apparent.
_	Suffering from multiple sclerosis, she was insulted by the suggestion that her disease was nothing more than the result of her own lack of willingness to heal.
_	Sarah's mother was incensed at the suggestion that her daughter, or any other member of her family, would become an "artiste".
_	From Godfrey Higgins he derived the suggestion that the key to all mythology is to be sought in phallic worship.
_	Another turning point occurred for him as a writer of health and nutrition books in the 1980s, when he experienced what he saw as "political opposition" after making the suggestion that the closure of homosexual bathhouses might be necessary in response to the emerging HIV/AIDS epidemic.
_	A mortar in Barapa barapa territory, at Koondrook Perricoota Forest near Barbers Creek, was recovered in 2012 and an analysis led to the suggestion that it might have been employed to grind gypsum, used by more northerly tribes in funerals, but here perhaps for obtaining a corroborree body paint.
_	Other Nietzschean interpreters dispute the suggestion that Nietzsche's concept of the will to power is merely and only a matter of narrow, harmless, humanistic self-perfection.
_	"The world now knows that many of the fears then expressed were very foolish ones, and would never be realised under any circumstances, or at any place" said the Yorkshire Post although Manchester countered the suggestion that it should not annex Haweswater, but instead further raise the level of Thirlmere because "it would mean such injury to the Lake District that they would have the whole country up against them"
_	A proposal of force is met by the more cunning brother with the suggestion that they bring only a handful of men.
_	Had he accepted the suggestion that he should get a position in Sydney and play cricket, it is likely that he would have gained a place in the New South Wales eleven.
_	Twain's story about his pen name has been questioned by some with the suggestion that "mark twain" refers to a running bar tab that Twain would regularly incur while drinking at John Piper's saloon in Virginia City, Nevada.
_	palaeographic factors support the suggestion that the inscription is contemporary with the new base-plate and originally belonged to another reliquary.
_	As the trend in the Earth Impact Database for about 26 confirmed craters younger than a million years old show that almost all are less than 2 km in diameter (except the 3 km Agoudal and 4 km Rio Cuarto), the suggestion that two large craters, Mahuika (20 km) and Burckle (30 km), formed just within the last few millennia has been met with skepticism.
_	These include, though are not limited to, the suggestion that emissions associated with civil nuclear energy should, in the upper limit, include the risk of carbon emissions associated with the burning of cities resulting from a nuclear war aided by the expansion of nuclear energy and weapons to countries previously without them.
_	Observations of reversion of the "hothead" phenotype and genotype led to the suggestion that the plants were able to "remember" the sequences of genes present in their ancestors, possibly through a cache of complementary RNA.
_	But the suggestion that his "Mona Lisa", for example, employs golden ratio proportions, is not supported by anything in Leonardo's own writings.
_	This led to the suggestion that there might be a cell-mediated component (T cell) in disease pathogenesis.
_	Wedderburn notes this suggestion of chronological re-arrangement, along with the suggestion that Cornelius lived in Caesarea away from his unit.
_	Most blinded conscious provocation studies have failed to show a correlation between exposure and symptoms, leading to the suggestion that psychological mechanisms play a role in causing or exacerbating EHS symptoms.
_	Discussing Lucas's relationship with Denise, Gilet refuted the suggestion that Denise was a "token wife" deeming her more reliable than Trina and expanding:
_	Rožman responded favourably, sending Roatta a memorandum in September 1942 containing detailed advice on how to fight the Partisans, which included the suggestion that named anti-Communist internees should be released to lead the Anti-Communist Volunteer Militia ("Milizia volontaria anticomunista" — MVAC).
_	The edits following his analysis of the edits during 2009 and 2010, represented "a complete dismissal of the suggestion that the cylinder, or Cyrus' actions, represent concern for human rights or any kind of enlightened intent," in stark contrast to Cyrus' own reputation as documented in the Old Testament and the people of Babylon.
_	He complains that the British government takes no interest in his distresses, and that whenever he has proposed some check upon Russian aggressions the government of India has made no response except the suggestion that Afghanistan might consent to the construction of railways and telegraphs within her territories.
_	He also states "there is nothing new in the suggestion that Ímar of Dublin and Igwar/Ingwar/Iuuar of English history are identical.
_	In response to the controversy caused by the book "SuperFreakonomics" over Caldeira's view on climate engineering, Caldeira rejected the suggestion that he had said, "Carbon dioxide is not the right villain".
